title,selftext,subreddit
"Recently my cat was doomed to a cone of shame, which made playing games with her even harder than before.",,GirlGamers
I finally have time to play girlies I’m excited,,GirlGamers
Metal Gear Solid and More Announced With PlayStation Classic Full Line-Up,,GirlGamers
I just wanna have a chill time playing video games with my friends without them explaining everything to me.,"No matter how much experience and hours I have in a game (I have 1000+ in some), people I meet still feel the irresistible urge to start explaining everything to me.

No matter how many times I say ""I know"", they just keep going. They find all these different things to explain to me as if I'd never heard of what they're saying before. Urgh.

One time when I was playing Runescape, a friend of mine started explaining one of the skills to me (slayer). I've played Runescape since 2005 and have 3000+ hours logged. I felt so irritated that he somehow thought I wouldn't know the basics of a skill I've used for years.

I'm so irritated, I'm tempted to just stick to single player and not talk about games to people anymore.",GirlGamers
X-stitch character key chains for a podcast I enjoy!,,GirlGamers
Any fans of GMT's COIN series of board games?,"So GMT recently had it's big 50% off sale and I made a move on Falling Skies as I heard it's one of the best of the older themed games and one of the best for playing on your own. It should be here some time this coming week and I'm super excited.

So I just wanted to see if there was anyone here who was a fan of the series? Hit me up with your experiences and I'll let you know what I think when I get through my first plays of Falling Skies!",GirlGamers
Looking for new game suggestions for my partner please!,"Hey all, my partner is rather new to gaming and I am looking for some suggestions for newbie friendly titles! The first game she became interested in was Stardew Valley and shes put in about 150 hours, absolutely loves it. I bought her Subnautica next but she wasn't a fan, claimed it was too difficult to catch fish and didn't like the survival aspect very much either. I grew up as a pretty heavy gamer so I'm kind of lost in this beginner genre. If you ladies could post some of your first or favorite games that would be wonderfully helpful!",GirlGamers
What're your thoughts on traditional monitors vs tvs for a desktop?,"After a long period of being unable to have a desktop I finally got a new spiffy rig and I can't wait to use it to its full potential. My brother suggested I get a 32"" 1080 tv to use as a monitor like he does. I ended up getting it and think it does look nice but it got me thinking about tvs vs monitors. I know tvs have more of an input delay than monitors but are there any other real differences? What do you all like to use?",GirlGamers
Started platying Red Dead Redemption 2. This game is so detailed and beautiful to look at. Here's a nice screenshot I took. Anyone else playing?,,GirlGamers
Multiplayer games - where to begin?,"Like many here, I love playing video games, I've been playing since forever and that's not going to change anytime soon, but...
I don't play any online multiplayer games.

When I do, it's usually a rare occurrence with my boyfriend, where I'm fully in my comfort zone and feels like more of a LAN party than online gaming.
After being subbed for a while, and seeing how cool it can be to be in an all-girl team/clan, I'd really like to find a game that I can play with other girls online! And maybe make some friends in the process :)

I've been anxious about online gaming for a very long time, mostly due to bad experiences when I was younger (girl, gaming online, I'm sure we can all relate.), and I'm aware that a lot of communities can be toxic, especially if you use mic (which I don't think I'll be doing, at least in the beginning), but I'm ready to step out of my comfort zone and try something new.

Can any of you give me some suggestions to start online multiplayer gaming? I'm aware of the popular games: Overwatch, CSGO, WoW, LOL etc. but I'm not sure which is the best for me. 

I'm a huge RPG lover, I'm currently playing through Kingdom Come: Deliverance a 2nd time because I'm so hooked to the story! I also really love world-building/creation games, like The Sims and Stardew Valley. In the past I've found open world and adventure games are fun, like DayZ and GTA V. I'm honestly up for anything- RPG's, MMO's, Fantasy, or a plain old shooter. Something social where I can feel more connected to people!

I'd love to hear your suggestions :D",GirlGamers
Wholesome experiences with other girls in games,"This happened a while ago but I just remembered it today and thought maybe some people might appreciate it.. If anyone else has similar stories please share!!

&amp;#x200B;

So I was in a competitive Overwatch game and there was this duo on my team - a guy on dps who was shot calling, and a girl on Dva who wasn't talking but I assumed she was a girl because she had a girl-ish name. Anyway she was playing REALLY well on Dva and I remember thinking that to myself during the game - she saved me from their flankers loads of times (as Zen), as well as getting good ults and just generally doing really well. Near the end of the game, I got hooked by a flanking Roadhog and he would have killed me but she matrixed me immediately, saving me and enabling me to get my trans off and we ended up winning the game. After we won, her duo asked us if we thought the Dva had played well. I hadn't said anything up to this moment, but I piped up and said ""yeah she was playing really well, I actually thought that!"", so then she piped up as well to say ""oh thank you!"". Then he went on to explain that she had been practising other heroes in quickplay, but in competitive they kept getting toxic people who would see all her hours on Mercy and flame her for playing other things and it was making her lose her confidence. I said something like ""well, you shouldn't listen to them because you genuinely did so well as Dva. That matrix at the end there pretty much saved the game, so gg!"" and she was like ""thank you! that honestly means so much to me! gg!""

&amp;#x200B;

It was just super wholesome and made me feel all fuzzy remembering it :p

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",GirlGamers
ESPN: Fortnite provides new path for women in esports,,GirlGamers
I’ve never received this kind of abuse before,"I play a lot of overwatch and I’m currently in mid gold. People are generally cool and I’m a calm person in game usually. I like doing call outs and telling people good job for their kills, etc. Feels good man. 

Today I got matched with a 3 stack that was playing Reaper, Rein and Moira in comp. The Reaper was a low silver and he didn’t have a lot of hours on DPS. But what can I say? I’m mid-gold so I couldn’t judge and was like, maybe he can pull some nice picks. 

I decided to play DVA, and the other team had a pharah. I was nailing her and we were fine, but our dps had issues with killing tanks. Our Reaper kept telling me to kill the Winston (??). We won the first match, then lost the second. Our Rein called us all Idiots. 

Then, halfway into the third match our Reaper decided he needs to switch to Zarya as we were in fight and he had died flanking. He types in chat for me to get off of DVA. His teammate who was playing Rein told me I was a moron and demanded I switch while I was on point. 

I don’t usually stand up for myself but I told them no, I was doing fine on DVA, had 6 self-destruct kills and they were rude demanding that I switch without asking me. 

I get met with a barrage of insults: “oh look she’s pmsing, you’re a terrible DVA, dumb girl”. 

And I just said “if you had asked nicely I would’ve switched, but you’re incredibly rude”. 

The Rein continued to verbally abuse me calling me fat, stupid, basically every name in the book. Someone not in the 3-stack asked him to please stop. We lost because the Zarya kept dying and then I asked them to stay for the cards. They just left. In the end I had 3 golds, silver damage and 70% kill participation. 

I’m not going to lie, I was shaking and felt kind of nauseous. In the year I’ve played overwatch I’ve never been insulted like that. People are usually like “good job guys and girl!” which is really nice. The Zarya that demanded I switch typed in main chat that I threw and someone else on our team asked the other team to report the 3-stack because they heard how they went after me. 

Just makes me feel horrible, but I won’t let it ruin my experience. Anyways, just needed to get it off my chest. ",GirlGamers
Supports protecting their DPS 😊,,GirlGamers
"Polygon: ""Video game voice actresses are more in demand than ever before""",,GirlGamers
"Dude who kept harassing me, telling me numerous times in-game and on my Steam profile to get raped is finally banned from the game.","I'm mostly hmm.. relieved? It's nice to know that action has been taken. He also was commenting on my Steam profile, so my friends &amp; their friends did a mass report of his 9-year-old Steam account for harassment. I was also told that if he makes any new Steam accounts, that they will ban them from the game too. 

The perks of a small game playerbase? :P I'm very appreciative of the quick response time from the mods. 


Apologies if this is off-topic or doesn't belong - feel free to remove this post if it is. ",GirlGamers
I wanna send this to every dudebro asshat who insults ladies playing the healer. We hold your life in our hands. Beg for it.,,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - October 26, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Went to early release at Game stop. Picked up RDR2!!!!!!!!!😆😆😆😆😆😆. Also won Second son in a raffle. Y'all let's get this Game started!!!!!!!!!,,GirlGamers
Monster Hunter live action movie already looking bad,"I've been a fan of the series since the PS2 days . Live action adaptations have never done well but after looking at the cast and hearing that Capcom would have an involvement, I was looking forward to it.

The recent [set photos](https://www.iol.co.za/entertainment/movies-theatre/pics-milla-jovovich-and-ti-share-bts-while-filiming-monster-hunter-in-sa-17636288) made me lose all hope I had for it. Even the setting isn't like the game. This is what the director had to say:

&gt;The central characters are very relatable American characters. You take a person from the ordinary world who thinks they’re in a dead end job, they have no future, they feel like their life’s a failure, it’s going nowhere, like Keanu Reeves in *The Matrix*. It’s about a normal American who gets dragged into this parallel world, this *Monster Hunter* world. Then eventually the parallel world ends up coming to our world. So you have the creatures from the *Monster Hunter* world invading our world. 

So we're getting a Pacific Rim rip-off with monsters and explosions. I always felt that MH would be one of the easiest game to movie adaptations possible, and they still managed to make it sound horrible.

I'm not sure what it is with Hollywood and video game adaptations, but this is another one that I won't be watching.",GirlGamers
What's your favorite PC game for grinding cosmetics and leveling up your character?,"Hello ladies,

I'm wondering if any of you can steer me in the direction of finding a PC game (maybe on Steam) with a character creation system that allows you to grind for cosmetics (like get a cool wardrobe, sword, etc), preferably with a skill system where you can level up? Bonus points if it has controller support, whether full or partial.

I've played games like Skyrim before but it wasn't *my thing*; I usually play indie games but would like to steer out of that direction. I've also played RuneScape *forever*, so I'm used to that game inside and out, and have completionist on it as well. As for something like the Sims, I normally don't like it for anything else other than designing a nice house. And Portal Knights, I play with my boyfriend, but doesn't have many cosmetic options.

I've looked at games like ESO (but I don't like Skyrim so I don't know if I'll like it) and World of Final Fantasy (but I don't like FF but this seems different). I've played some free games on Steam like Paladins, AdventureQuest, Tale of Toast, etc. but they didn't hold my attention for long.

I usually play games like Stardew Valley, Animal Crossing, RuneScape (3 and OSRS), Portal Knights, Town of Salem, A Hat in Time, etc.

Does anyone have any recommendations of something I can get into? Thank you!",GirlGamers
As it Pertains to Red Dead....,I am so torn on this game. It looks really cool and I missed out on all the fun of the first one. Seeing everyone talk about how great it is made me feel like I missed something really special. But with what came out about Rockstar's methods....... I don't want to support them doing crap like that on the other hand it makes me want the game even more because those who slaved themselves over the game deserve it. ,GirlGamers
Metro 2033 Free for the next 24 hrs,"Not gonna post the link so the post doesnt get blocked. Just go to steam, search Metro 2033 and under Install it should say free.",GirlGamers
Today is the 22nd Anniversary of the Tomb Raider Franchise,,GirlGamers
OSRS Available on Mobile Oct. 30th,I'm just so excited I needed to share,GirlGamers
Seeking advice or insight.,"Before I start, I made a throw away account to make this post. I also am a gamer girl who subscribed on this page, who enjoys reading the topics and engaging with all you ladies. So here we have our predicament and any insight or advice on how to come out on top is greatly appreciated. 

So I’m a part of an All- Girl clan and we are receiving harassment from a group/clan that we were once associated with. An incident involved one of our underaged members getting harassed by the men from their group while she was streaming. 

I am sure other gamer girls have dealt with this before. What are ways you girls have dealt with this and come out on top without losing your integrity. 

We are taking steps to trying and report them through the platforms that they have been harassing us on. But we want to make sure we have ourselves covered.  
",GirlGamers
building my first gaming pc,"i'm starting to build my first gaming pc and have seen some amazing rigs in this subreddit. anyone recommend any particular parts (case, keyboard, mouse, etc) they've used and really liked? i'm up for anything that isn't the traditional manly, black, alienware-type look - and yes, embarrassingly, aesthetics are v important to me. 

&amp;#x200B;

what do you recommend? any particular set-ups you think look particularly good?",GirlGamers
I finally Updated My Game List. How Many do we have in common?,"# Currently Owned Games List

Total Owned: 139, Total Owned Multiple Times: 23, **Total Beaten: 36**, *Total Unplayed: 20*

&amp;#x200B;

# Single Player Games

(PS) -  **Chrono Cross**, Final Fantasy Anthology, **Final Fantasy VII, Final Fantasy VIII, Final Fantasy IX, Legend of Dragoon,** Parasite Eve

(PS2)-  Castlevania: Lament of Innocence, **Devil May Cry 3**, Final Fantasy VII: Dirge of Cerberus, **Final Fantasy X, Final Fantasy X-2,** Final Fantasy XII, **Kingdom Hearts**, Kingdom Hearts: RE Chain of Memories, **Kingdom Hearts II**, Need for Speed: Underground, **Okami,** **Prince of Persia: Sands of Time, Prince of Persia: Two Thrones, Xenosaga Episode I,** Xenosaga Episode II, *Xenosaga Episode III*

(PS3)-  Final Fantasy X/X-2 HD, Prince of Persia Trilogy HD, **ICO**, Shadow of the Colossus

(360)-  Bayonetta, *Beyond Good and Evil, Fable Anniversary*, **Fable 2, Fallout 3**, Fallout New Vegas, Mirror's Edge, Orange Box, Outland, **Prince of Persia**, Quantum Conundrum, Rayman 3 HD, Saint's Row IV, Tomb Raider: Underworld

(XBONE) *Assassins Creed Syndicate*, Bioshock Collection, Child of Light, **DMC**, **Dishonored**, Dishonored 2, *Dragon Age: Inquisition*, Elderscrolls V: Skyrim, Fallout 4, Okami, Rise of the Tomb Raider, *Shadow of the Tomb Raider*, Super Hot, T**omb Raider 2013**, Tumblestone, Unravel, **Thief**, *Kingdom Hearts III, Spyro the Dragon Collection*

(NGC)-  ***Legend of Zelda: Collectors Edition***, **Legend of Zelda: Wind Waker, Legend of Zelda: Twilight Princess**, Metroid Prime

(Wii)-  Okami, Legend of Zelda: Skyward Sword

(Wii-U) Legend of Zelda: Wind Waker HD, Legend of Zelda: Twilight Princess HD, Legend of Zelda: Breath of the Wild

(Switch) Rayman Legends, Crash Bandicoot N-Sane Trilogy, Legend of Zelda: Breath of the Wild

(NDS)-  Chrono Trigger, Rhythm Thief, Pokemon Super Mystery Dungeon, Pokemon Conquest, Pokemon Soul Silver, Pokemon Platinum, Pokemon Black, Pokemon White 2

(3DS)-  Pokemon Omega Ruby, Pokemon X, **Pokemon Moon**, Pokemon Ultra Sun, Legend of Zelda: Ocarina of Time 3D, Legend of Zelda: Majora's Mask 3D, Legend of Zelda: Link Between Worlds

(Virtual) **Pokemon Blue, Pokemon Yellow**, Pokemon Gold, Earth Bound, Legend of Zelda: Link to the Past, **Super Mario 3, Sonic the Hedgehog**, Sonic the Hedgehog 2, Dr. Mario

(PC)-   Bendy and the Ink Machine, Bejeweled 3, **Bioshock, Bioshock 2**, Bioshock Infinite, Bioshock Remastered, Bioshock 2 Remastered, Breath of Death VII, Brothers: Tale of Two Sons, Crypt of the Necro Dancer, Cthulu Saves the World, Elderscrolls III: Morrowind, Elderscrolls V: Skyrim, Fallout, *Fallout 2*, Fallout 3, Fallout New Vegas, Fallout 4, *Fallout Tactics*, **Fire Watch**, Final Fantasy VII, Final Fantasy VIII, Final Fantasy X HD, Final Fantasy X-2 HD, Jet Set Radio, Learn Japanese to Survive, Melody's Escape, Psychonauts, **Portal,** Portal Stories Mel, One Finger Death Punch, Plants Vs. Zombies, Turbo Pug, **The Stanley Parable**, Undertale

&amp;#x200B;

# Multi Player Games

(360)-  **Borderlands**, Burnout Paradise, Epic Mickey 2, ***Orange Box***, **Portal 2**

(XBONE) A*ssault Andoids: Cactus*, Borderlands Handsome Jack Collection, Death Squared, Diablo III, Elderscrolls Online, *Fallout 76*, *Forza 5, For Honor*, Rockband 4 Rivals, Sea of Thieves

(Switch) **Super Mario Oddesey**, Donkey Kong Country: Tropical Freeze, *Let's Go Pikachu!*

(PC)-   Battle Block Theater, Borderlands 2, **Portal 2,** Shroud of the Avatar, World of Warcraft, Soul Worker

&amp;#x200B;",GirlGamers
DMing a one shot for an all male group that has been p sexist at times. Want to use their gender bias against them in my campaign and need help with ideas....,"So I'm in a small d&amp;d group thats made up of 4 dudes, and me the only girl. We are taking a break from our main campaign and all the players are taking turns DMing one shots.3 of the 4 dudes have consistently exhibited some uncool behavior.For example- in our group text I can ask a question 2 or three different times and not get an answer even though they are currently actively texting each other at the time. I have to ask the 4th dude in the group (my boyfriend) to go repeat my question in the chat for me, and he does, and they all immediately answer him.

My character is a female half moon elf  In fiction, she is very commonly mistaken for a Drow. One of the guys characters is an ex-high elf naval officer whos backstory is made up of things like gnome and halfling genocides, ""colonizing"", and ""cleansing"" etc... and his character likes to make reference to the good ol days at sea when they had ""all the drow they could rape"".

Things like that....

Its my turn to DM, and for my one shot I'm creating like a fantasy escape room kinda thing, but like... if Jigsaw was the main investor. So its full of logic puzzles, riddles, and most importantly morality puzzles. And if/when they screw up theres combat as well.

I realllllly wanna incorporate some stuff that will use their sexism against them. But, I'm having trouble coming up with exactly how.The only feminist kinda riddle I know is the ""the surgeon is a woman/his mother"" one, but I think basically everybody knows that at this point and it wouldn't work. I've thought about a puzzle of some kind where they have to match certain items to certain statues and having stereotypical woman items like a broom and baby stuff but have that not actually go along with the female statue and somehow punish them for it but again, I feel like that would be the kind of thing they'd look at and go ""oh well its too obvious which its supposed to be"" and then not fall for my trap.I think I've just been thinking about it too much and I need fresh eyes.

  
EDIT: For what its worth, I live in the bible belt. It doesn't excuse their behavior, but 99.999999% of dudes around here are SEVERELY under-educated about gender relations, and I don't believe these guys to be intentionally malicious, I believe they are simply ignorant.  
  I don't intend for any of this to really take root in them, I just wanna incorporate this kind of thing because if I figure out a good way to do it, then I know they'll fail that challenge because this is obviously a blind spot for them. This campaign is designed as a facility that tests and punishes adventurers for their hubris, so ALL of the challenges are designed to focus on each of their weak spots, I just wanted to think of one or two elements that could play off of this particular weakness. ",GirlGamers
Guys think I'm a kid when they hear my voice.,"It's very frustrating! I use looking for group on xbox and a lot of people use the tag #no squeakers and then I'll get invited, say ""hi"", and get kicked from the party because they think I'm a kid.      
I'M 23!!!!!!!!     
This doesn't happen all the time but still....give me a chance before booting me.",GirlGamers
Who's ready for this beauty?,,GirlGamers
CD Projekt/GOG being stupid and transphobic again; seriously over their shit,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - October 24, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
"Play Fallout 76 BETA last night. What a beautiful game! It felt oddly familiar, yet very different. Far more in-depth focus on survival and crafting. I like it! What do you think?",,GirlGamers
The Mane Quest is a website dedicated to horses in video games and video games about horses. I'm launching it today and would love to hear your opinions and feedback!,,GirlGamers
The new Witcher game has a female protagonist!,,GirlGamers
Life is Strange’s comic sequel: plot details &amp; cover variants revealed,,GirlGamers
What Part or Level of a Game Has Driven you to Damn Near Break Something or Pull Your Hair Out?,"The first thing that comes to mind for me personally is Grand Theft Auto and those cursed RC missions or ""all you had to do was follow the damn train CJ"". I remember how I played GTA V afraid that they would sneak some bs in there like that. But this post was really brought on by AC: Odyssey. 

There are these hunting missions you have to do and all of these animals are rather powerful. One of them involves this boar. This fucking boar ruined my entire night that I was playing. once I beat it, I just went to bed pissed off and as I tried to sleep, I would replay the infuriating experience in my mind, I would get even more pissed off. That may be the first time I have ever went to bed angry, and I'm an avid sports fan (tbh they just make me sad and regret my life decisions). In fact, still thinking about it still pisses me off and I beat it about a week ago.

Anyway, I was just curious if any of you had experiences like that. ",GirlGamers
Being nice turns into an obligation.,"This is a bit of a long rant. I have been gaming with these 2 guys for a long time and we have played a variety of different games (for clarity, I’m going to refer to them as A and B). They are both laid back and fun to be with. I played a few more games with A so I guess I favor A more than B at times but B talks to me more outside of gaming.

We all play Destiny together and our clan does the raid on almost a weekly basis but there is no sign up sheet or anything. We’re all adults. Raid happens when we have enough people online to go. Me and A is online every day, but A gets home from work before I do so he usually gets to raid with the clan more often since I log on later. B hardly goes to raid with the clan for a few reasons: (1) he’s not on when the clan goes; or (2) he logs on after the raid started.

Recently, B has texted me almost every day to tell me that he is available to raid when I have absolutely no control on who gets to go on the raid. Sometimes I do not make it because I log after it has started. I am not mama bear that ensure B gets a spot in the raid. I mean if I’m going and we’re missing one more person, I would check to see if B is available because I want to be nice and not because it is an obligation. I keep telling B that I have no say over who gets to go but his response is essentially to tell me to hold a spot open for him.

Second, B has been trying to upgrade a weapon but the quest is only available during the weekend. There are 2 parts to gain percentage towards the upgrade: (1) the first method is to jump through a puzzle and collect chests, and (2) kill 3 bosses at the end. Each method will grant a percentage per week. When I needed to upgrade the weapon, I would collect the chest on my own because you don’t need other people to do it with you, and if none of my friends are available to help me kill the bosses for the second part, at least I still have some percentage towards completion.

Again, me and A are online most weekends, A has helped me killed the bosses every weekend and I got my weapons upgraded while B does not log on at all. I will never ask A to come with me to collect chests because that is a waste of his time. Yesterday, while in a group chat with other clan mates, B makes a comment that insinuates it was essentially my and A’s fault for him not being able to upgrade his weapon. When he did come online on Sunday, the 3 of us spent the entire day getting a weapon that we all wanted but apparently it was still our fault for not wanting to help him upgrade his weapon.

To me, it sounds like he's just whining for the sake of whining. I need a neutral party to tell me that either I'm nuts or B is being a big baby about it all.",GirlGamers
Recommendations please! Ps4 games that are not hyper-violent and have little to no fan service?,"Hello all,

I'm hoping that you all could point me in the direction of some good games for Ps4 that are not hyper-violent and have very little or no fan service. Light or cartoon violence is okay, I'm just don't like games with lots of realistic killing of other humans (Call of Duty, Red Dead Redemption, Fallout etc.) I'd prefer games with no fan service as it annoys me and I don't want to be wondering why the female protagonist is in her underwear the whole game.

Any suggestions for me? Games I have enjoyed recently...

Horizon Zero Dawn
Ratchet and Clank
Child of Light

Thanks!",GirlGamers
My first ever completed cosplay back in 2017: Reaper from OW. My straps were sticking out from the cloak but it was the best experience I’ve ever had!,,GirlGamers
Does anyone have any suggestions of fun ways to get your girlfriend more interested in gaming?,"Hey gals! So I recently started seeing this amazing girl and one of the things we really connected on was our love of Pokémon! We both grew up playing it, but that’s pretty much where her gaming experience stops (she’s played a couple of other game boy games, and she does also love Life is Strange). I would love to introduce her to more gaming, since it’s my biggest hobby and I’ve always wanted to be able to game wit my partner. 
It would be super nice to hear all of your thoughts and suggestions! ",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - October 23, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
Let the Kassandra Cosplay Season Begins! I can hardly await to see what the community will be come up with,,GirlGamers
That post about Kassandra in Assassin’s Creed reminded me of the physique of Vanasha and Aloy in Horizon: Zero Dawn,,GirlGamers
Anyone else unsubbed from r/gaming because of the sexism?,"Cosplays of women are always filled with thirsty gross comments and innuendos, the gatekeeping, and the ever so popular “women don’t exist” joke gets extremely tiresome. Like yeah I get it’s a joke, but it gets old. I’m just trying to say “hey I’m a girl and I like this too” or “as a woman I disagree with this” and it’s automatically met with “hurt durr women don’t exist.” Not to mention the shameless racism. There are other examples too that I’ll add later when I remember but I’m just trying to enjoy some good content ffs",GirlGamers
/r/GirlGamers Review - Assassin's Creed: Odyssey,,GirlGamers
Anyone Getting Red Dead Redemption 2?,"I play on ps4, and I'm looking to make friend who wanna talk about the game or play online when it comes out.",GirlGamers
(RANT) I’m bad at games and people I play with make me feel worse.,"I have anxiety and depression. My whole life. I could never find a hobby I really enjoyed. I played video games with my brothers growing up and stopped when they moved out of the house. Well in high school not sure why I just started playing again and more online games with people and it made me happy. It helped me disconnect from the real world and I forget about my problems. Well recently (the past few months) more and more people like to point out how bad I am at the games I love. Games I’ve put hundreds and hundreds of hours into. And it makes me feel like garbage. I stopped playing my favorite game because how much it bothered me. Tonight some random dude My best friend plays with messaged me and told me the things me friend was saying about me. It really fucking hurt. I don’t even want to play with them anymore. Why do people feel the need to do this. My one thing I’ve found to make me happy. And people like to just fucking stomp on it. 

Rant over. I’m angry and on my period. Probably doesn’t help. 

EDIT: thank you everyone for your very kind words and PMs. Makes me feel less shitty. They really mean a lot. Thank you. ",GirlGamers
DOTA 2 pins (freebies),,GirlGamers
What's your favorite gaming memories?,"Just got off playing a few hours of Mankind Divided (very enjoyable, have been waiting a few years to play it), and I was thinking of other games I've had good, fond recollections of. Here's a list:

-

**Skyrim:** Once I was at Dragontooth Crater, had just started playing Skyrim and while I was expecting to fight a dragon, I did not expect *another one* to randomly show up. I retreated into the watchtower and fired arrows at them until they died. I felt incredibly outmatched, but the victory felt soooooo good. Some other fond memories include defeating Karstaag on Legendary (the sneaky, stabby way) and travelling through Hermaeus Mora's realm.

-

**Mass Effect 2:** My favorite Mass Effect game. First time I played on Insanity, there's this midway stage where you head to a colony to stop the Collectors and face a group of husks plus two Reaper constructs that fired biotic shockwaves at you. I had only my trusty SMG and biotic warp (as an aside, the warp sound effect is soooooo satisfying to listen to). So I ended up running in a circle the entire afternoon in a series of attempts, killing off the husks, then the constructs, never stopping except to shoot. It was *very tiring*, and I think after I was done with that stage I called it quits for the day. The next time I did it, I had the DLC black hole gun... suffice to say it was a lot easier this time.

-

**Guild Wars 2:** I've since stopped playing this (due to various reasons, both personal and Anet-related), but I recall my first raid kill very fondly. It was the first week, and I was trying very, very hard to get my first kill -- I was dumb enough to be emotionally upset about not being able to succeed, and I think that colored how sweet my eventual victory was. I couldn't do it with my friends, so I ended up going for a PUG group and we got the Vale Guardian just before we called it quits for the night.

-

**Shadowrun: Hong Kong:** Being Chinese, it was amusing to see bits and bobs of Cantonese here and there, and the post-campaign content even has stuff closer to home (I am Malaysian). But what made it memorable was that during my second playthrough, I went with a melee elf character, who was 'augmented' Deus-Ex style, with limbs tipped with razor claws. I would often flush out enemies behind cover, rip and tear at them before letting my ranged teammates shoot them to pieces -- if they weren't already diced up. Melee combat was kinda meh in Dragonfall, so this was very welcome.

-

**Dead Space:** The entire game was a memorable experience, but what I remember most fondly is mowing down swarms of necromorphs with a pulse rifle and feeling the adrenaline. Dead Space 2's opening scene is great too!


",GirlGamers
Am I the only one who hates doing Hard dungeons?”,"I’ve had a really fun time playing Maplestory 2 over the past week however once you hit 60 its all about grinding for gear right? This is where my problem comes in, I don’t really have much experience playing mmo’s like this, my only other mmo was TERA and even then I didn’t do HARD dungeons. I kind of focused more on PVPing . On top of that HM dungeons always have me feeling extremely anxious and self-conscious. I feel that I am a burden to other people because I don’t know how to run. I feel like a dead weight. Yesterday my bf and I tried running the Fire Dragon dungeon with 2 people who I found on world chat. I let them know that I was a beginner and that this would be the first time I would be running this dungeon. I was really sad because I kept dying to various mechanics ect. It ended up with them having to carry us through because we couldn’t revive anymore. After this run, I wasn’t really feeling too good about the whole experience. We were 4 dps and it was really hard for me to keep up, I feel like I’m not good at these types of games and it made me feel like maybe I should quit. Even though I felt this way I ran it a second time because I didn’t want my bf to miss out on the experience since the other two people were offering to run it again. Long story short , the second time didn’t go well either, the two guys dc’d out. I asked some questions about why buffs wouldn’t go away etc and one of them told me this was an easy dungeon and if I was dying like this that I probably wouldn’t make it in the long run basically. It really caught me off guard and I got off immediately and felt really sad about the whole thing. Anyone else have similar experiences? ",GirlGamers
Youtube/Twitch Recommendations?,"(If there already exist a thread like this, I'm so sorry. I didn't see anything when posting this.)

So, I'm looking to expand the list of people I follow on both Youtube and Twitch and thought I would turn to one of my favorite gaming subs for recommendations. I'm not exclusively looking for girlgamers but more about people that keep the dude:isms to a minimum.

(Also, it's perfectly fine if it's people that put up no comments-videos where they just post play throughs games.)",GirlGamers
What game got you into gaming as a permanent hobby?,"Although I grew up gaming, I didn't think about it as a serious hobby until I was in my early teens when I got a PS2. I never had the original PS so I missed out Final Fantasy VII. I found FFX used for about £10 and was completely gobsmacked by the graphics and a **story**.

It was amazing to see a fantasy world, my favourite book genre, romance, cool weapons, magic, summoned beasts and people saving the world. Games suddenly opened up into a whole new world of possibility.

I was the right age to be earning pocket money for jobs around the house and it was a great time for used games and rpgs.

What got you hooked?",GirlGamers
"While this isn't strictly gaming related, Carrie Fisher was definitely an iconic person and hero for nerd girls everywhere. Happy birthday Carrie, miss you so much 💖",,GirlGamers
Bought my first set of D&amp;D dice,,GirlGamers
I dreamed City of Heroes came back,"I was so excited. I woke up while trying to log in. There's nothing worse than waking up from a nostalgic dream, for a moment you were in a better timeline and then slowly you realize it wasn't real

Ever had game you want to play but can't anymore? ",GirlGamers
Gaming monitor recommendations?,I am looking to buy a 4K gaming monitor to use with my Xbox one X. I have never been a PC gamer so not sure where to start? ,GirlGamers
It's Dice Set time! These are my pretties with their dice box,,GirlGamers
I used to DM for my girlfriend and a guy we know. You're all making me want to pick up the habit again.,,GirlGamers
"I made this for one of my Overwatch friends,",,GirlGamers
"Don't think I ever posted this here, my new Morrigan Aensland figure. I know this character is super hypersexualized and everything but she's always secretly been one of my favorites.",,GirlGamers
The ultimate co-op campaign.,,GirlGamers
"Guys, I don't need your help",Does anyone else get guys messaging them offering to help you even though you're not obviously struggling or asking for help? Some guy on Warframe started telling me my build was wrong WHILE I WAS CHANGING IT. I got to level 14 from 0 in 64 days. I'm good. ,GirlGamers
What is your favorite coop game?,What are your favorites where it's you and your partner (bestie) against the world?,GirlGamers
Any suggestions for skill building/crafting games?,"Hey girls! First time posting here. I was wondering if anyone has any suggestions for me. I really enjoy rpg games/open world games with skill building and crafting elements (e.g. cooking, potion making). For example, I really enjoyed runescape when I was younger as there was so many quests and skills to level up. I've been quite out of gaming for abit so alot of the games I have played are a little old now.

I currently own a laptop, ps4, 3ds and switch so Im open to anything on those platforms.

Heres a list of games I've already played for reference, I'm looking for anything similar:

* Runescape
* Fantasy life (would LOVE something like this)
* Stardew Valley
* Harvest moon
* Mabinogi/Maplestory
* The Atelier games",GirlGamers
He doesn’t want me to play assassins creed origins,,GirlGamers
My cat doesn't like me playing Skyrim either.,,GirlGamers
My battlestation and work station,,GirlGamers
We killed it in Smash at my locals!,"The Smash community as a whole is very  heavily male, but I've been seeing a lot more girls aside from myself show up at local tournaments. Yesterday, out of the top 4, 3 were girls! Not me, I suck at Smash, but it was cool to see all of these girls do so well and really impress the community. (Two were experienced in Smash, just new to physically going to tournaments, and one was from other fighting games and adjusted well.) One of the girls even won! It's just my local game store and all but it's cool to me :) ",GirlGamers
my battlestation &amp; personal space ♥,,GirlGamers
Rant: Jaina's Rags and Anduin's Armor - cosplay,"[Jaina's rags and Anduin's ""armor""](https://voodoomamajujurose.tumblr.com/post/179213731173/so-the-girls-get-this-pathetic-strip-of-cloth)

Just a momentary rant on the unfairness of cool attire from the companies who make fan items.  I believe I am qualified to make this assessment as I am a maker of cosplay and historical costumes.  I am also a buyer of cool stuff.

In this case they made a very nice, quality hoodie for Anduin and Sylvannas with nice smooth seams and fine detailing.

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/khz15fzxv5t11.jpg

&amp;#x200B;

And for Jaina Proudmoore, they made a shrug.

If you sew, this is basically a wide strip of cloth with armholes cut in it or flapped over, sewn at the sides, and sleeves sewn in.

You can see from the picture the hem is badly done, with lumps and bumps from cheap sewing.  The trim is cheap ribbon.  And it isn't really shaped well if you look at the model in it.    The least cheap thing on is the tiny badge.

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/1ohiq5r9w5t11.png

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Like, you could've made a nice hoodie based off of her armor?

Jaina, you deserve better.

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/47zff9nhv5t11.jpg",GirlGamers
"Pink October is here, and it’s bringing people closer together",,GirlGamers
"‘Geek Girl’ gamers are more likely to study science and technology degrees - Girls who play video games are three times more likely to choose physical science, technology, engineering or maths (PSTEM) degrees compared to their non-gaming counterparts, according to new research.",,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - October 19, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
So how's the romance in Assassin's Creed Odyssey?,"(I [posted this on /r/Games yesterday](https://www.reddit.com/r/Games/comments/9p7mh1/so_hows_the_romance_in_assassins_creed_odyssey/) and got quite a few answers despite downvotes. I'm curious about this subreddit's opinion though, since /r/Games tends to be an awfully cynical place most of the time)

**For context**: The last AC game I played through was Black Flag. Was a big fan of the series up and including that one, but kind of lost interest and never got past the first hour or two of Unity and haven't tried one since. 

I heard a lot of good and bad about AC:Odyssey everywhere, but I wanted to ask about the aspect that really got me interested in the game when they first announced it: romance. 
For a while, I saw tons of people say Ubisoft was kind of picking off what Bioware isn't doing anymore (but then, I've never actually played a bioware game). And I saw [this article](https://www.dailystar.co.uk/tech/gaming/727735/Assassin-s-Creed-Odyssey-Bi-Visibility-and-a-very-different-kind-of-Power-Fantasy) and thought that sounded super cool too. 

Call me shallow, but I figured playing a decent game where I can play as a hot bi protagonist had to be cool and interesting, I'm a sucker for romance in games in general. 

However, since the game's release, I've heard relatively little about how it's actually implemented. I saw someone on /r/Gaymers call the romance scenes ""disappointing"" and I saw someone else say that it's all ""fade to black."" The latter can mean a lot of things though: I'm not really looking for awkwardly animated banging as much as I'm interested in well-written character attraction and relationships. Some sensuality is a bonus, but I'm not looking for porn here. 

So with that in mind:  
**Can anyone tell me a bit more about how well the romance is implemented in Odyssey**, preferably without too many spoilers?   

What's there to like or not like?  
 How important/significant is romance within the whole story and game?   
Do you get custom cutscenes for characters you try to hook up with or is it just select dialogue option, fade to black and then leave their house the next morning?  ",GirlGamers
So I was at the flea market a few weeks ago and there were so many of us!,"Basically it was like this: I had just bought me some games, to my left there was another woman browsing through the games left at the stand, at the stand next to this one was a young woman chatting with the guy behind it about their favourite Assassin's Creed games, and to my right there was an older woman buying a few games as well. The Guy behind this stand wished her fun with her purchase, but then said something along the line of: ""But then I guess those are for your son"", and the older woman just answered: ""Actually, they're for my daughter."" I could not help but smile. It's a bit sad that with all this exposure to women clearly interested in games the guy still assumed that she was buying them for a son, but at the same time I felt so not alone and like screaming into his face that we exist, but the world itself already just did that in a very calm manor.",GirlGamers
Is anyone else sick and tired of being the only girl gamer in a party full of guys because you’re the only one being hit on?,"I am so sick of being virtually hit on or talked down to while I’m in an Xbox party full of dudes. I genuinely want to relax and enjoy my game whilst working as a team with others. It’s gotten to the point where I dread accepting party invites. 

It doesn’t stop at Xbox parties. Last time I beat someone on Siege, they messaged me that since I’m a woman they will Donald Trump me and grab me by the p**** because no once cares about women. 

🙄🙄🙄🙄🙄🙄🙄🙄🙄 ",GirlGamers
Does anyone else absolutely love that Kassandra has actual muscle definition?,,GirlGamers
New Farming Sim 19 Trailer about Tending to Animals,,GirlGamers
Good third-person games with playable female characters,"I’ve been in a gaming rut lately. I’ve been playing nothing but The Sims 4 and Skyrim for the past two years, because every game nowadays seems to be first person (which I absolutely loathe) or force you into picking one or more of their male protagonists or if they do offer non-male (and God forbid non-white options) it’s a horribly rendered MMORPG with graphics from 2007.

So, I recently discovered the latest AC game gives you a female option (bought it immediately after seeing that here) and now I’m wondering if there are other games I missed out on or that y’all would recommend?

I like third-person, action/adventure, character creation, RPGs, open worlds and/or just something that allows me to be a kickass woman!

EDIT: Should probably include what I’ve played in the current gen, huh? Lol Tomb Raider games, Fallout 4, Horizon Zero Dawn, Skyrim, Warframe, Dragon Age Inquisition (is there a new one?),  ES Online. Not a fan of fighting games enough to buy, but I’ve played Injustuce, MKX, Naruto and DNZ fighting games.",GirlGamers
"Gee, thanks.",,GirlGamers
Made myself a cozy office/guest room,,GirlGamers
Are your Male friends like these?,"I have noticed even when I play with groups where they have a friend playing with them that is a girl, there are usually a lot of sexual comments made. In most cases the girls laugh them off and banter with their friends but generally don't make any sexual comments relating to the male friends.   


Just wondering how many of you have experienced this. I am a guy and I always find that odd, the fact that even when playing with friends these women are essentially harassed.

&amp;#x200B;",GirlGamers
We need your stories for the topic 'Being a Good Ally'!,"Hi folks,

So as you may have seen, /r/GirlGamers will be attending Twitchcon with AnyKey to be in the Twitch Unity Lounge. Part of our time at the Lounge will involve discussions and presentations on different topics.

AnyKey proposed the idea of the topic 'Being a Good Ally' and it was approved! So we'd like to get some stories from our users about times they had a friend/stranger be an ally to them in the gaming world, or things/traits/actions that they think make a good ally. Below is the email with more information:

------------

*The Twitch Unity Lounge will be at TwitchCon again this year and they are running some of their own programming about diversity and inclusion topics in the space.* 

*I suggested several topics that I thought would be cool to cover, including Being A Good Ally, which is something I've wanted to see discussed more. They agreed!*

*Here is how you can help:*

**Can you share a story with me about at time when someone was a good ally to you and supported you, as a marginalized person in video gaming?**

**Stories can be long or short!**

*Being a good ally can take many forms, so this is pretty open! It could be about someone who publicly called out a harasser and helped to turn around a negative community situation (or helped you feel better about it). Or about someone who has provided steady support/encouragement/mentorship over a period of time. Or about a time when someone said something that you greatly appreciated and made you feel seen/heard/supported, even indirectly. Or anything else!*

*One of the goals of this is to give other potential allies examples of things that have been genuinely supportive in the past. We frequently hear the question: what can I do to be more supportive or inclusive? Ideally, this session will start to provide some actionable ideas.*

*Feel free to name names if you want to. I would love to give recognition to those who are legit supporters, but I will be sure to ask them first if I want to mention their name specifically during the session.*

------------

**If you have a story, please share it by the end of the day on Friday (PST), or Monday at the latest!**

If you feel uncomfortable posting it publicly, you can also PM it to me or send it via modmail :)

Thanks &lt;3 &lt;3",GirlGamers
The way Issun acts around Rao in Okami bothers me,"Was tempted to post this in this Okami sub but thought it'd be better to put it here. I'm not the type to get easily offended but for fuck's sakes, could Issun please just shut the hell up?

So Rao is a minor female character in Okami with large boobs that hang out that also have *cough* jiggle physics (google a pic of her if you're curious). All the other female characters in the game aren't sexualized, but she's supposed to be really beautiful.

When I first saw what Rao looked like I was like, ""oh god"" at first but quickly decided to let it go. But Issun, who is one of the two main characters and ""good guys"" decided to keep mentioning her boobs non-stop. He oftens greets her with, ""oh hey it's that busty babe!"" Once even says, ""I couldn't say no to those two"" and ""haha, it's not like I said yes just because of your melons."" Rao acts like she doesn't know what the heck he's talking about when he says all this.

But yeah it just bothered me and made me uncomfortable. Issun says a lot of things to the other female characters but never anything like this (though his other comments did slightly bother me, usually calling a random girl babe or cutie-pie). The other main character Amaterasu, a wolf, whom the player can't understand but Issun can, never gets on him about it (which would've softened the blow for me). In fact I think there's a scene where even Amaterasu is staring at her breasts (I might be overthinking it but it honestly wouldn't surprise me. I'm kind of confused about Amaterasu's gender. I think they're a female goddess inhabiting the body of a male wolf).

At first Issun was my favorite character because he was gutsy and kind of care-free but once he started talking about the female characters in this regard I was like, ""annoying-ass pervert.""

Pretty sure they wouldn't put a girl character in there constantly talking about some guy's giant dick.

Oh and get this, since Issun is (if I understand it correctly) literally a bug, his obsessions all the more confusing.",GirlGamers
"Fiancée just got a new job and will be making a lot money, so we decided to get a new console.","Would you guys suggest a Xbox one or PS4? We know it's our decision, but we can't decide and just wanna hear what people say.",GirlGamers
Video games for competing against my husband...?,"I need your help! I want to have a video game date night competition with my husband, but I'm not sure what games would be good for this.   
I think a racing game is the obvious option (not normally our thing, but might work), but we are more FPS-type people. We are also Xbox and PC people. I want to play AGAINST him, and maybe shoot him a few times. ;)  

Any ideas for what we could play?

I'll also need to come up with the stakes for this competition.   
Should be fun!",GirlGamers
My Gaming Paradise!,,GirlGamers
Any advice for a partner setup in an apartment?,"My partner and I are moving from our current 850 square foot apartment to an upgraded 1150 square foot apartment. Which is great!! We're super excited.

&amp;#x200B;

However, we are at a loss at how to organize our desk space. He has a gaming setup and we're in the process of buidling a PC for myself (currently I have an iMac as I'm a photographer but I miss PC gaming as well). Right now we have two separate Ikea desks. One in our bedroom and one in our living room. It's taking up a ton of space.

&amp;#x200B;

Does anyone have any suggestions for maybe one long desk that's a decent width as well or want to share their setup if it's a two person deal? We're not sure really how else to make it work and we don't want desks taking up a huge space in the apartment when we'll still have a dining table for board games and things like that.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks in advance!",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - October 17, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
Matchy matchy,,GirlGamers
can someone explain what happened to talim's pants between SC2 and 6? is it just the same pair in desperate need of replacement?,,GirlGamers
Best Mod Manager?,"So I finally got my computer set up after three or four months. I went to update my games, mods and Nexus Mod Manager and as it turns out, they had dropped NMM and started using Vortex (has been in alpha for a while). 

I have spent my entire day trying to get Vortex figured out. I finally got everything fixed, but I cant do anything about the load order without creating rules for Every. Single. Mod. 

Does anyone have any helpful advice or tips on how to make this easier? Or simply a better mod manager?",GirlGamers
"Getting my son started early, while watching Daddy play.",,GirlGamers
Blizzcon introducing Inclusion Nexus,"I thought this is pretty cool:

r/[https://www.polygon.com/2018/10/3/17929446/blizzcon-2018-inclusion-nexus-diversity-speakers](https://www.polygon.com/2018/10/3/17929446/blizzcon-2018-inclusion-nexus-diversity-speakers)

They just released the floor map and they have an entire wing dedicated to this and speakers - makes me want buy the virtual ticket just to watch.

(and no this is not a plug for Blizzard or wow - its just cool since they've been adding LGTBQ characters to Wow and Overwatch over the last two expansions and be willing to acknowledge it with speakers and events)",GirlGamers
We Know (x-posted from RedditLaqueristas),,GirlGamers
My first gaming mouse is finally going out. I need help picking another but I want to try more buttons and I don’t know what I’m doing. Help.,,GirlGamers
What wallpaper are you currently using?,I look for some inspiration for my background and figured this place is as good as any to ask. ,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - October 16, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
Best birthday ever!,,GirlGamers
We might just get some representation in Congress,,GirlGamers
Calico - Magical Girls Running Cat Cafés (Kickstarter Campaign),,GirlGamers
Rockstar Games Talks About Criticism Regarding Women In Its Games,,GirlGamers
Online game suggestions for 2 people?,"Hello! Does anyone have any suggestions for games which feature an online co op mode/the ability to play with a friend? I wanna have something to play with my friend, but not something like Overwatch which has a team of 6 which would then be us and 4 other random people. Are there games you’ve enjoyed which feature online play for 2?",GirlGamers
"PSA to PS4 ladies, lock down your messages and friend requests! - xpost /r/PS4",,GirlGamers
My simple streaming set up 🦊💕,,GirlGamers
Anyone from Portland Oregon? I'm starting a girl gamer meetup at the local esports bar!,Hit me up if you're interested! During out meetup we will also likely do a tap takeover with a local female run brewery :) ,GirlGamers
Looking for a mmorpg without hypersexualized female characters,"Hi y'all 

I posted about my frustration with female characters being mostly eye candy for a male audience to play with on r/trollxchromosomes and someone recommended asking for suggestions here. I'm looking for some sort of a preferably fantasy setting, with good active tanking mechanics but where female characters aren't sexualized conventionally attractive women in metal bikinis or some fantasy race that just happens to look like a 12yo girl, sexualized as well because of course. The most recommended games I had were Elder Scrolls Online and ff14 but those didn't really click for me. I'm wondering if you had some other recommendations (focus being on the tanking mechanics).

Thanks :D",GirlGamers
Looking for a new (inexpensive) headset to start streaming with!,"Hey ladies and gentlefolk!

I’m looking at getting into streaming games on YouTube and the like but the headset I already have doesn’t have a working microphone. I’m looking for any recommendations for a replacement and was hoping some of y’all could help me out.

I’m really hoping to find something that’s inexpensive (less than $50 preferably but I’m flexible) but that still has decent quality and can be used for at least PC but wouldn’t mind Xbox 360 compatibility as well.

Thanks!",GirlGamers
My girlfriend spent most of her day off grinding an exotic quest for me :),,GirlGamers
Anyone playing the new Blops 4?,I'm playing on ps4 in the UK. Just curious if anyone is playing much of it?,GirlGamers
Want to start playing rpgs,"I want to start playing rpgs but dont know which one to choose.I am looking for:-Magic ie faires etc-open world- missions

Anyone have any suggestions?",GirlGamers
The first game to actually give a damn about natural black hair,,GirlGamers
What’s it like being in an all girls clan/guild/club on a game?,Me and my friend were talking about the new Fallout 76 game coming out and she brought starting an all girls group on 76. I’ve never been in one before and am genuinely curious on what it’s like??? Anyone have experience or stories? ,GirlGamers
"Every time im playing, he’s always by my side making sure I get enough cuddles",,GirlGamers
Are You Attending Twitchcon This Year? Let Us Know!,"Hi ladies,

This year /r/GirlGamers is attending **Twitchcon** with AnyKey to be represented in the [TwitchUnity Lounge](https://twitchcon.com/blog/2018/09/13/swing-by-the-twitchunity-lounge-at-twitchcon/)! We are over the moon excited to come out to San Jose and see what's happening :D

On that note, **we'd like to get an idea of how many of you will be attending Twitchcon!** If enough people are attending, we may be able to use the Lounge to host a GirlGamers meetup.

No matter what, if you are attending come down and see us at the table! We'll be there Saturday/Sunday :)",GirlGamers
Shout-Out to Warhammer Total War Series,"They have these female warriors known as ""[witch elves](https://steamcdn-a.akamaihd.net/steamcommunity/public/images/clans/8548992/0209ebc77eaa4c7fa036cfff9f92dc0fe7b4167b.png)"" and [sisters of slaughter](https://pre00.deviantart.net/58d3/th/pre/f/2018/186/3/c/total_war__warhammer_2___sisters_of_slaughter_by_telthona-dcgc3nm.png), which in design look very stereotypical and badly designed in terms of female armor.  
  
Now, you may be wondering why I'm praising this game then, on this sub. This is because of 3 reasons.  
  
1. There are males in the game that are also unclothed/sexualised (although less)  
  
2. NOT HIGH TIER ARMOR: These women are obviously wearing skimpy outfits, there's no disputing that, but they also have some of the lowest armor stat values (practically 0), meaning this is accurately reflected in game mechanics, and that it isn't some typical fantasy cover nothing but defend everything thing. 
  
3. There are armored women who actually have a [high armor stat, with NO BOOBPLATE](https://vignette.wikia.nocookie.net/warhammerfb/images/a/a7/Total_War_Dreadlord_Render_2.jpg/revision/latest?cb=20180405211307)! 
  
In addition, the new characters coming out soon are strong women [that aren't needlessly sexualised.](https://i.ytimg.com/vi/takbPoBb_S0/maxresdefault.jpg)   
 
Oh, and the game is awesome. ",GirlGamers
International Day of the Girl Sale On Steam - Surely this will encourage helpful and insightful discussion... oh wait this is Steam,"Edit: https://imgur.com/a/vVKohk5

Didn't realize that posting direct links wasnt allowed. But here's a few choice images of several posts. Warning, your head may explode while reading some of this. 

Some choice quotes

&gt;I ask because this reaks of ideological corruption.

Yes because a sale along a specific theme is all about 'ideological corruption'

&gt;Also, one should not care about the physical traits of the character, but how well made he or she is. 

Yet you seem to care a lot that the sale is about female protagonists....

&gt;And a last caviate, authoritarian ideologies and religions can not make good art. 

Just.... what can you even say about this? 

The only surprising thing is it took as long as 150 posts to trigger Godwins Law.


In any case here's the actual page to the sale if you want to support 'ideological corruption' and the fact that such things cannot possibly 'make good art'. Even if its not art, I guess you can still send the devs a few bucks by buying a game. All this corruption is expensive!

https://store.steampowered.com/sale/dayofthegirl/",GirlGamers
"Chaosium Founder, Greg Stafford, RIP",,GirlGamers
"So I skip work because I'm mega-PMSing, FINALLY finish Portal 2 and...",,GirlGamers
Heheh. I had a giggle.,,GirlGamers
Username/gamer tag stories,"I want to hear some stories about how people came up with their usernames! 

Currently mine is xoedenmarie (pronounced x o eden marie) which I took from the good old days of screen names on AIM. However in game everyone tends to call me Zoeden, Zoey or they just don’t even know what to say! 

Probably going to be changing my name soon and would love to get some inspiration from your stories! ",GirlGamers
A female playthrough of AC: Syndicate with Evie? (and of other AC games),"I really don't like the gameplay of AC games (played the very first one and it was so repetitive, never bought another one), but I quite like to watch them being played! I've watched some playthroughs before, but not of Syndicate.

Now for some reason I get only one guy from search of YT for Syndicate and not only he doesn't play Evie much, but his commentary is really inane, and he rushes everywhere rather than play intelligently and stealthily. Now, I'd really prefer to watch a woman play this game, after all, there's an Evie option, and I don't want to miss out on it. Besides, I just generally prefer to watch women play.

Suggestions, please? I'm sure there are some women around who like AC and know someone who'd streamed it. And while I want to watch Syndicate in particular, your suggestions of other AC games recorded by women would be welcome, as well.",GirlGamers
"""Things I Learned from Mario's Butt"" - Laura Kate Dale is crowdfunding a book about butts in video games, with contributions from Jim Sterling, Zoe Quinn, Justin McElroy, Dodger and many more",,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - October 12, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
"Every penis in Assassin's Creed Odyssey, rated",,GirlGamers
I'm so happy Froskurinn is back on the desk at Worlds (League of Legends),"She offers really great insight and I'm so happy she's back on the desk.  I'm very excited that she's going to start working with EU because I actually watch EU LCS so I'll get to see her more regularly starting next season.  It's nice to have a girl around.  I love Sjokz and Ovilee of course but having a girl actually on the desk doing the technical talk is really cool.

Also as a WLW seeing representation for that is nice too 😊

In addition to that she always manages to look beautiful but also super unique, cool, and smooth as fuck.  One of the most exciting parts of Worlds for me is tuning in every night to see what kind of funky outfit she's wearing (and *slaying*) haha.  Girl's a fashion icon tbh.

Keep rocking /u/ThatChineseFanGirl 💖

(BTW I tried making a post about this in the main League sub earlier, that went over about as well as you'd expect, and then it got removed with absolutely no reason given despite not breaking any of the rules...god that place can be a cesspool sometimes, especially the second you mention you're a girl, yikes).",GirlGamers
Steam is having a sale on games with female protagonists,"[For International Girl's Day today.](https://store.steampowered.com/sale/dayofthegirl/) Gone Home, Tacoma, and Her Story are some of my absolute favorites.",GirlGamers
TFW You Go into a Different Sub and the Sexism Jumps Out,"Sometimes I think I spend too much time on this sub because I get used to how things are nice and calm here. There isn't raging against female characters or some ""feminist agenda"". Since as I have been playing AC:Odyssey lately (I am loving the game) I go to the sub and some of the bs there is astounding.

Granted, a good bit deal of them do give compliments to Kassandra, such as her voice actress and how she does has some build of a warrior. Then again, you have those praising the game for not making her a "" butch man-hating lesbian"" or how she isn't too masculine and so they can still drool over her. Or how she is treated as an equal in the game is a part of Ubisoft's pandering to feminists. 

I understand how incredibly sexist and racist Ancient Greece was and it would have been more historically accurate to portray that. But goodness gracious, this is not the first inaccurate thing to occur in Assassin's Creed. ",GirlGamers
Obscure Games,"So I generally like to play obscure games, or non AAA games, like Alice: Madness returns, song of the Deep, or N.E.R.O.
I was just wondering what Obscure games, if any, ya'll play. I find it interesting, the obscure ones are usually the best.",GirlGamers
[rant] respect not proportional to contributions and generally lonely,"I've been in the same core raiding group (WoW) for about a year and a half. I don't know why I feel the need to defend myself, but it's probably because I can't say anything to the people in my guild. I consistently parse high, am very competent with mechanics, contribute more-than-average to the guild bank, etc. I know my class, know my role. I listen and I'm a good friend to my guildies. I know my guild likes me, but they don't respect me. I can tell by the way I'm never promoted (my rank when our guild split/changed around a bit is on par with a person who has not raided in 3 weeks, low parsing people, and people I don't even know) and how our raid leader will refer to other healers as the main healer, when they parse lower than me and mess up frequently. 

Everyone else in my guild is a man (apart from two members wives, who do not raid). I don't face much blatant sexism and no one is unkind to me. Overall, I have very little to complain about except that it's super lonely.  A few weeks ago, my old guild split and it was essentially because two women independently caused problems. I feel like I'm on thin ice, like when I'm not there, people place bets on when I'll cause problems. Since then, I've said very little. Our old team had 3 women who raided plus me. Things felt a lot less lonely back then. I don't know, maybe I'm just experiencing that Legion nostalgia. ",GirlGamers
Toxicity in Gaming,"Just kinda wondering how y'all deal with toxic players, which are always men in my case, especially once they realise they have no chance with you sending them nudes etc.
Kinda makes me wanna stop playing online full stop",GirlGamers
"I found a ""What Would You Do"" episode about Girl Gamers, and it made my day!",,GirlGamers
Netflix's Witcher Series Has Cast 2 of Its Most Important Female Characters,,GirlGamers
I can't remember the last time I was excited to open an email! Anyone else get into project steam? How's it working out for you?,,GirlGamers
It's a Mom life 8) MonsterHunter,,GirlGamers
"[Request] Motion sickness while playing video games, looking for recommendations","I love video games, but I get really bad motion sickness with FPS, or any game where I control the camera. I loved Skyrim, but I could only play for 10 minutes before I felt like my head was going to implode.

So I'm thinking of buying an older gaming console -- possibly gamecube -- and I'm looking for recommendations on games with a fixed camera. (Any genre!) I'm not dedicated to a gamecube, but so far it seems to be a pretty good option",GirlGamers
Username help,"I'm trying to help my friend think of a Username D: 

&amp;#x200B;

She loves Violet Evergarden so having Violet in it would probably be amazing. If someone could help me think of ideas I would be very thankful c: ",GirlGamers
Black Ops4 the breakdown from my time playing the Beta!,"So if youre interested in the COD community then you know not much has changed sine MW2 (one of the best first person shooters ive played) Blops3 was a cool jump with all the new futuristic guns, but recycling old maps, and perks it gets pretty repetitive. With the BLOPS 4 Beta, so many new elements have been added and i thought id share some for anyone thinking about getting it. The Multi-player is like all in the past, but now you can heal after being shot, big game changer in my book, so now you cant just run around with a P90 collecting heads. Also theres a grappler gun to sneak up on someone, or retreat from being shot at. Sliding is also back, thank the lord because that was one of the reasons WW2 wasnt that good. You can also see enemy health so you can see how much damage you do. Of course they have new core characters with specialabilites, I didnt get to see scorestreaks but im sure theryre close to what theyve been in the past.

&amp;#x200B;

For the Battle Royale.

Im so excited to sum it up. By far the funnest game mode to me. The BR Map is HUGE. Bringing back some of the best maps like Shooting Range, Cargo, Trainstation, Nuketown. Over all the whole map looks great. Loot was a little ify, alot of attachments for guns (which is a big game changer) and shotgun ammo lol. That was just the beta of course so im sure theyve improved it. (Let me just say, one of the most solid BETAS ive EVER played!) Armor is also in the game now (3 levels) lvl. 3 is what you want for sure.(itll be the black armour, it protects you alot.) You literally have to empty a whole clip to take off the armor. Theres healing of course, Medkits are nice but Traumakits are the way to go, bumping you up to 200HP in seconds, so if youre in a fire fight, fall back and use it before reengaging and surely youll have the upper hand. Transportation is a big change as well, you now have Trucks, Helicopters, ATVS, and boats. Personally i think the boat is the fastest getaway to zone. Theyre perks now, most of them are pretty basic and dont add much to your GP but theyre a few i really enjoyed. Deadsilence is great, it mutes your footsteps bascially so sneaking in the final zone is easy P. Paranoia warns you once someone has scoped in on you. Now attempting to sum this up, many new things like drone cars, grapplers, Darts that let you see where people are on the map beside you, it seems theyve finnaly stepped it up and finally brought change to such a great series of games. Im really excited and i recommend it to any COD fan.

&amp;#x200B;

This is my first big post, hopefully i helped someone!:) Thanks for reading, and strike up a convo if this intrests you!",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - October 10, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
Just started playing my first video game (34yo),"I’ve never played computer or console video games. Behind Oregon Trail, an Egyptian civilization builder that I got for free from somewhere. Some of this is obviously due to the fact that Santa brought my brother a N64 and a Gameboy and then an XBox, but never even considered I’d be interested.

But I’m a huge women’s soccer fan and my roommate has a PS system so I finally bit the bullet and bought FIFA. I’ve spent the night playing through the training modules and I’m pretty hooked. ",GirlGamers
[RANT] When guys imitates my voice,"Just played a round of CSGO(ya I know) and a guy was just negative all the way, no callouts etc. And when I gave an callout he would just imitate my voice calling us trash etc when he is throwing xD ffs just want to win some games 
Sry just wanted to put it somewhere

Edit: When guys imitate my voice* xD oops ",GirlGamers
50+ wholesome and non-violent video games,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - October 09, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
We're gonna start reviewing games on our GirlGamers medium! What are some games/genres you'd like reviewed?,"Hey friend-os,

So myself and a few other mods are going to start reviewing games on our medium page for the subreddit! Of course, I'd like to try and review things that the members of the subreddit are interested in so I figured I'd put out a post.

What are some games you'd like to learn more about? Are there any genres that particularly interest you?

Side note, we love you all.

~Homer

EDIT: Whoaaaaaaah ya'll have some awesome ideas. We're looking to do 1-2 a month and see from there where we're at. Thank you so much for all your suggestions &lt;3 I'm so glad people are as excited about this concept as we are!",GirlGamers
How bad is it to play games at the local comic store?,"Obviously everywhere is different. But I've been in the mood to play DnD and my husband is out of town for a *while*. I also don't know anyone here. I've never  played games at a local shop before and my husband says I probably won't like the people(of course he says go ahead and try it if I want too). 

Anyways, what're your experiences?

Edit: I'm in San Diego atm ",GirlGamers
Survival games on Xbox One?,I've just switched to Xbox and I'm looking for a good survival experience. I love crafting and basebuilding. Any suggestions? :),GirlGamers
"""Good job BOYS"" in team games: please stop excluding women...","I'm getting really upset with all these guys who use the words ""boys"", ""dude"", ""man"" over and over again... I'm playing Overwatch on a regular basis, and even when I'm there in voice chat (and I sound like a woman), making calls like everyone else, guys are just rewarding ""boys"". At the end of the game, you can be sure someone will be saying ""gg boys"". And it might be a minor details, just the force of habit from those guys, but as a woman it gets extremely upsetting to hear that so much. I think I heard someone say ""gg boys... and lady"" ONCE. I mean, I don't mind the quite generic term ""guys"" (English isn't my mother tongue but I think it's gender neutral? Please correct me if I'm wrong), but there are a lot of ""boys"", which is definitely masculine.I wonder if I should call them out on it, just to let them know ""hey, please don't exclude women, gg everyone"". But given the number of people who are prompt to say ""just go back to your kitchen"", I think I'd rather not take the risk... So here I am, just venting. If you have a good idea on how to reply to those countless ""boys"", or if you think I should just ignore it, please let me know!  


  
EDIT: Thank you all for your comments, some great suggestions and friendly support here ♥  
It seems there's also a debate regarding the use of ""guys"", ""gals"", ""y'all"", ""dude"", with regional differences in the US. As a French person, it's interesting to learn about these :) I'd also like to point out that I'm playing on European servers, so I'm not sure ""dude"" or ""guys"" are so gender-neutral to Europeans, next to a New Yorker for instance. Who knows! Anyway please try to avoid definitely gendered words such as ""boys"", it might be a little thing, but it's a little change of habit which can help us feel included :3",GirlGamers
"After two months stuck at the kitchen table, I'm pretty proud of this new set-up :)",,GirlGamers
"How do you explain subtle sexism in video games to your male friends, boyfriends, family etc?","I’m having problems explaining to my boyfriend why I don’t like playing with him when he has his good friends in chat because of the 1-upping, the male egotism, etc other than giving specific examples  and I feel like they’re too close to home for him to realize he’s even doing it. I was hoping some of you all could help me put it into words based on your own experiences. ",GirlGamers
Looking for games with romance subplot,"There are a couple of posts like this already on this sub, but they were all a bit older, so I wanted to get some recommendations. 

I would love some recommendations for games that have good romance subplots in them. So far, I have done all of the Dragon Age games, SWTOR, and KOTOR 1. I am on my first playthrough of KOTOR2. I plan on playing the Mass Effect trilogy after I finish with KOTOR2.

Ideally, I would like to find a game where romance is the sub-plot rather than the main focus and the protagonist is female. That being said, if there are any particularly compelling games with romance in them that *don't* fit the above, I am certainly open to recommendations.

If you could give me a brief non-spoilery ""why"" behind the recommendation so I know what I am getting into, that would be awesome. Thanks in advance! :)

Edit: PC games are preferable, since that's my preferred platform. Maybe some PS4 since we have one, but I have never gamed on it (mostly just my husband).",GirlGamers
Any tips for staying relaxed during tournaments?,"I played in nickmerc’s ladies only tournament today (fortnite) and made it to semi-finals, but I was literally *so* nervous the whole time that I couldn’t play to my full potential and am really disappointed in myself. I have anxiety, and I can normally deal with it, but in this case it makes it unbearably hard to focus. I want to continue to get better and get involved in future tournaments, so If anyone has any tips or advice for this I’d appreciate it. :)",GirlGamers
Fallout 76,"Who will buy the game, or has already bought a version? What do you like most? 

I'm excited about the Perk system,  because you can really create your very own Character.

 I'm really looking forward to the C.A.M.P system - I already have a plan of my workshop and my pub on paper and the names are there too, haha. Rusty Fox and Rollin Palooza


In the Last two days, i have watched the Trailer of F76  10 times.. damn it. 


 I am curious about your thoughts, dudes. #falloutislove

",GirlGamers
Opinions on Overwatch community?,"Hello!!

&amp;#x200B;

I am very new to Reddit (as in, I just signed up less than thirty minutes ago, ha ha), so I do apologize if I'm not doing this right. I was just wondering what people's opinions are on the Overwatch community. I'm looking for answers along the lines of toxicity in the community, I guess. A family member recently bought me the game, and I've been wanting to play it for a long while now, but I have very, very bad anxiety that tends to flare up very easily.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm not usually one to avoid environments that trigger it (for lack of a better word), but I play video games to find a reprieve from things that stress me out, and I wanted to know if other players are generally kind or not, especially to new players. Also, I'm sorry if I'm not articulating myself particularly well, as I am not a native English speaker. (But I live in America, so I have to try my best!)

&amp;#x200B;

I guess to put it concisely, do you think that the Overwatch community is welcoming to new players? For either answer, in what ways?

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks much!! And I do apologize for any problems in terms of ""reddiquette""! (To be frank, I do not know what I am doing at all, ha ha.)

&amp;#x200B;

\- Hannah

(Do people normally sign off on posts? I feel like I'm writing a letter.)",GirlGamers
Anyone into Warmachine?,"I've been tagging along with my husband to our local tabletop store, and he helped me create a Mercenaries, irregulars themed list. My warcaster is Fiona the black, and I'm going to be getting a Galleon. It's a little overwhelming at the moment, and I'm not good at figuring out the rolls yet but I'm excited to try, and the guys that play at our store are super nice.      
So far my army is primed, but  I haven't started painting yet. Does anyone else play? what factions? do you like painting or assembly more?  
",GirlGamers
Is Calamity from Fortnite the only time leveling up makes your outfit less skimpy?,,GirlGamers
Wholesome game suggestions?,"I've been playing a lot of Far Cry 4 lately which is basically a lot of guns and explosions, and think I want to switch gears a bit to something more ""wholesome"" and addictive like Stardew Valley. I play on PC and I have a switch. 

Open to any and all Suggestions. Please and thank you. :)

Edit: now playing My Time at Portia. It is perfect, thanks all for suggestions. ",GirlGamers
Potential title for Elder Scrolls VI... Redfall!!,,GirlGamers
Do Destiny raids need prestige modes?,,GirlGamers
Went to my local comicon today! Crosspost from r/fo4,,GirlGamers
GeekGirl Con answering the real questions...,,GirlGamers
"A smart, buff and bisexual assassin",,GirlGamers
"A day late on the tattoos, but I just got it last night! Here's my Witcher tattoo. :)",,GirlGamers
Assassins creed odyssey,"Soooo ladies is it worth the buy or wait until its on sale? I’ve really been enjoying Syndicate, I mean odyssey has romance in it (omg yay lol)  and I can play as a girl (big bonus points for me) but is it worth the full price? 

Especially with all the micro transactions everyone is complaining about? 

Is anyone having issues playing it right now? Is it super buggy and stuff? (I was looking at the store page on Ubisoft and it mentioned a bunch of their games were down??)",GirlGamers
Itching to get into gaming but it's not in my budget at the moment.,"What should be my first console that I save up for?! I've played WoW before &amp; that was fun, if that helps any.  

What games can I get into in the meantime on a lame Chromebook? 

Thank you! ",GirlGamers
"Female Characters on the ""larger"" side","Hey all, long time listener, first-time caller here at /r/gamergirls!

I was wondering if any of you could possibly help me. I'm currently studying Computer Games Development at University and one of my units this year involves me creating a 3D model of a character and an environment. 

I, personally, am a woman on the larger side and, though I've heard all the excuses in the book from men I've asked in the past like ""It's an unhealthy body image, that's why its under-represented"" or ""it wouldn't make sense with the game setting or style"" and I'm honestly sort of sick of it. Unhealthy or not, it's who I am and I want to be represented, goddamn it.  

Anyways, what I'm asking for is a little help. I would like to make a female character who is on the larger side, but the problem is, I'm far from a 3D modeler, and even further from an artist. I'm here looking for inspiration. I love games but I'm aware there are huge gaps in my knowledge. 

**If there are any female characters in games you know and love, please let me know! I'm not just looking for female characters on the larger side, I'm also looking for those that don't just appeal to the male fantasy.** So let's talk about them and what we love about them! 

(Also, sorry for rambling, may have gotten away from me a little there!) Love you all and thank you for reading ♥

EDIT: I'm sorry I've not been able to respond to everyone, there were quite a few of you and work has been a little crazy! Keep replying though! Even if I don't respond, I promise I'm reading every single one of your messages and comments! 💜",GirlGamers
Anyone collect games? I started collecting more this year!,,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - October 05, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
external hard drive,my laptop is amazing but i only have 200gb on it that came with it. so i realy need an external harddrive does anyone has advise?,GirlGamers
Remember these little guys?,,GirlGamers
Is there any male character you find extremely sexy?,"I understand that there are layers upon layers when we talk about attraction, but after discussing some interesting theories in [this thread](https://mashable.com/feature/sex-video-games/?utm_cid=mash-com-Tw-main-link#vWQdJ_CSWGqI) I'm curious:

Is there any male character you find extremely sexually attractive? A character that appeals to your desires and fantasies and not just looks handsome or feels interesting?

And if you can't find any, why you think so? What's missing?",GirlGamers
"Article about women who are shaking up the esports industry, thought you ladies might appreciate it :)",,GirlGamers
Went a little more retro with my gaming tattoo!,,GirlGamers
"I saw tattoo sharing, so I thought I’d post the beginning of my leg sleeve.",,GirlGamers
"I missed out on the shirts, but I did get this.... Done by Mecca @ Sailor's Cross New Orleans x-post from /r/NightInTheWoods",,GirlGamers
Nerdy tattoos? Here's my Quen/Aard from The Witcher,,GirlGamers
Saw an earlier post and thought I should share my dragon language tattoo too 🤓,,GirlGamers
Neon District: Designing Strong Female Characters for a Cyberpunk RPG. Woman-Led Game Company.,,GirlGamers
"""Moral Choice"" Video Game Worlds Let You Greet Abuse With Forgiveness - Without Getting Hurt For Doing So",,GirlGamers
Thought you ladies would appreciate my Dragonborn tattoo!!!,,GirlGamers
A rant (please read),"This is a two-part rant about recent events and I just need to get off of my chest with someone that can hopefully relate to me or understand.

Here's some background information first: I've been playing video games for a while now, it all started with Minecraft when I was about 12. Then when my parents got a PC I downloaded Steam and played games like Dishonored, Transistor, Shadowrun Returns. I started High school and got a PlayStation for Christmas and began playing my first online multiplayer game: Overwatch. I played alone as I didn't have any friends on PlayStation with me. Fast forward two years, I meet my current boyfriend-- he plays Xbox and for my birthday he gets me one. 
A new world is opened up to me, I never realized how different games were when you had someone to play with. My boyfriend and all our friends play now whenever we have the time (which isn't often now that we work and have college). The point is, video games aren't new to me, they've been a part of my life for about seven years now. 

Part one: Now I'm pretty average when it comes to video games, I just recently made it to diamond for the first time in Overwatch (yayyy) and I'm only Gold 2 in R6 Siege. I love playing the same games, I've been playing Overwatch for years and Siege never gets old for me, I play some new games, but I always end up going back to my favorites. My friends (all guys) on the other hand, don't play as much as me, I'm actually higher ranked than them in both Overwatch and Siege. I enjoy playing with them but I hate that they underestimate me. They always have some criticism for the way I play, and a lot of times they get aggravated if I mess something up (like a 1v2) whereas if they do the same, it's nothing. I just find it really annoying that they treat me different, it's small, but it gets to me sometimes. Does anyone else experience this with their friend group?

Part two: Now we all know that guys are thirsty on the internet, this isn't news. This fact kept me from having my gamerpicture as a picture of myself for a long time. I had pictures of Daenerys Targaryen, Jessica Jones, and Korra from LOK, but never pictures of myself. Well I recently dyed my hair black, this is the first time I've ever dyed my hair and I really love how it came out. I took a selfie a few days after and thought, ""Wow this is a great picture and my hair looks great, I think I'll put it as my gamerpicture"". Well my friends immediately begin to comment on it and scrutinize me for it, and yesterday was the breaking point. I was playing casual Siege with two of my friends when I got a party invite from some random guy. I looked at the game menu and saw that we weren't playing with him so I asked my friends,
""Do you know somebody named *his gamertag*?""
One of them groaned and the other said, ""You need to change your gamertag."" 
I said, ""what?""
He said, ""You complain about getting messages but you're basically asking for it with that gamerpicture."" 
This is where I got pissed off. I'll tell you what I basically told them: I shouldn't have to pretend to not be a girl to keep from getting nasty messages. Actually, before my gamerpicture was a picture of myself, I got messages anyway, because my gamertag is ""OverlySassy"". My name is displayed as my name, Chloe, and my color is pink, so people knew I was a girl before I even changed my gamerpic. I just found it so infuriating that instead of people not sending messages and being rude and gross, people want me to hide that I'm a girl.
Please tell me that I'm not the only one that gets infuriated by this and that someone else understands.

Lastly, thank you so much for taking the time to read this and I would love to make friends to play with so if anyone is interested, feel free to add me. I love meeting new people. ",GirlGamers
My cluttered as butt set up. Tis comphy,,GirlGamers
Assassin’s Creed Odyssey has Evie Frye – here’s how to unlock her,,GirlGamers
"Mashable: ""How male video game characters awakened my sexuality as a teen girl""",,GirlGamers
My daughter's placement results. She is 7 and this is her first FPS game.,,GirlGamers
Female anti-heroes in video games,"I was discussing this with a friend recently. I've always preferred anti-heroes to heroes or villains. And while it's rare for women in fiction to be in these kind of roles, they seem nearly non-existent in games.

&amp;#x200B;

This is one of the reasons Nina Williams (Tekken) is my favorite female character, closely followed by Lara Croft. Both of them have saved the world on occasions but it's never been their goal. They're also willing to kill people to get what they want.

&amp;#x200B;

I can't think of many others though.",GirlGamers
Darksiders III - Force Hollow Trailer,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - October 03, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
'A Year Of Playing The World' - Dr Johanna Pirker is a game researcher and developer who is travelling the world looking at indie games from all sorts of countries,,GirlGamers
I saw this on another sub. Works here too.,,GirlGamers
Immediately upon entering a DbD lobby:,,GirlGamers
How to respond to sexist guys in game?,"So, I've been playing Overwatch since it came out. I got serious about playing competitively instead of casually a couple months ago, but I've always been too afraid to use voice chat. I want to improve, however, and I figure using voice chat is a must if I really want that. Plus I've had a couple games now where I know telling people about a flanker or a sleeping enemy would have helped the team. I ended up buying a headset this past week and plan on actually trying to use vc this weekend, but I'm nervous and was hoping anyone on here had any advice or any comebacks to shut any those guys down. I've never really had anyone be sexist towards me before, but I've read all the stories and seen some of what other girls have had to put up with and I know I'm not going to react well when someone does inevitably say stuff like that to me.",GirlGamers
Just a silly comic about video game genres,,GirlGamers
Girl Games of the 1990s: A Retrospective,,GirlGamers
Living out my romantic hero fantasies through Kassandra and loving it,,GirlGamers
So About Humble Bundle's Female Protagonist Sale...,"Am I the only  one who has mixed feelings about this? I love that they're recognizing games with female protagonists but...they included [Haydee](https://www.humblebundle.com/store/haydee). 

In full disclosure, I've never played the game personally. I watched a Let's Play of it and I've seen the screenshots.

I don't think I'd call Haydee a female protagonist...because she's not a protagonist. She's literally one of those headless female sex toys on legs (albeit with a robot head). She never speaks, she's one of a thousand Haydees. She doesn't have a face, a personality, she has no agency, no characterization. She's just an ass and a pair of tits on long legs with high heels. The top mods out there strip away the little clothing she's wearing. She's not a person. 

To put her in the same listing as Michonne, Zoe Castillo and hell, even Bayonetta who is a very sexual character but is still a person with characterization (and lets be real, she owns her sexual identity) and Amaterasu who is literally a goddess is frankly...really insulting. 

I get that they probably got permission to discount all of those games and went with the trait they had in common, being female-looking bodies. But this just... it's like its another reminder that even though you're a strong character the only thing that matters is that you have tits. 

Maybe I'm overreacting. Lord knows I'm hyper sensitive these days with all the 'we don't want no WAHMEN/femoids/feeeeeeemales in our vidya!' types I see on a daily basis. But idk.

Does anyone else have any feelings on the matter? ^^also ^^I'm ^^terrified ^^to ^^post ^^this ^^because ^^I ^^don't ^^want ^^to ^^have ^^people ^^yelling ^^at ^^me",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - October 02, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"Get past the character generation of Black Desert Online and the NPC women are portrayed in surprisingly practical attire. I know, I was shocked, too...",,GirlGamers
There's hope! Men fighting against sexism,"This weekend I volunteered at a local gaming event. A guy came up to me to ask me a question. I mostly answered it when my supervisor came up behind me and also answered the question. The guy who asked the question said to me “thank you for the information, you answered my question.” Then he turned to my supervisor and said “you didn't need to talk over her, she answered my question.”

My supervisor did not handle it well, and called the guy rude. They got into a really awkward fight where my supervisor was trying to explain himself, while the guy was uncomfortably trying to explain that women get talked over often and it's something men need to be more aware of. 

I was way too uncomfortable at the time to say anything to either of them, but I really really really appreciate the guy. While I didn't feel like I had been talked over, it was so nice to know this guy is aware of some of the struggles AND he was willing to stand up to another guy about it. 

Ladies, with all the toxicity we face in gaming, there are some champions out there! And guy at the event, thank you!
",GirlGamers
I can't have male gamer friends.,"At first, it was because they would mansplain or be a controller hog or underestimate me.  I learned to spot those and no longer engage/initiate contact.  


I found a gamer buddy through Reddit and things were chill up until a night or two ago when he said my voice was sexy.  Welp.  Okay, bud.  I guess we're done here.  Thanks for making me crazy uncomfortable.

&amp;#x200B;

Ugh.",GirlGamers
Humble is having a Female Protagonist Sale,,GirlGamers
This might officially be the coolest thing I own,,GirlGamers
Hiding that I am a serious gamer girl,"Not sure if anyone else ever feels this way, but a lot of times no one knows that I play video games or that I enjoy super dorky things. I only got into video games and geeky things after high school so maybe that is why? When I was younger I did watch things like Doctor Who and Sherlock. But now that I am older I not only am a super geek over many things but I love video games. And for some reason, it is something that almost no one knows about me. I think this is because I seem not so dorky on the outside. Like I occasionally wear a Harry Potter sweatshirt or a few video game pins on my jacket but other than that I don't have like a ton of graphic tees or things like that. But when someone finds out that I watch a shit ton of youtube or that I play video games and chat with my friends on discord almost every night, they think it's weird. My best girlfriends didn't even know how much of a dork I was, especially over video games, until recently. And even then they only see like the surface level of how much I game. It's not like I am ashamed or whatever because it really is one of my biggest passions. But for some reason I have a hard time expressing that part of myself. Anyone feel the same way or totally different? Interested to hear why or why not. 

&amp;#x200B;",GirlGamers
"Live interview play-through with Catbean Games, ""Calico"" Magical Girls Running Cat Cafés!","The tiny powerhouse that is Kelsey Tate, [**pkkaos**](https://twitter.com/pkkaos) of Catbean Games is talking about her game *Calico*, which has started its Kickstarter today! I helped play-test this, and the game is so wholesome and cute. You don't tend to get a lot of anime characters in general that are people of color, which is prominent in this game's character selection screen. There are kitties and puppers, you can pet them, ride giant cats, and carry cats around on your head as hats! 

Did you ever want to pet the dogs in *Legend of Zelda: Breath of the Wild*? Well in this game, you can!

Retweet: [https://twitter.com/EchoADiaz/status/1046861025633492996](https://twitter.com/EchoADiaz/status/1046861025633492996)

Twitch stream interview here: [http://twitch.tv/echothespacehippie …](https://t.co/GfmYhAt5us) 

Kickstarter link here: [https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/1885319905/calico-magical-girls-running-cat-cafes?ref=project\_build …](https://t.co/B4Uu7clqa5) ",GirlGamers
PC Games with Female Leads,"Hi there! I really enjoy RPG games like Witcher 3, Assassin's Creed, and Skyrim, but I do find myself really wishing I could be playing as a female, not as a man. Are there any good PC games with strong female leads I could play? I'd love a few recommendations!",GirlGamers
"I built a dragon-riding, magically mutated Warhammer Sorceress!",,GirlGamers
mfw a girl is being a jerk to me on team chat but my team tries to defend me with sexism,,GirlGamers
TinkerBell Mercy mash up I drew,,GirlGamers
Have you taken a day off work to play a new release?,"Did you feel it was worth it? Did you enjoy the game? How did you deal with the ""oooh anything exciting?"" response at your workplace? Would you do it again?

I'll start, I recently took a day off work just to play the newly released Two Point Hospital.  It was my first time taking the day off purely to play a new game as soon as it came out. I have no regrets. It was one of the most fun days off I have had. Loved the game, loved the tannoy voice, loved playing it as soon as it came out.

What's your experience? Did your game live up to your expectations?",GirlGamers
I made a fan-art of the ladies on the LoL broadcast team :),,GirlGamers
Recommendation: Scroll of Taiwu,"[https://store.steampowered.com/app/838350/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/838350/)

It is an indie game done by like, four Chinese people: a doctor, an architect, an incredibly handsome singer, and a male nurse.

On Steam the game has sold over 150,000 units in just 5 days, and is a top 10 most played game this week.

Sadly ... there is no English version: [https://steamcommunity.com/app/838350/discussions/0/1735465524703633192/?ctp=3](https://steamcommunity.com/app/838350/discussions/0/1735465524703633192/?ctp=3)",GirlGamers
PS4 players..,"Has this year been a bit crazy for your bank account??? 

This month itself we have Assassin's Creed: Odyssey ( fuck yeah to playing a female assassin Greek warriorress and a queer one at that!) on October 5 and then Red Dead Redemption 2 on October 26! 

I finished Spiderman today. Such a great game. I love how they made MJ into a journalist who sneaks around into dangerous places, haha.

That's another thing too. Playstation has released games continously with great writing and characterisation. So many well written women and they are character leads too. 

Never would have guessed just 5 years ago.",GirlGamers
Froskurinn aka ThatChineseFangirl will join EU LCS in 2019,"[Announcement Letter](https://medium.com/@lolFroskurinn/eulcs-2019-thateuropeanfangirl-9b5b9447edfd)

Also she's in last [Euphoria Podcast](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Z0cCRiDJ4Hs&amp;feature=youtu.be)
",GirlGamers
Most accepting games?,"Hey, I'm wondering which games have communities that accept woman players.",GirlGamers
"After a few somewhat tilted games, I drew this haha.",,GirlGamers
Opinions on the importance of Voice Chat?,"I posted in OW University about how I'm not a fan of using voice often during competitive matches. I didn't mention that, besides it being frequently distracting, there is a much bigger reason to stay out of voice sometimes...

What is everyone's thoughts on team voice, in any games? Are there really positives to outweigh the negatives?",GirlGamers
Ubisoft Wants All Future Assassin’s Creed Games to Allow for a Choice of Gender,,GirlGamers
It took over 30 years but it seems like women have been allowed a presence in video game ads again. Good to see some diversification of what a gamer looks like.,,GirlGamers
What were some of your worst experiences with joining a guild?,"
  I don't know if posts like this are allowed, let me know if they aren't. But I've personally had some crazy terrible experiences looking for a guild, everything from being given the cold shoulder for weeks on end after being invited to join one, to a crazy guild officer leading the worst dungeon raid ever. I've only ever been in *one* good guild, and it disbanded shortly after I joined.

  I'm wondering if the rest of you have any stories too where, you tried so hard to find a good, fun, friendly guild. but in the end had to give up on the people in it, and went back to grinding or learning tailoring by yourself.",GirlGamers
Is there any series/games that you feel like you were the target audience?,"While of course, Games can be enjoyed by anyone, it's quite clear that historically the majority of video-games had as a ""target consumer"": the dudes. 

But in your experience, did you found any game that you felt like you were the primary target audience? And was it a positive experience or did you feel like it was just stereotypical and missed the mark?
",GirlGamers
Boston Festival of Indie Games (FIG) is tomorrow!,"Hi ladies!

If you're in the Boston area, I highly suggest checking out the Festival of Indie Games at MIT. It's by far my favorite event (even more so than PAX). There are lots of female game makers, both board and indie. 

Some of the games are still conceptional and others are either launching a Kickstarter or already have games for sale.

It's tomorrow Saturday Sep 29th. https://www.bostonfig.com/ ",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - September 28, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Slaying Your Way to Radical Empathy: Bayonetta and Feminism,"I found this interesting article on ThinkProgress on which I like to hear your thoughts on.

https://thinkprogress.org/guest-post-slaying-your-way-to-radical-empathy-bayonetta-and-feminism-75d0843d5294/
 

",GirlGamers
All Girl Discord,"Hopefully this fits in with this sub but does anyone know of any all girl Discord channels? I used to be in one but it kind of disbanded :( 

A lot of the channels I’m in and who I game with are like 90% male which is fine but I miss having other girls to talk to and game with.

Thanks in advance! ",GirlGamers
I feel like I was just in the unicorn of groups...and it was amazing.,"I've been running Warfronts in WoW today, so basically a raid group of 20 people working together. I'm usually hesitant to speak up in groups because that just seems to open the floodgate for assholes to start chattering, even in text chat. Calling out where help is needed or where I'm headed in battlegrounds often gets ignored at the best, gets me flamed, or somehow leads to people raging and abusing their teammates when stuff goes wrong. (I guess because it reminded them that chat was there? I don't know.)

Not this group, though. Right off the bat, a warlock and a mage were super helpful - explaining tactics and mechanics. Calling out where help would be most helpful. Kind and pleasant and making jokes, to the point where other people were also speaking up and communicating well.

And then another mage made a comment about being ""raped"" at their location. Multiple members of the raid group (including several who had identified themselves as guys through jokes shortly before) immediately called them out, telling them that the comment was offensive and not cool. When the mage decided to tell people to get over it rudely, people encouraged others to report the mage and then vote to kick them from the group. The vote to kick passed before I could even find the mage's name in my raid frames.

I have never felt so safe to communicate with my team before. It actually FELT like a team. It was the best experience I've had in WoW in a long time. Warfronts aren't hard, but that was just a lot of fun because of the people. They really made my night.

",GirlGamers
Good Guys in Overwatch QP,"I felt the need to share this positive interaction!

I recently got into Overwatch when it went on sale and have been playing all of 2 weeks. For the past week and a half, my best friend (male) has been inviting me to group with him and his regular crew, all guys, and estimated between 16 and 30. I typically game with a family friendly community, so playing with people in voice chat outside of there makes me anxious, as I don’t know what to expect and typically assume everyone who is a stranger will be toxic.

These 7 dudes have been the nicest, most supportive strangers. When I asked them to watch their language during my stream, they obliged. When I ask questions about which heroes are helpful or where my hero would do best, they show me the ropes. They laugh at my jokes and defend me in the text chat, and always encourage that we stay in our own voice channel when they notice someone being toxic. 

I just wanted to post and share my appreciation for these kind and patient strangers, and hopefully add some optimism to all of my GG fam. There’s a LOT of toxicity to steel yourself against, but they aren’t all bad ;)",GirlGamers
How do you respond to sexist comments?,"So I was playing Overwatch competitive today, and usually I don’t get alot of comments on my sex, and when I do it isn’t as bad as this.
However today I was playing ana using voice comms. Then immediately my team’s moira types “girls shouldn’t be playing Overwatch”. At first I laughed this off but it got more aggressive with him saying “you bleeders should uninstall” “women are inferior go kill yourself” “this b*ch cant even heal” I blocked him and reported but I was already tilted. Luckily we won the game but I was wondering how you guys deal and respond with these comments without getting tilted or frustrated. ",GirlGamers
Who are your favorite female YouTube gamers?,"Hi guys! I'm looking for some good female youtubers who do let's plays. I watch Markiplier and other youtubers religiously, but it would be nice to have a more relatable experience. The person doesn't have to be too popular!

I've watched Claire Sioban (I'm sure I spelled her name wrong, I'm sorry!) and really enjoy her Skyrim videos and such, but she plays mostly Sims which I'm not interested in watching.

Recommendations? :)

",GirlGamers
Opening message I received from a guy on a dating app...,"""As I get older I don't do as much gaming, but it's pretty cool to see a woman who enjoys pc games! It's pretty rare. Which games are you into?""

Pretty rare? Women make up \~50% of gamers nowadays, as it should be. I hard passed on this guy. Maybe I'm overreacting but it annoys me to see comments like this. I don't feel special because I'm a woman who likes video games and I don't want to either. And if it is rare, then maybe it's because some sectors of the video game world are geared toward young heterosexual men or the communities are just unwelcoming of women in general.

Edit: A lot of people are commenting that I should have given him a chance, but that was not his entire message, just what was relevant to this sub. The first part of the message was: ""Hey! I almost just went with a total douchey fuckboy kind of intro but then I started reading your profile (who does that?!?) and you seem pretty cool so I decided to go with something more genuine!"" That turned me off to messaging him as well. ",GirlGamers
When you had a good stream sesh and then find out your puppy had the time of her life 🤦🏻‍♀️🤦🏻‍♀️🤦🏻‍♀️,,GirlGamers
Playstation launches cross-play beta for Fortnite today. Possibility of including other titles in the future.,,GirlGamers
"Will any of you be getting Pokémon: Let's Go, Pikachu! or Let's Go, Eevee?","I was originally going to pass on this one because I thought it would just be an overglorifying Pokemon Go, but more information has come out so I ended up changing my mind. Plus the human models look really cute",GirlGamers
I'm finally done with my fade setup! For now... :P,,GirlGamers
Wanting to explore gaming world,"So long story short , i’m a English lone girl gamer who loves going to CS:GO live matches like faceit major and blast also really want to go to dreamhack or gamescon but i have no one to go with :( all my friends are not interested in this stuff! I’m fairly new to this online gaming business and don’t have any friends online, anyway are they any companies or tour operators that people know of that do like bus tours to these places ? ",GirlGamers
I want to buy an awesome chair for my wife,"Hello all!  My wife works from home and is in a desk chair for 8+ hours a day. I really want to get her a nice chair that is comfortable and adjustable.  She tends to perch on the front edge of the chair most of the time because it's ""too big"" and it's messing up her back and shoulders.  Do any of you have any recommendations for a sweet chair I can get her that would fir her frame?  She's 5'4"" 140lbs for reference.

Thanks so much for all your suggestions.",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - September 26, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
"PROfiles: Se-Yeon ""Geguri"" Kim | Overwatch League Player Profile",,GirlGamers
Any youtube review/essay channels focused on gaming and done by women?,"Basically title, I'm a sucker for youtube essays, do you have any interesting female youtubers to recommend?",GirlGamers
Total War: Rome 2 is getting review-bombed on Steam because of women generals,,GirlGamers
"If you play ESO, get in on the Summerfall event! Everyone who participates gets a free pet, mount and the enormous Grand Psijic Villa house for free!","You need to have ESO+Summerset to qualify. All you need to do is go to Summerset, complete the quest ""The Queen's Decree"" (the opening quest helping Raz) and then visit all ten of the eye locations for the Summerset Pathfinder Achievement, before Friday morning. You only need to do it on one character. It's really easy! I did it in under an hour.

Here's the [official page](https://www.elderscrollsonline.com/en-us/summerfall) for it, including a handy little map and counter for our progress. We're already at 85% as of this morning, which gets everyone the  pet and the mount. I'm pushing for that house because it's easily one of the biggest and most beautiful houses in game, and can cost you a couple hundred dollars if you pay full price for the crowns and the house.

If you have any questions, let me know or just go to /r/elderscrollsonline.",GirlGamers
What are your favorite multiplayer mobile games?,"I recently tried out PUBG Mobile and liked it more than i thought. Don't have any friends who play it, if anyone wants to squad up let me know!

I play Clash royale on and off as well. I find it ok when i have a few mins free...I'm not great at it.

I used to play pokemon go but i don't anymore.

What about you?",GirlGamers
Is it bad to start an have an All-Girls clan?,"I understand that most men find it ‘sexist’ whenever me or other officers try to look for more players to recruit. They get offended that they cannot join, when the sole-purpose of this clan was to be a safe-haven for girls to hang out and play with each other without being harassed by guys who see that your gamer tag is feminine and try and shoot their shot. It just seems like the process of making this clan bigger is making a negative impact on my other officers because they keep getting harassed by guys who want to join or call us sexist for only wanting players that identify as a female, or just boggled down by the comments. 

I hate that they call it sexist, when the gaming population is primarily male. Clearly there are different conversations you can have amongst girls whereas when I play with my boys they are absolutely more rugged and harsher with their words. 😪",GirlGamers
Kicked out of a guild for being trans. -_-,"Been playing a game recently called Post Scriptum. Really great game, sort of a combination of Planetside2 and Red Orchestra 2. 

Anyways, I was invited to join a small guild a month ago. I expressed a bit of worry about fitting in—the milsim crowd is probably some of the worst in gaming for treatment of women—so I asked if the guild officers would step in if chat started getting transphobic or misogynistic.   They agreed. And things were great for a month. 


Then the officers of my guild decide they aren’t interested in leading anymore, so our guild was absorbed by another larger guild. I liked having a group to play with so I figure I can maybe get the same basic protections from the new guild. 

When I went to the new officers with my concerns, and requested that they step in when/if chat became misogynistic or transphobic. They told me “don’t start anything and there won’t be any trouble.”  I tried again, explaining that even when I’m focusing entirely on the game, this sort of shit just comes up, and would they please step in and quash those sorts of comments when they do. 

And then they booted me from the guild. Told me they weren’t interested in playing with a “piece of shit sjw” and that I should quit even playing milsims.   

Yeah, you only wish, dude. ",GirlGamers
Hubby and I finally got some new ink to show off our love of tabletop gaming!,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - September 25, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
Battlefield V and it's community,"I have been on the fence for a while about getting Battlefield V and I am not sure how to feel about it. I know there are other posts about the hot topics of why BF V is creating a more inclusive space for us women among others, however I wanted to hear what r/GirlGamers had to say.

I am still on the fence because I am afraid that the BFV community will still be toxic to us despite the attempts of EA to shun that sort of toxicity. Do you think the people that have been aggressively against the representation of women will actually not buy the game in protest? Also if they don't buy BFV will this have a good enough impact such that the BFV community will be less sexist than the gaming community in general?

I'd like to hear what your thoughts on this and whether you are planning on getting BFV. Also please try not to tear my post apart since I am new to all of this. Thanks!",GirlGamers
It would be nice to be treated like a person for a change,"I’m sure it happens to you guys too. I play a lot of Heroes of the Storm, and given that I don’t have any IRL friends to play it with, I get excited whenever I make a friend and have someone to play with regularly. It’s all good for a few days and it always has to become sexual. I always get asked for nudes or something.

It would be nice to make friends and not just be seen like a piece of meat just because I’m a girl.

Edit: I just woke up and wow! You guys are lovely :)",GirlGamers
Is anyone playing Dark and Light?,Just curious if you like it? and what you thought about it? I recently decided to take the plunge and try it out. ,GirlGamers
Headset Recommendations,"
Edit: Wow y'all are awesome! Thank you so much to all who responded. I think I'll have to go with HyperX after all the suggestions and reading reviews. 

So sorry if the formatting is off (using mobile). 

I use a padded set of over-the-ear headphones and a separate mic for gaming. I've noticed that when I play for 2+ hrs my headphones somewhat pinches the top of my ears. I kind of have a small shaped head and was wondering if anyone had suggestions for headsets or headphones that work well for them that may have had the same issues as me. I'm ok with not using a separate mic.

Yesterday I played for close to 6 hours and the top of my ears are still sore from the pinching against my head. I have my headphones on the smallest setting, but it seems to just not be enough. Also, I play PC so anything that has USB, wireless, or normal headphone port would be best. Any recommendations are appreciated!",GirlGamers
Triforce tattoo,"I think I finally wanna get it done. Been thinking about it for too long. It won’t be my first so it’s not a big deal to me. 

I’m just wondering more about placement! Any suggestions?? Was thinking maybe inside wrist or behind the ear? 

Anyone else have one? ",GirlGamers
Occasionally I do get sweet messages,,GirlGamers
Ranger elf mini from hero forge - had so much fun creating her! Gonna get her painted next. :),,GirlGamers
"My ""weird autumn"". :)",,GirlGamers
Love graffiti and Mitzi from Animal Crossing,,GirlGamers
Cyberpunk 2077 and Red Dead Redemption II; What Are Your Thoughts about Dismemberment in Video Games?,"Before there was much info about both games I was pretty hyped at least for RDR II, and also a bit for Cyberpunk 2077 as well. Then it was revealed that there won't be multiple protagonists in RDR II. I'm still salty about not being able apparently to play as Sadie Adler and young John Marston and to be limited to just this other new character Arthur Morgan, but I did cope with this after seeing how beautiful this game looks in the trailers. Also I'm a huge fan of the whole Neo-Western subgenre or simply the current age of the Western genre, however you wish to classify it. So I'm inclined to get over myself to be able to experience this game eventually or so I thought.

&amp;#x200B;

Let's jump to the gameplay trailer for Cyberpunk 2077. I was pretty tired when I watched it, but the gunplay near the end got me pretty excited. Until V shot away those one guy's legs with a pumpgun/shotgun that is. In the subreddit it seemed that many people even thought of it as funny. I was just horrified. I really don't like seeing dismemberment in any media, but the rough violence with which it was carried out just repulses me. Also I'm no fan of not having the option of a third person perspective in the game. And after CDPR's twitter account tweeted out a transphobic joke this game pretty much died for me.

&amp;#x200B;

Now back to RDR II. Recently it was announced that in that game not only will you be able to play it in first person perspective, you'll also be able to dismember people with shotguns and I was just like nope. It's so unnecessary brutal and it makes killing people in games feel way too real. When they're just ragdolls that collapse and lie down, it doesn't make me feel so guilty. But seeing them hacked or shot into pieces and possibly react to it before dying, It makes me feel ill. I know, I probably don't have to do this when I play, but the thought that it could happen when NPCs fight each other or I in the heat of the moment use the wrong weapon and see this happen horrifies me. So I'm not so sure anymore if I'll actually ever play this game.

&amp;#x200B;

I don't want to say that you can't enjoy brutal games if that's your taste, but now I feel left out of the fun because I don't. I just want to hear from you whether I'm alone with this or if there are others that are not too thrilled for this kind of features. Are there other things comparable to this that are major turn offs for you?

&amp;#x200B;

Strangely, It's only the case with dismemberment for me. I can play the new God of War without feeling bad even though it's pretty brutal as well. Maybe I'm just weird.",GirlGamers
Do you tell people that you are a gamer?,"I've been regularly gaming for nearly 3 years now and I have always been shy about it. It took me some time to get the courage to tell my closest friends that this is what I ""waste"" my time on. I have always been embarrassed over it, mainly because I don't want anyone to get the wrong impression of me.
Now my question is; do you tell people (especially guys) that you are as they say a girl gamer? Do you think it's awkward? Because I find it really hard to say. I feel like I get judged and that they just don't believe me. Which is really frustrating.",GirlGamers
Obsessed with Battlefront 2. HELP.,"So ladies, 

I bought Battlefront 2 over the weekend because it was $10 on the Playstation Store and I had my doubts due to how shitty the launch was thanks to the putrescence that is microtransations, but I got it anyway to try out the multiplayer. Y'all, I played it from about 9 am to 1:30 am THE NEXT DAY. I think it's on track to being one of my very favorites. I've never been a multiplayer person. I suck at it. And the guys playing in matches? So rude, so disrespectful, so TRASH. Someone even mentioned how much better Fortnite players were during multiplayer for another game and it's like, then go play Fortnite?

BUT ANYWAY, I love Battlefront a LOT and I anticipate that I will be grinding the hell out of it. Does anybody else play?? I haven't played the campaign either and honestly...I don't care to? LOL. ",GirlGamers
"Any D&amp;D players on here? I started playing for the first time recently with my husband and his friends. Surprisingly fun, though we have to do it with roll20 and discord since we all live long distance from each other.","Edit!!!

Hey y’all!! For anyone wanting to maybe get into an online campaign (new or experienced), send me a PM and I’ll try to get us all together in a chat on discord or something. If we can’t find a DM in this thread, my husband said he would do it for us!! :) ",GirlGamers
Resident Evil 7: Biohazard.,"So my wonderful beau bought me Resident Evil 7: Biohazard (awesome birthday gift) so far I really have been enjoying it. The game play and graphics give me a feeling of nostalgia for some odd reason (kind of reminds me of the older games). The plot line and vibe I get from it so far makes me think if Resident Evil &amp; Silent Hill hooked up then biohazard would be their  baby.

&amp;#x200B;

What did you ladies think?  


Sorry for the random lol",GirlGamers
"After all the justifiably enraging posts about sexism in gaming, let’s have some fun! Gamers, whose your gaming crush?!","Gamers! I got so angry at the last post about a girl describing yet another third encounter with the sexist kind that I thought I would make a cheeky post to lighten the mood around here! So I ask: Whose got your bones rattling these days? 

I’ll get the ball rolling.... I was around 8 when FF8 came out and I was MADLY in love with Squall. So much so that I hated Rinoa as I was so jealous lol! 

Nowadays, I’m loving MeCree from Overwatch! I freaking go nuts when he says “Whoa there!” I’d let him high noon me in any day!

What about you guys? ",GirlGamers
Many Magic the Gathering players here?,"I haven't played for well over a year since I just couldn't deal with the social aspect though my LGS is nicely only 20 minutes away (I think I could count the amount of game shops in Ireland on my hand). Played terribly for a while with my brother when I was really young then played standard seriously around BFZ but just couldn't keep it up.

Now that Arena is coming out I've been tempted to get back into it, might even try out going back to Friday night standard. Anyone else play here?",GirlGamers
Tried to sell some games. This is what I get.,,GirlGamers
A hilarious parody of Free to Play games,,GirlGamers
"My setup, so the rest of us has something to relate to :)",,GirlGamers
How I dress at the D&amp;D table BECAUSE I AM A DAMN ADULT!!!,,GirlGamers
"The Marauder, what better way to manage my mischief.",,GirlGamers
[rant] A little story about a guy I met yesterday,"Last night I went out with some friends and met this guy who asked me about my bachelor's thesis. I study psychology and just started my masters. 

Anyway, I wrote my thesis about the relationship between the video game character and the player and how identification with the character can change the gaming experience. Now I don't have many friends who game so


 I get super excited whenever I get to talk about gaming. So of course once I told him what I wrote about he was all like ""Oh but you don't really game yourself, right?"" and I told him that I did. He asked me to name some video games and I've rattled down all the games I've played since I was I child and I started getting really into it (because I get super excited about it). I tell him how I got the Idea for my thesis after a discussion with my brother on how much we enjoyed the Witcher 3 since I found it really hard to emphasize with Geralt since he is so super alpha (and the women are kinda... I don't know).


Well, then the topic turns back to my thesis because I mentioned how much I enjoyed Horizon Zero Dawn since Aloy is amazing and she looks a little like me (aka redhead). He laughs and is all like ""But she's way too buff, it's so offputting"".That is just ridiculous and I told him that. I like that she looks more muscular and yet still feminine. I mean, she's a warrior, of course she's not a size zero, duh. But I guess he didn't like that. I proceed to tell him that I prefer Aloy's aesthetics to let's say Lara Crofts because it looks more real to me. Again he laughs and says something along the line that Lara is much hotter and I tell him that I don't like sexualized females in video games...


In the end, he told me the worst thing ever. Since I study psychology I must know the working of the mind and how to manipulate people (newsflash: I don't). So the only reason I talk about video games like that when I'm out is that I want to manipulate men (aka him) into sleeping with me. Like... f you! I talk about it because I like it, it's my hobby and I enjoy it.


I only realized then that he was being a sexist asshole about video game characters and also about my course of study. 


Sorry, I just had to vent and I don't have any female gamer friends... hope that's okay


(I apologize for any mistakes, English is not my first language..)

EDIT:
I really didn't expect this post to gain so much traction, I just needed to vent :D Anyway, thanks for all the encouraging comments? It was so nice to read all of it, but I haven't really gotten around to replying... sorry guys! Also, my thesis is already done but It's got my real name and location so I'm not too comfortable to share it online (I also don't know if I have the right to post it somewhere or if it 'technically' belongs to my uni and since they haven't posted it online...).

Buuut it was 'only' a theoretical paper... I wasn't allowed to do any actual research like online or lab testing with other studies since only master students are allowed to do that. What I did was to look at the already existing studies that link a few different kinds of identification in video games (character identification, wishful thinking, and avatar identification) to enjoyment in video games as well as other components as playing style (such as competitive vs. non-competitive, gender/age).


**If anyone is interested, I think these were some of the main papers that I based everything on if I remember correctly (and I'm not on my college laptop so I can't look at my lit research folder):**


Hefner, D., Klimmt, C., &amp; Vorderer, P. (2007). Identification with the player character as determinant of video game enjoyment. In Entertainment computing–ICEC 2007 (pp. 39-48). Springer, Berlin, Heidelberg.

Konijn, E. A., Nije Bijvank, M., &amp; Bushman, B. J. (2007). I wish I were a warrior: The role of wishful identification in the effects of violent video games on aggression in adolescent boys. Developmental psychology, 43(4), 1038. 

Jansz, J., &amp; Martis, R. G. (2007). The Lara phenomenon: Powerful female characters in video games. Sex roles, 56(3-4), 141-148.

(available through google scholar)

",GirlGamers
Huge Number of Layoffs at Telltale Games,,GirlGamers
Ladies! What would you like to hear about in a podcast from a female gamer?,"I've been toying with the idea of doing a podcast for months and have been debating topics! I've settled that it will pretty much be ramble-y cause that's just me but I want to talk about specific things that affect female gamers that men or maybe even other women on the internet might not realize. 

I know harassment is a big one, getting bullied for being female. 

I also know that a lot of women feel excluded when it comes to esports.

I know gatekeeping is also a big one! 

I just don't know if I should focus on these topics or just talk about games in general or some mix of both. So /r/girlgamers, what would your perfect girl-made nerd/gamer/weirdo podcast sound like?",GirlGamers
Telltale Games Reportedly Hit By Massive Layoffs Amid Speculation of Closure,,GirlGamers
What are your personal experiences with sexism in video games? And in which genre have you experienced the worst?,"I'm primarily a retro gamer, so when it comes to video games it's mostly just me playing by myself or only with friends, sitting around the Sega Mega Drive at home. 

Being as the only people I commonly talk video games with are my friends irl, I don't really experience much sexism, but I'm curious about the experiences of other women. Do you experience any sexism in video games? If so, which genres have you experienced it in? 

I have this notion that women who play MMOs must get swamped in it, but I haven't actually spoken to any women who play these kinds of games. I am curious about all experiences - whether you experience it constantly, or never at all. ",GirlGamers
Is the Nintendo switch worth it?,"So, i never owned a console in my life, I always played pc games like pizza tycoon, airline tycoon, sims, creatures, age of empires and settlers (settler 1 was my first game ever), later on WoW (one of the top guilds in my country) Guild wars and so on.
For the last two years i played overwatch and heroes of the storm, but quitted because i cba to deal with all the toxic players there.
I tried a lot of games lately but do you know the feeling of repetitive where it feels like you already know the game before you even start it?
I just enjoy Twopoint Hospital atm (i loved theme hospital back in the days). Talk about a casual gamer :D

I like the idea of a console and sitting in the comfort of my living room playing some fun games.
I am just unsure if the games the switch offers will be any fun for me. Overcooked and splatoon looks like fun also the walking dead seasons. 
I would love some games that uses the motion controls of the controllers too...

Any Nintendo switch users here that can help?
Do you still enjoy your switch?",GirlGamers
Just got my first gaming PC! Any suggestions?,"Hey gals so I just got my first gaming PC and I'm super excited! I've played on Xbox mostly for years so I'm looking for some games that I may have been missing out on! I enjoy RPGs, platformers, puzzle games. Some games I've played and loved are Final Fantasy, Fallout, Mass Effect, Bioshock, RE4, Oxenfree, Diablo 3, and right now I'm playing Divinity! Are there any good free games on steam? Any suggestions are welcome :)",GirlGamers
Polygon: Tomb Raider has forgotten how to provide guilt-free murder,,GirlGamers
Female WoW streamers?,Hey! I'm looking for good female WoW streamers to follow since there don't seem to be as many as guys. If any of you ladies stream WoW or have favourite WoW streamers please tell me and I'll follow!,GirlGamers
Seen on r/otters,,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - September 21, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Rant.,"This will probably contain rape triggers or assault triggers. Please dont read if those things will harm your well being.

So one of my roommates is a guy and plays video games in the livingroom a lot. I dont care much because I play in my room when I am not studying. Well I came out of my room to get some water. I look to see what he is playing, sometimes I come out and watch him play if its a game I enjoy.

He was playing GTA V with some friends. I proceeded to watch him kill a woman, drag her body over to a water fountain and do emotes like he was raping her. He kept laughing and took screenshots when he lined everything right and brought his bodies over to watch well still laughing about it.

Now I am a rape survivor and have some own issues dealing with this kind of stuff. I just went back to my room without even getting the water. I just.. what has made it okay in our society for this to be acceptable. 

Am I just taking it too hard because of my past? 

(Roommate is a good friend and in his 20s)",GirlGamers
Where my girl gamer writers at?,"So this is something I’ve been researching and I thought I’d reach out here just in case anything comes up. I love gaming, mostly RPGs or anything with a good story. I’m also a writer getting my MFA right now. Is there anyone here who has infiltrated the video game writing industry or has some experience with it? Any tips or insights you might have on this industry would be much appreciated. ",GirlGamers
"(F)elt cute, might delete later",,GirlGamers
Lookimg for games that have is or has a Medieval setting or theme.,"So its September and I have a thing that for each month, I have a theme for it. To me, September is Medieval/Middle Earth/Reniassance-ish(?) (idk about the renaissance era tbh) month and I'm doing things thats related to it. So if anyone can recommend me anything that's related to it either video games, board games, etc, I deeply appreciate it.

Oh and if I can make/play as a female knight/paladin as a bonus, that would be super awesome! :-)",GirlGamers
When your foundation doesn't match your skin,,GirlGamers
How do you girls do it?,"I finally got the courage to start playing Rainbow Six Seige after putting it off because of all the comments I’ve heard and in the second casual game I enter, my team decided to kill the hostage because they, my team, collectively, said that the hostage was in favor of women rights and he had to be killed because women had no rights (sorry for run on). The guys talking on mic kept this train of thought going on and just kept bashing women. This is just casual, without me even speaking on mic. Suffice to say that I left after that first round. And, unfortunately, I didn’t know how to report players until a few matches after.

How do you ladies do it? I felt like biting right back, but if age has taught me anything, it was to not answer back and feed them. But I was so upset and my blood was boiling.

How do I deal with this without quitting? Game is really, really fun but holy moly, so damn toxic. So far, it has been the most toxic game I have played online. Just want to see what some of you ladies do to stay strong because it gets to you, quick.",GirlGamers
Is anyone else excited about the new Call of Cthulhu game?,"My dad raised me on Lovecraftian stories and table top games. I'm super excited to see a game rendition that actually looks pretty good! The first game was a huge disappointment to be honest. 

I don't know if it's okay to link(kind of new to the sub) but here's a link to the game if you're curious!

http://www.callofcthulhu-game.com/en

Edit: this may be silly but how do I add a flair? I don't see it listed below.:C",GirlGamers
"This is really, REALLY stupid, but my new phone is sparkly and purple and goes in my bag, so when it came time to give it a name...",,GirlGamers
"So frigging tired of these types of posts!! People posting female characters asses?!? What in the actual F*** does this have to do with being a gamer, Or playing a game?!",,GirlGamers
What are some games similar to Skyrim where I can make my own character?,The less boob armour and sex in the game the better. I would prefer a PS3 or PS4 game though I don't own the latter console yet. ,GirlGamers
What are Your Thoughts on the Nintendo Switch Online service?,"I have heard a lot of mixed opinions on the Nintendo Switch Online service. In my opinion, it is exactly what Nintendo promised it to be. I do wish that the rollout introduced more themes for the Switch and some basic messaging functions though.

What are your thoughts?",GirlGamers
Proud to say that I have officially built my very first gaming pc!,,GirlGamers
What platforms do you ladies play on? 🎮💕,"Hi, everyone! I'm kind of new to this whole reddit thing but I'm really interested in meeting new people to play with. I really hate joining online games and just getting hate mailed in game chat. It makes gaming pretty annoying honestly so I just need new friends lol.

I mostly play on Xbox, how about you guys? 🤗 ",GirlGamers
Callout post on not being a creep in /r/rainbow6,,GirlGamers
I'm Going to Go Broke in the Next Couple of Months,"There is a slew of games/consoles coming soon, and my poor bank account is whimpering with the amount of good titles coming up.

Titles include 


1. 3ds Luigi's Mansion remake

2. PS1 Classic (so excited)

3. Nintendo Switch Pikachu/Eevee themed console

4. Animal Crossing (Switch)

5. Fire Emblem Three Houses

6. Kirby's Extra Epic Yarn 3DS

7. Mario &amp; Luigi: Bowser's Inside Story + Bowser Jr.'s Journey Nintendo 3DS

8. Super Smash Bros. Ultimate (Isabelle from Animal Crossing might be in it)

9. Assassin's Creed Odyssey

10. Kingdom Hearts III

That is just a few titles",GirlGamers
Converting to PC?,"I’ve always been an Xbox gamer, but really considering switching to PC.
I have no idea where to start with PC’s! Help a girl out? ",GirlGamers
Where have you girls been all my life?!!,"I’m so happy I have a place to vent and be my girly nerdy gaming self. 



Update: ♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️♥️  Thank you all for the warm welcome. I can’t wait to stop lurking and participate more🤣🤣🤣


 ",GirlGamers
Needing some input....,"TLDR-Would there be enough intrest in a curvy girl gamer community?

So the long story post...
I am a plus size girl and I'm trying to find my nitch in the streamer/gamer community. I got into streaming about 4 months ago and ended up taking about a month off because life got crazy. I am back now and can't seem to get the footing I had when I first started streaming.

The whole reason I started streaming was to build my brand and take the steps towards becoming a social media/content creator in the gaming industry.(I'm in school of media communications) I know to do this I need to find my nitch and tell my story. The one think I am proud of is that I'm a big girl and I don't care what anyone thinks of that. 

My question to this community is if you think there would be enough girls/women who would want something like this? I have looked all over and there are no twitch streaming communities that are centered around plus size/curvy women. This is one of the only girl gamer reddit. Everything plus size or bbw or any other form of the word in search only turn up fashion related things.

Its not easy being a gamer who is plus size it's the sterotype that the world puts on all gamers. If you are a gamer you are lazy, fat and live in you moms basement. My thoughts were around the idea is a place where you can make friendships and find support.",GirlGamers
"Ooblets: a game about farming, friendship, and collecting creatures and letting them compete in dance battles",,GirlGamers
cleaning up my twitch channel,"So I am redoing my twitch channel because I messed it up pretty bad my first go around and at the moment I’m stuck because I can’t think of a name. ! 

How do y’all  think of a name for your channel? ",GirlGamers
MOM! There is no pause in online games,"My friends just sent me [This](https://shop.spreadshirt.com/gamedise/paiise-A5ba217541cbf3a306baca384?productType=444&amp;appearance=2) link of his new t shirt design 

it's about parents (mostly moms) telling to pause the online game and i relate to it so hard...

like once i was playing CS:GO and i've been waiting for a match for 15 minuts and when i joined the match my mom shouted Katie come on down dinner is ready :| i said ""i'll come after this match"" and the golden sentence of my mom ""Just pause it!"" 

yea and i got competetive banned for 24 hours.",GirlGamers
Girls can win prizes for boys too,"Destroying the perception that girls rely on guys to win them prizes 😉 I'm really good at games (arcade games in particular) and I'm the one that always end up winning electronic goodies for my partner. I.e. PS4 console, gaming keyboard, gaming mouse, recently a streaming microphone 😁😁",GirlGamers
What are your thoughts on this? Playstation releases a PS1 mini with 20 pre-loaded games.,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - September 19, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
Captain Marvel trailer!!!!,,GirlGamers
More than the Male Gaze: In Defense of the First Lara Croft – But Why Tho?,,GirlGamers
Aye,,GirlGamers
Video Game Character Stares Impotently At Forbidden Realm Beyond Impassable Waist-High Bush,,GirlGamers
Is it Possible to Beat New Super Mario Bros. U Without Touching a Single Coin?,,GirlGamers
"[Rant] It's 2018, can I stop being accused of being carried?","It has been months since I've ranted regarding this subject but for some reason, this really has bothered me and I keep thinking about it. I've played video games since forever and have faced all the typical abusive, stalker, creepy, interactions you can think of for being a female so you'd think I'd be numb to it by now but this one really has bugged me so much I cannot sleep.


I (F23) play overwatch with my boyfriend (M31). He's higher SR but we can still play together. I play flex depending on what's needed. We've been playing this game since it's come out and has faced all forms of harassment on that game. As we all know Blizzard is trying to fix this 'toxic players' problem they are having with the commending and reporting system which I appreciate


Today during the first game we played, right away a solo player started being very loud and obnoxious. My bf left the voice chat because he didn't want to deal with strangers on the internet. I don't blame him. My bf was taking a break from studying for a test so I'm sure he did not want his bit of free time ruined. I stayed in chat because I was playing the healer (everyone else auto locked dps except 1 tank) and thought it's not a bad idea to try to communicate with the team.


In great OW fashion that solo player started bashing the team in the ""I'm not being toxic I'm giving constructive criticism tone"" I brushed it off and just went on playing and communicating as if things were normal. Nobody talked except him and myself. He kept making comments like ""Let me guess that's your F****** bf."" ""Tell him to switch F*** he's F****** really bad."" ""Why isn't he in chat."" ""Is he mad? I bet he's mad. He's F****** toxic and throwing."" I told the guy no, that my bf was going to play what he deems is right for this team comp (he flexs as well).


""Well he f****** sucks tell him to switch"" I didn't play into his aggression and at this point should've left myself but then he threatened to report the both of us for throwing, and said ""I bet he's mad at you. Why else would he throw? I bet he's tired of carrying his girlfriend."" 


That last line made me see red. Calmly I told him ""You know, you're here telling people they play awful when it's a TEAM game. We all have to work together. You claim WE are toxic and accusing my BF of being mad at me. That's just really sad. I'm not telling him how to spend his free time. Please feel free to report me or him for 'throwing' but there's a reason why we don't have fresh accounts. I am reporting you for abusive communication and I hope the rest of the team who are silently here see that as well."" I reported him and with much satisfaction a few hours later I got a ""Thank you for reporting this player. Actions have been taken"" message from Blizzard. 


This is not the first time people say I'm being carried by some male I qued up with, of course, they are always 100% wrong and in some eye-rolling circumstances, I was clearly the higher rank doing the 'carrying'. What made me sick to my stomach was the fact that he thought my bf was MAD at me because he 'wasn't listening'. WTF kind of delusional world does this guy live in. Also, why is he okay harassing people like this over a video game is beyond me.


TLDR: Toxic player accusing me of being toxic gets banned.",GirlGamers
I finally got a Switch... AND BOTW...,"And I could CRY it's so beautiful and amazing. I've barely scratched the surface on this game and I'm obsessed. Ocarina of Time was my favorite forever, it couldn't be touched. But this... O\_O   


I'm just shocked by the game and I can't believe I haven't played it until now. I'm playing it AS SLOWLY as possible to savor it all lol.   


Also , this is one of my first posts, I think?? I can't remember. It's been so long since I signed up and/or looked at this thing. I hope I'm doing all this right.   


So... HI!!! ",GirlGamers
Look at the official KH3 Cover Art! It's so Pretty!!,,GirlGamers
"""#IGotYourBack"": Senior women in games offer their protection and guidance to newcomers if they find themselves in uncomfortable situations at industry events",,GirlGamers
New to the sub but not to the struggle,"Hello everyone I'm new here just dawned on me today to search and see if there was a girl gamer subreddit and low and behold here we are. I also wanted to know if anyone else has a pet peeve automatically being Male in a game? I find it so refreshing when they have a female option, I dont know about you gals but I blankly stare at the screen for a few minutes on RPGs when the female flirts with my Male character (esp when I'm like WHAT FEMALE SAYS THAT?!?!)",GirlGamers
Make Your Choice,,GirlGamers
"As a POC, I get more and more discouraged with the gaming community","This is a slight rant but it is one that has been boiling underneath the surface for a long time. With the conversation over the Witcher casting call at an absolute head, I feel like it is important for me to just get this all out there. A bit of background, I am an African-American woman (double whammy) in America in an inter-racial relationship with a White man. I have been an avid lover of all things geek since I was a child. My Dad introduced me to LOTR, I grew up playing tons of video games, and I literally worshipped the Harry Potter series. But I was always painfully aware that no one in any of these areas looked like me. Fine, whatever, keep moving along. Fast forward today and it seems like any sort of progress we make at diversification has been met with absolute vitriol. The word diversification is probably causing some circle jerk Redditor to foam at the mouth as we speak. I get it. Ciri is white. She is polish. So people want her depicted that way, right? But why is it that authenticity is only preserved for these specific areas? I don't know about anyone else, but when a white actor is taking the role of someone that was POC in the book/movie, normally the conversation is just, ""oh well, the best person got the part!"" As if ScarJo really was the best person for Ghost in the Shell?! Why is it that these groups and fandoms and gamer circles smugly talk about how POC and or women just aren't that interested in xyz but then make the environment completely unwelcome for any of us to be involved?! My bf and I were looking for nerdy inter-racial couples and could come up with like two? I know that if I cast myself as some black Elena that the fandom will LITERALLY EXPLODE. How do I know this for sure? Because I've seen it happen time and time again. But there are only so many times that I want to dress up as Gamora. When I play online and want to use comm, I specifically feel like I should have my boyfriend there. As a white male, it seems like he shields from the excessive racist sexism I receive when in comm alone. I just don't get it. I guess at the end of the day, I just wish people would just admit they don't want to diversity their fandoms because they don't like minorities and I wish they would just say how they want women to be half dressed in games because they don't respect women. It's frustrating to have to hear someone complete mental gymnastics to explain how not wanting diversity in their fandom isn't racist. It is. Quit with the respectability politics and just call it what it is. This reddit is literally the only thing that keeps me feeling sane. There is always a sense of calm conversation that isn't just littered with screams of ""SJW"" and ""FEMINAZI"". Thank you for existing.",GirlGamers
My Final Fantasy X Nails,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - September 18, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"Just got a Switch - Need Game Recs, please :)","In anticipation of Diablo 3 being ported to the Switch I went out and bought a Switch over the weekend.  I've been eyeing a portable gaming device for a bit and this seemed like a good time to take the plunge.

I bought Breath of the Wild new and Bayonetta 2 used.  Since Bayonetta 2 was used, I'm testing it out this week to see if I like it and if not, I can return it.  I'm on the fence - I feel like I should be offended by this game, but I'm also kind of liking it.

As for recommendations:  I have an Xbox1 and my favourite games (aside from Diablo 3 which I can't seem to stop playing lol) are anything Bioware puts out (Dragon Age, Mass Effect, KOTOR).  Those are the only games I've played to finish.  I prefer DA to ME only because I'm not a huge fan of shooters (skill reasons, nothing else).  I did also buy Assassins Creed Origins this weekend and played enough to know I will like it.

On the iPad my favourite games are DragonVale, Cradle of Empires, and Sims Freeplay.

With Switch Games being so expensive, I am reluctant to go out and just buy games and see if I like them. 

Thanks!!


ETA:  You people are awesome!  I've got a lot to look up and research.  I think Stardew Valley will be my next purchase though.  It's seems rather calming and hopefully something I can play for 30mins or so here and there instead of a massive time sink.",GirlGamers
Where do you get your set ups?,"Hi, Mac user here. I'm pretty tired of just playing console games and want to migrate more into PC gaming, so I would like to start saving for a cool set up. Problem is, I have NO IDEA where to buy anything cute/girly. Keyboard, monitor, tower, etc. Do I go to best buy? Order online? Please help a sister out I really want to have an adorable battle station like everyone else",GirlGamers
"Not strictly gaming related, but I haven't really watched anime in 10+ years. Time to get nostalgic.",,GirlGamers
I recently moved apartments and updated my computer setup a bit (Pink/Mint),https://imgur.com/a/5Y9nBbY,GirlGamers
Ubisoft leak?,I've had two emails in the last 12 hours about suspicious activity on my Ubisoft account. What gives?,GirlGamers
"how/where have you found success in avoiding racism, sexism, toxicity in social VR?","I tried searching for Virtual Reality specific post along these lines, but all attempts have failed. I hope I'm not missing something!

&amp;#x200B;

TLDR: how/where have YOU found success in avoiding racism, sexism, toxicity in VR? What are your experiences, and what solutions might you have found to any adversary you might have experienced in VR?

&amp;#x200B;

I've sort of fallen off the VR wagon, and I want to get back into things, but I'm having (what i imagine is a common issue) finding social VR games that aren't the worst with randoms. For a short while in 2016 RecRoom was really pleasant to jump in and chat with strangers. It seemed like VR was a promising alternative to the often disastrous state of the larger ""gaming community"", but that doesn't seem to be the case anymore, maybe because of its increase in popularity.

&amp;#x200B;

Alternately, a friend of mine convinced me to play VRChat on my Vive for the first time, which went passably for 3 hours, until the pleasant stranger I was hanging out with asked me if I was a \*insert racial expletive\*, which seemed to trigger some sort of cascading effect of awful in the immediate area, drawing transphobic, sexist, and racist sentiments out from the people around me. It was like the cork was out of the bottle. I logged out and never played again.

&amp;#x200B;

I've found myself at an impasse here. I really like social VR games. There is something magical about playing ping pong with some person who's on the other side of the planet, or chatting with strangers without us all making assumptions about each-other because of appearances, but now I'm a little afraid to put on my Vive.

&amp;#x200B;

How do YOU do it? What are your experiences, and what solutions might you have found to any adversary you might have experienced in VR?

&amp;#x200B;

Full disclosure, I am a he; I just trust that if anyone has some decent answers to this question, its the good people here.",GirlGamers
"Cute, feminine username","I really need help thinking of a new username. I want it to be cute and girly, kinda like a fluffy kitten ~ my name is Luna, I love playing overwatch, my favorite color is pink, my favorite animal is a cat, 

Any help would be great :3",GirlGamers
my boyfriend got me a cute custom xbox controller for our one year! :),,GirlGamers
I have a problem..,"Heyo! This is concerning a problem that's been getting on my nerves for the past few years. I am 15 years old and female and I've found that my voice is very well more child-like than anything. I'm aware I'm still going through puberty, but even during middle school I noticed that most other girls' voices sounded more feminine than mine. My friends that I know irl say that my voice fits me and my age, but playing games online, I'm sometimes mistaken anywhere from 10-14 years old. I hate my voice because people think of me like a little sister/brother rather than a girl. How do I cope T^T",GirlGamers
Desk recommendations?,"Hallo fellow girl gamers! Deferring to your better judgement for some good desk recommendations as I've just moved apartments and need to build a new battle station. Wanted to ask for recommendations in this subreddit as I'm hoping to find something with a bit of design - maybe something with a shallow drawer in the front? I've been looking at a lot of all white ones

&amp;#x200B;

For dimensions I was thinking something 47""x23"" (as I live in NYC so space is limited) but lmk if you think that's a mistake!",GirlGamers
"Dead or Alive 6's ""Strongest"" edition includes sexualised female characters on mouspads and a dakimakura cover as pre-order bonuses in Japan",,GirlGamers
Animal Crossing is coming to Nintendo Switch next year!,,GirlGamers
"TIL there was an American animated series of my favorite fighting game franchise, Darkstalkers. It was absolutely terrible.",,GirlGamers
Korean law proposed to punish sexual harassment from voice chat in online games,,GirlGamers
I’m a lesbian because I didn’t reply to him...,,GirlGamers
[Venting] I don't know what to do anymore.,"Hello all, I just started to use reddit as I found it's pretty useful way for the gaming community but aside from that I just really, *really* don't know what to do anymore; I've lost my will to game. My name is Chelly and I'm 26, playing video games since I was a kid. Recently last year a lot of emotional trauma has happened, causing me to pull away from working and maintaining my social life and I started to get back into my video game addiction like I'm a teenager again. Long venting story short, I've made a few friends since last year online, a girl and two guys. However a couple months ago when I rekindled with an old gaming friend who I desperately needed for support (we had a fight; she dropped everything and came back to my side regardless of everything) things started to change. 

Both of the guys I met liked the one girl in my group, and from a big fight that happened the girl was jealous of my relationship with my older friend (we're like two peas in a pod). Apparently this other girl felt like we were best friends, and my older gaming friend was taking me away. This ended up causing chaos after chaos, *after chaos of drama* and since the two guys liked this girl they took her side and basically there was this huge divide in my friendship. I decided since the last two weeks, the three of them have been ignoring myself and my boyfriend and not playing video games with us and playing the same game together, setting their statuses on discord as ""do not disturb"" that I just would let them go and kick them. For the past year since all of my emotional breakdowns, they've been in my life everyday playing video games, talking and whatnot. I deleted them from all my platform friends lists, and since then my old gaming friend now has something going on and does not want to talk after all this has happened, that ""new friends would do me and my bf some good.""

I know this might be confusing to everyone, I have literally no one in my life to vent to. No friends anymore to talk to, I know with my major depression I've pushed a lot of people away I just don't know how to approach anything anymore. Seeing ""GirlGamers"" I felt like some of the girls here (even the guys that are here too) would understand me in some way. My drive to play anything has died; playing Overwatch today I couldn't even get into a match, turning on Monster Hunter World and I couldn't even do an investigation. I just am so angry, frustrated, and upset about everything and with no one to talk to, I sound like a whiny little 11 year old.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm in a relationship and honestly?? I really hate the fact that my ""ex""guy friends would rather chase tail (because she would flirt with them) then have friendships. *Sigh.*",GirlGamers
Women in Games: Man wins Best Presenter Award,,GirlGamers
OC Book Cover for my D&amp;D Book,"Book Cover by me: I've been slowly making a Book of all my Homebrew for D&amp;D 5e which I have a Patreon for and I got around to making some art assets. I'm decently happy with this version but there are still a few tweeks here and there that I want to make. Its been a long and ongoing project to create dark morally gray additions for 5e but not making it Grim Dark. The whole project is an exploration of my depression and finding the joy in a bleak world. 

https://i.redd.it/0amnjv6cz9m11.jpg",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - September 14, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Stop saying women are catty within our own community.,"While perusing on another post I was shocked to see how many girls were saying the majority of females that are into gaming or are 'nerds' are catty and bitchy. They're not dude. Look at all the women in this subreddit, your generalization would apply to the majority of us, and it's just not true.

&amp;#x200B;

And if you do experience this take into consideration that maybe these women had a rough day, maybe you misunderstood something, or as harsh as it sounds, maybe you're just not good at socializing. As an introvert, I know I struggle with socializing a lot. Sometimes we harp so much about how the men are rude to us and how they undermine us or whatever, but look at how we treat ourselves sometimes. Treat people the way you want to be treated.

&amp;#x200B;

I am fully aware that there are exceptions, that maybe a small portion of women really are toxic or really do like being the 'queen bee'. I'm just so tired of always seeing women complain about other women in the gaming/nerd scene. Make friends with one another and celebrate your interests together, don't put each other down.

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: The whole ""I'm not like other girls"" mentality is dumb, I'm sorry. Everyone is already unique to themselves, no girl is like another girl. ",GirlGamers
"Diapers, Divorces, And Unstable Pay: Parents On Twitch Struggle To Strike A Balance",,GirlGamers
[Venting] Pretty upset. Riot have basically told me they can ban me for calling myself a lesbian.,"EDIT: Hooray! Everyone being so supportive and the wonderful rioters I've spoken to have managed to fix stuff and I get to have my name back! Thanks guys &lt;3


Long story short, I had the name Captain Deadpool on league for ages and everyone considered me a man, even when I spoke in voice chat. I got pretty much minimal flaming and you know, I got to honor 5, I don't really type in chat, whatever.

Changed my name last week to Lesbian Jinx because I'm a gay woman, I love Jinx, she's coded as gay to me. I basically got homophobes reporting me all week and I got a forced name change. Changed it to Lesbian Ahri, was pretty pissed off. I got an email from riot saying 'we should have banned you because any name that's considered offensive by the community is therefore offensive' but that isn't in the community guidelines. Overall, I just feel insanely disrespected. How is my existence as a gay woman offensive and why should I censor myself because the incels don't like it? I'd post this on the League reddit but I'd just get ignored like I have done on twitter. I dunno, I just feel so sad being shit on by a game I've really loved for such a long time.",GirlGamers
A kind soul from the Sailor Moon subreddit just informed me of this Etsy shop - anime and game inspired pet collars!!!,,GirlGamers
"Women working in gaming, what cool shit are you doing?","I run a small casual gaming studio, and I had a shitty time at a game dev conference today... same sexist crap I see too often.... But! I would love to hear stories of how this industry is changing for the better - or just women being awesome and making amazing things. Please!! Tell me!",GirlGamers
Sailor Dva watercolour by moi,,GirlGamers
Fill Out the Official D&amp;D Survey to Make Sure the Perspective of Girl Gamers Is Fully Heard,,GirlGamers
Female and/or LGBTQ WoW YouTubers?,"Hey everyone! 


I’ve recently started watching World of Warcraft content on YouTube after stumbling upon a video and getting hooked, and I’m looking for recommendations because I currently only really watch two channels: 

Taliesin &amp; Evitel (they’re husband and wife and everything they do is great tbh) and Hazelnutty (super helpful videos, raid guides etc. and she’s adorable)

I would love any suggestions you ladies might have for me, I should add that they don’t necessarily have to be strictly WoW focused, if they play other games as well as WoW then that’s cool too! 

Thanks! ",GirlGamers
"Riot Games Says It Wants To Clean Up Its Mess, But The People Who Made It Are Still There",,GirlGamers
UK-based Female Gamers,"Who are some good, UK-based female video game streamers either on Twitch or YouTube? Ignoring all the obvious ones, I'm looking more for someone new to follow and quite like discovering up and coming people so I can boost my hipster cred. Any suggestions?",GirlGamers
Hard to find girl gamer friends,"Hey ladies! Anyone else have trouble making friends with other women? I find it hard to meet girls who love video games and anime as much as I do. All of my friends are pretty much guys. It kind of bugs my boyfriend, totally understandable, but it’s not like I choose to not have chick friends. I just can’t really find any to relate to. Anyone else have this issue? :/",GirlGamers
Looking for recommendations!,"I'm on maternity leave until the end of the year, and in between nursing sessions while baby is using me as a bed, I'm doing some gaming. I've got a switch and PS4 (and a 3ds but rather not invest any more in that), and I'm looking for game suggestions!

I prefer games with more colorful graphics and given that I have a tiny human sprawled on my chest, preferably things that don't require quick reactions! Things I loved recently to give an idea: Pokémon, stardew valley, slime rancher, Thimbleweed park, Steamworld dig, Mario odyssey... I follow Nintendo releases more closely, but I have no idea what exists on the PS4 that could fit the bill! ",GirlGamers
I can't play Destiny 2 and it really makes me so sad,"A bit of a rant.. I have had chronic migraines for years, and one of the triggers is flashing lights or flickers - like strobe lights. My SO has been playing it a lot and I can't even be in the same room as him when he plays because the game has been such a migraine trigger. Destiny has a ton of bright flashing lights and especially contrasts of dark areas with the bright flashes of Sci fi gunfire. 

It has so many raving reviews but I can't play it. I'm so grumpy and sad about it. I wish more game developers would pay attention to that aspect of gaming. Sure you can put a health and safety warning but how about also trying to be mindful for the way the game can affect people's health? 

I know gamers with migraines is a niche market to cater to but still. 🙁",GirlGamers
"Jake from Houston Outlaws on women in esports: ""Virtually everyone in Esports (myself included) would love for the sport to embody a perfect meritocracy wherein the best of the best are rewarded for their talent and dedication in precise measure. The reality, however, is much less rosy.""",,GirlGamers
for the swarm for kerrigan,,GirlGamers
"We’re the ladies of Kitfox Games, creators of Boyfriend Dungeon. Ask us anything!","Hi r/GirlGamers, we’re Kitfox Games from Montreal, Canada! We’re a team of 8 and over half of us are women. :)  Ask us anything about our games, being women in the industry, game-making… anything!

**OUR GAME(S)**  
[Boyfriend Dungeon](http://www.boyfrienddungeon.com/) is a dating sim/dungeon crawler mashup in which the weapons you use transform into beautiful people -- capture their hearts to level them up in this “shack-and-slash” adventure! Our [Kickstarter ends in 4 days, so check it out!](https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/kitfoxgames/boyfriend-dungeon-date-your-weapons)

We’ve also made Moon Hunters, Shattered Planet, and are publishing Six Ages and The Shrouded Isle.

--------
The team today:

Tanya X. Short (Captain and Designer) - /u/tanyaxshort or [@tanyaxshort](https://twitter.com/tanyaxshort)

Victoria Tran (Community Dev) - [@TheVTran](https://twitter.com/TheVTran)

[Follow Kitfox Games on Twitter](https://twitter.com/KitfoxGames)  
[Join our Discord](https://discord.gg/kitfoxgames)

---
EDIT: We're done! Thanks for much for asking questions. :) Follow us on Twitter for more sword smooching and meanwhile... keep. Being. AWESOME!",GirlGamers
Women who met their partner or tried dating someone through games they played...mind telling us about it?,kinda just wondering how that worked out. i'm crushing on someone at the moment in a game I play and he was thinking of booking a flight to come visit from Germany...so yeah nervous and excited I guess but ultimately wondering if anyone here has done that.,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - September 12, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
I just found out about Calico - a game about magical girls running cat cafés and befriending animals,,GirlGamers
I wanted to show off my new setup! I'm trying out Dva as a holder for my cat cam. Fingers crossed it works!,,GirlGamers
The Juxtaposition of Girls in Games vs. Movies/TV.,"Is it just me or is there some kind of severe disconnect among men (young and older) that can cheer on movies like Wonder Woman or shows like Jessica Jones where there's so much praise by these men in r/movies etc. and then turn around and be so horrible to women playing games?

This was pointed out in recent posts about [Riot Games](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/9e0907/league_of_legends_players_being_against_womenonly/), examples from [Rainbow Six](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/9eomr9/for_rainbow_six_siege_players_here/), and the [Battlefield Beta](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/9ehlmv/played_the_bf_v_beta_the_bf_community_is_ugh/).  Among may other examples.  

I play to relax after work or a stressful day.  I hope that when a guy sits down to play they're in the same mindset and not starting up a game thinking ""I can't wait to harass the first female I see"".

So if we're both trying to unwind and enjoy a game, where does the switch come the second someone sees or hears a girl in a game?  Is there an actual psychological conditioning behind this?  Especially when, as I brought up above, so many of the same people can praise Gal Gadot or Daisy Ridley or Krysten Ritter for the roles they've played in very popular franchises?

We shouldn't be afraid to use a mic or play a game!  To be told to show ""bobs or vagene"" or to get in the kitchen or any number of other harassing behaviors.  Or, perhaps worse, be invalidated for simply existing and liking something when it has absolutely zero bearing on a internet stranger's existence.  

Nearly 40% of money spent on video games was by women in 2016 according to [Forbes](https://www.forbes.com/sites/kevinanderton/2017/04/25/the-business-of-video-games-how-much-is-being-spent-and-why-infographic/#658857736fe8) and it blows my mind a little that so much harassment is allowed by major companies when so much money is spent on their products by women.

Sorry for what turned out to be a rant.  I had a moment of frustration and now that I've typed it all out it feels better.  It's not like I'd be heard on r/battlefield or something.  I just can't figure it out...",GirlGamers
Anyone here a Wadjet Eye or Sunless Sea fan? Two of their writers/creators are teaming up to make a Vampire: The Masquerade inspired text RPG!,,GirlGamers
When I play mercy everyone is happy. When I play dps (doesnt matter who) everyone is pissed.,"Even if I have all the gold. Even if I'm carrying our team. No matter how many times I carry our team. No matter who I play or what I do my team is never happy when I play dps. There will always be 1 or 2 guys who call me out directly for no reason. They will switch to dps to spite me every time.

 I've never had someone tell me ""good job"". They love to tell me I'm trash tho. 

Also I've become more aware to the fact they will actively sabotage team comp in any game I'm not a healer. I love to play dps. I love carrying my team. And it feels like these guys are trying to take that away from me. When I play mercy everyone is happy! The whole tone of everything shifts to ""ahhh as things should be!"" Like what? 

I tried to defend myself about it once and the whole team was calling me toxic it was insane. 

It's actually quite ridiculous to watch happen consistently. I'm just curious what's happening here. Theres something more here right? I'm a trans girl. I dont use my mic at all. Is this sexism or what cause my gaming experience wasnt like this before and I haven't even changed anything. My name is ""clarevoyant"". Are they assuming my gender and getting pissed that I'm not playing my ""role""? I've read a little on the overwatch subreddit about how some men hate women that play or who they play.

I usually wouldn't care. I've been playing online fps games since I was a kid and have never dealt with this before. Its confusing ",GirlGamers
"My Terraria buns! I love them so much, I have one tattooed on my arm.",,GirlGamers
"Assassin's Creed Odyssey, Bi Visibility and a very different kind of Power Fantasy",,GirlGamers
Any Fallout girls here? How are you feeling about 76?,"I’m personally looking forward to it but dreading the online aspect of it and was genuinely hoping to get an all girl crew going if there’s anyone out here that might be up for it? I stick to RPG’s and like my solo game play, but as a huge Fallout fan I really don’t want to miss out on a potentially good game and would feel a lot more comfortable having a unit where we can all trust each other. 
What are your concerns about 76? What would you like to see?
",GirlGamers
The Other Side of the Spider-Man Proposal Story,,GirlGamers
"This dude ruined our GTA export mission because I wouldn't respond to his random ""U have mic?"" friend requests. Decided to fire back for once.",,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - September 11, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"Waypoint Review: 'Shadow of the Tomb Raider' Tries, but Fails, to Tackle Its Own Colonialism (mild spoilers)",,GirlGamers
Old Female Characters,"Just wondering if anyone can think of any awesome, older female characters in games. Bonus points if they're good guys, extra bonus points if they're the protagonist.  It seems that most old women in gaming are antagonists.  

When playing Dark Souls I deliberately made my character a badass old woman. Her name became Granny Gitgud. I loved the option of actually being able to make an ""unattractive"" character. Usually age sliders are like... ""young man"" vs ""old grizzled war veteran"" for dudes, and ""young woman"" vs ""young woman with the faintest of possible wrinkles if you squint just right"".  

The only actual designed character I can think of is from the newest Monster Hunter, &gt;!when you meet the awesome hunter right before the Odogaron fight.!&lt; What a badass. I loved that scene.  

&amp;#x200B;

But I'm coming up empty on any others. Recommendations, anyone?",GirlGamers
SOO nervous about meeting up with some friends I met through playing games next weekend!! Have any of you girls met up with friends you met online? What are your experiences and do you have any advice?,Hello girls!! I am nervous about meeting up with some friends online! Some of us have known each other for over a year. One of them we have known for a few months. There'll be 4 of us meeting in total! I am super comfortable talking to them online but I am worried about my actions in real life. Some of them have never seen what I looked like before and I am not sure if they will be disappointed or not? They are all guys!! I think that one of them plan on bringing his girlfriend but is not 100% sure. PLEASE let me know if any of you have gone through this!! We plan on possibly going hiking and eating dinner and playing by ear for the next day. Anyone know anything lowkey our group can do?? We are around our mid 20s! I am stressed even thinking about this!!,GirlGamers
Should I quit playing League of Legends?,"The first time I heard [~~@~~**Froskurinn**](https://twitter.com/Froskurinn) shoutcast gave me such a thrill in my heart - a woman's voice in eSports - killin' it!  LoL has been my game for the last 5 years and now I can't see anything LoL related without a sinking feeling in my gut because of all the misogyny.  

 League has been MY GAME the last 5 years - my flat is filled with merchandise and every device has splash art wallpapers.  I felt at home on summoner's rift except when I was regularly harassed because my name was obviously female.

 A friend at Riot helped me get a name change and once I changed to a gender-neutral name a lot of the harassment and lewd comments stopped, even if sometimes my mannerisms gave me away (quickly followed by ""are you a girl? do you have a boyfriend?!"" 

 It's more obvious than ever just how little most people understand about what's going on in the gender gap and how minorities and marginalised groups experience living in the world. I'm extremely disappointed in Riot's responses both to the Kotaku article and backlash from PAX 

 I know losing just one player isn't going to mean a lot to them but it means a lot to me. I'm losing a space that I've loved and lived in - I'm losing all the time and money I've invested into the game, and lost respect for an industry I thought could be something for me. 

 I know there are good employees at Riot.  I am praying with everything I have that Riot does what it does best, and finds a way to tell a better story about the games community that is inclusive and not color/gender blind, but celebratory. 

I was super excited by the future of eSports, truly thrilled and inspired by what the industry promises.  But after the responses by folks on the afternoon session for women and nb folks I feel absolutely sick about where [~~#~~**RiotGames**](https://twitter.com/hashtag/RiotGames?src=hash) is going... 

&amp;#x200B;

Quitting the game seems like the boycott response - but then I'm removing myself from the sphere that needs women involvement - I'm not really sure what to do.",GirlGamers
Why I think the gaming community is screwed for the forseeable future,"[Originally, I was going to post this in a reply to someone talking about how people were ""Reee-ing"" in r/witcher over a casting decision. It's semi-related, but also long and a bit off-topic. So now it's here. I feel like I'm at least partially right in my conclusion, but am open to feedback. Mostly because it's left me frustrated and a bit hopeless. In short, I want to be wrong but don't think I am.]

CD Projekt Red got into a rather minor bit of ""trouble"" recently on Twitter for using a memey joke that you typically find in anti-trans trolling (""Are you assuming their gender!?""). After they apologized (a bit backhandedly), the responses were mostly, ""Okay"" or ""That's not a great apology."" Pretty mild stuff, imo. Apparently, a few people were still really angry about the joke. However, for every one person saying ""okay"" or still mad, there were dozens who were shitposting stuff along the lines of ""I identify as an attack helicopter"" or ""stop appeasing SJWs."" 

Meanwhile, over on YouTube, a number of gamer personalities like LegacyKilla posted videos about ""the huge outrage"" over the joke. Pretty much every one of those videos painted a picture of loads of people being *outraged* rather than some being mildly offended or annoyed (and a few being actually outraged), painted it as a *massive* deal when most gaming sites didn't even bother covering it, and essentially toed this line of not being anti-trans while, at the same time, totally dismissing the reason anyone was offended in the first place. The commenters, unsurprisingly, were in the same boat as the ones on Twitter. A mix of anti-LGBT/anti-""SJW""/""people need to stop getting offended,"" etc.

Thing is, those videos try to appear *relatively* unbiased. As if they're presenting a situation in which they could be convinced of someone's error but ultimately aren't. (They typically give themselves away pretty fast, if you know anything of the alt-right. Nevermind that they're critiquing Twitter/forum responses but never bother to examine the **actual** majority of responses that include outright homophobia and trolling.) Gamer personalities like that, videos like that, paint a picture of hordes of ""SJWs"" crying about nothing for no reason. That those SJWs are attacking vulnerable, defenseless people/companies and that they are the only ones saying anything (as opposed to what it usually is - a handful of people pointing out bullshit in the middle of a much bigger group supporting said bullshit - aka, what happened on r/witcher that caused someone to bring the issue over here after being downvoted to hell). It's a picture the GG folks like, but it's also one that helps introduce new individuals into an anti-critique and anti-diversity mindset. Once you've allowed yourself to be convinced that an ""SJW"" has no reasonable critique or logical explanation for anything, then you can dismiss anyone that gets labeled an ""SJW"" before they've ever even said anything.

The ""REEEE-ing"" won't end because a significant portion of gamers are more or less indoctrinated into the mindset of ""Anyone that critiques games/developers/etc about anything to do with race or gender is an SJW and all SJWs are just screeching, attention-seeking losers."" And they have entire sections of the internet reinforcing those views 24/7. Sections that don't typically self-critique and will twist themselves into knots to deny faults in their own side's logic (like how click-baity and thin LegacyKilla's video was, how it brought up James Gunn's firing without explicitly saying the alt-right was behind it, etc).

In short, just like in national politics, discussions about gaming is screwed because we no longer have objective reality anymore, just echo chambers and streamers/YouTubers that tell us how to think. And so long as the algorithms keep giving us what it thinks we want, we'll never have to worry about changing our minds. It's left me questioning whether I actually want to engage with other gamers in the future if most of them are like this. And it does **feel** like most of them are, even if a majority are very young and *might* grow out of it.

[And to clarify, what initially bothered me about this whole thing wasn't the legions of gross comments, it was that no one seemed to stop and wonder why these videos even existed in the first place. I saw it as, before I read a single comment, clickbait nonsense with really poor/no evidence of mass outrage.]",GirlGamers
For rainbow six siege players here,,GirlGamers
Finally got a console!,"Hi ladies!

I haven’t had a console in quite a long time. I’m so excited! I’ve done mostly pc games for the last few years (a mmo called Everquest in particular has been my crack since middle school). My pc is kinda getting outdated so my bf and I decided it was time to get an Xbox 1. I’ve always really liked madden so that’s basically the only game I have at the moment. 

Any suggestions on what y’all are liking on Xbox? I’ve generally played mmo games, counter strike wayyyy back when, Skyrim, fallout, etc... I’ve seen a few things about siege but just watched some of those videos on the crap girls deal with on that game that I’m not sure about it.

Happy to have found this sub!",GirlGamers
"I played Fortnite with my favorite streamer, Loserfruit, last night","and I still can't believe it. I've been a huge fan and supporter of hers since around March or so and heard about her during her Overwatch phase, but it wasn't until Fortnite that I grew to love and adore her. And last night, I was lucky enough to be able to win one of her Twitch subscriber games that was determined at random. I was freaking out when I saw that I won, and my brother and friends were freaking out and watching me and cheering me on and supporting me because I was SOO nervous and they know how much I love her. I'm talking, voice slightly shaking, hands shaking. I totally have a crush on her she's such a cute, soft, quiet, Australian streamer who is honestly the sweetest, down to earth thing in the world. 

But nerves aside, I talked to her in the time that we played together and joked around with her. She even said a couple of times (and her thousands of viewers as well) that I have a ""lovely voice"" (link: https://clips.twitch.tv/JoyousShinyMuleDatBoi) and I was fangirling so hard. She's still on my Fortnite friends list, and I got some followers on my channel, and Loserfruit's friends all said I'm ""incredibly sweet and cute"" and invited me to talk to them more. 

What an amazing night last night. Still feels so surreal. It's something so small, but I don't fangirl that often, or at least not since I was a teenager. I missed it, honestly. Makes me feel like a kid again (even though I'm only 20 LOL)

Just a random drabble, but it's been making me smile all day and rewatching her vod from last night makes me happy. (:",GirlGamers
Even at my lowest I like to color coordinate,,GirlGamers
Played The BF V Beta.. The BF Community Is Ugh..,,GirlGamers
Game list,I been looking for more female lead game and I found this list. I though some might like it. https://www.fanatical.com/en/blog/female-video-game-characters-that-kick-ass-on-pc,GirlGamers
AMA with the ladies of the Kickstarter 'Boyfriend Dungeon' -- Tuesday 9/11 at 4pm EST,"Come join us here on /r/GirlGamers on **Tuesday, September 11th at 8pm GMT/4pm EST/1pm PST** for an AMA with Tanya Short and Victoria Tran of Boyfriend Dungeon!

Tanya is the captain and creative director of Kitfox Games, which is creating a new dungeon crawler/dating sim called Boyfriend Dungeon that has led a successful kickstarter (which ends in just a few days!). Victoria is the community developer over at Kitfox. Kitfox itself is a team of 8 in which over half (5/8!) of the staff are women.

Start thinking of some questions to ask about the game or about Tanya and Victoria's experiences as women in the industry!

Details on the game can be found here: https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/kitfoxgames/boyfriend-dungeon-date-your-weapons

Be on the lookout on Tuesday for the official AMA thread! Please save your questions for that thread and keep any excitement/logistical questions for this thread.",GirlGamers
Having a bunch of cats means I have to do the tedious job of cleaning my keyboard more often then I like D:,,GirlGamers
Tired of being expected to talk,"This is probably going to come across as a really petty rant, I don't know, but I kind of dislike how popular Discord has become. Like, practically everyone has their own server. I think the software itself is great, but now there seems to be, (at least to me) this expectation that if I'm playing a video game with you, I'll join your Discord. 

&amp;#x200B;

So obviously I'm pretty much an introvert, but I really just don't feel comfortable sometimes using a voice chat. I'm perfectly fine using text chat, but I'm really insecure about my voice. However! I love to make friends and play with random people online, I've made some online gamer friends that have turned into real, close friends. Anyways, I used to play League a ton in the past, now only occasionally, and I would always add people who seemed friendly or who I had good synergy with. Years ago though, before Discord was popular (or maybe even existed idk) I'd add guys and we'd just play, talk in-game, maybe make some jokes. The occasional creep, but the point is that most of the time, we were just gaming buddies. If I saw them on, I might invite them to a game, I might not, and vice versa. I rarely had people asking me to join their Teamspeak or Raidcall, or whatever, and if they did, it was usually after some time, after we've gotten to know each other a bit. 

&amp;#x200B;

Nowadays though, It seems like most guys I end up adding (mostly on league but I've had some problems on overwatch too) will immediately send me an invite to their Discord. I'm not really offended by it, but that's not how I roll. If I do join, I'd just be really quiet and probably awkward while the rest of the guy's dudebros carry on, make offhanded comments about my gameplay, conveniently forget that I'm in the channel with them, etc. Not to mention how a lot of Discord servers have really weird stuff going on in them. I joined one where they would just put their awkward fetish porn in whatever channel they pleased, and if they though it was really good, they'd tag it with @everyone.

 So now, I just politely decline. Nope, sorry dude, just don't feel like joining your discord. This has happened a bunch of times, and only a few times were they just okay with it. Other times, they would pester me about it or invite me to it repeatedly, sometimes they would just treat me differently, and of course, I've also been harassed about it. It just seems to me that now there is this expectation to go and join your Discord, because its so easy and accessible.. why not? I just miss the days where not everyone had a voice server and where guys wouldn't invite me to theirs so casually. I don't know, is it just me, or do some of ya'll feel the same way? This is mostly based from a handful of experiences of of League, but maybe someone has had similar experiences. Anyhow, sorry for the vent and the wall of text, this went on for longer than expected.",GirlGamers
Dead by Daylight messages,"So recently Dead by Daylight went free with ps plus and iv really been enjoying playing as the killer as I'm pretty jumpy and a bit of a wimp when it comes to any horror.
Going the killers gives me the chance to do the spooking and not getting spooked.

Since playing iv had countless messages from salty players who lose to me. Has it always been like this or is a recent thing? 

If a game upset me as much as it did these people I certainly would not play it, it's just insane playing when you cannot handle losing once in a while. Seems every few matches I'm messaged.

 I'm not letting them put me off the game as this is their problem not mine but it's sure tiresome.

Do any of you have this problem when playing DbD?",GirlGamers
Thought you all would appreciate this too!,,GirlGamers
Curious about a new laptop for gaming and art,"Long time lurker, first time posting (I always get nervous I won’t be posting correctly in any subreddit I follow)

Anyway! I’ve been saving some money and have been trying to find a good laptop that would run Steam games and possibly WoW smoothly, but also something that could handle heavy art programs like Photoshop, Illustrator, and InDesign since I seriously miss doing both digital art and gaming. I was working on a MacBook Pro for maybe 10 years and it’s about time to replace it since it for something more suitable.

I wish I had room for a desktop, especially after seeing everyone’s setups which I’m wicked envious about, but that may have to wait. I feel more comfortable asking here than I do most of my computer savvy guy friends who talk circles around me since I feel I’ve become so computer illiterate.

I appreciate any help or suggestions!",GirlGamers
My journey to find girl gamers,"I find it so hard to find gamers who are female. I'm not very open with my gaming obsession. The last person I told was a guy at work who then proceeded to say that games on my phone don't count and asked if I was a lesbian...for the record I live a simple life work full time hang out with my handful of good friends am straight and in my late 20s. Not that any of that should matter.
I wanted to join to interact with people who enjoy gaming and hopefully browse a happy space free of judgement! 
Just to add I know not all blokes are this closed minded it was just an awkward experience I had and I wanted to vent.

Much love to all keep on gaming ladies 

ALSO I CAN'T WAIT TIL SHADOW OF THE TOMB RAIDER COMES OUT!

What games are you all looking forward to this year? ",GirlGamers
Is Ciri from the Witcher white in the books? (analysis),"Hi! Ciri, one of the main protagonists from the witcher series has been recently annouonced to be casted as a BAME (black/asian/minority/ethnic) person in the Netflix series.

 As everyone in /r/witcher seems to be all up in arms about Ciri being 100% canonically white I thought I would present another point of view on this case that might not be necessarily in line with that.

I am a fan of both books and the games and I also happen to be polish so i can understand the source material and the context (as can any polish person). I've tried posting to /r/witcher but I just get downvoted to hell so I thought I would try posting here.

First of all Ciri is white in the games - this isn't really up for debate. That's why probably most people identify with Ciri being white, it's understandable. Is Ciri white in the books though? Let's see.

**How Did Ciri Look like in the books?**

The books are pretty vague about her skin colour. What most (English speaking) people seem to quote is this fragment from Sword of Destiny

&gt; “She had fair hair, ashen white complexion and large impetuous green eyes”

 Sword of Destiny page 416. 

Most people think ""white complexion"" is about her skin colour which is actually false but I can see how it could be interpreted like that from the context. However what the quote is talking about is just her hair ""fair hair - ashen white complexion"". Here is the same quote from the original books in polish:

&gt; Miała jasne, mysiopopielate włosy i wielkie, jadowicie zielone oczy. 

Quote taken from: http://wiedzmin.wikia.com/wiki/Ciri/Opisy_z_ksi%C4%85%C5%BCek_i_gier

From this quote it is very clear that Sapkowski (the Author of the book series) is talking just about her hair (literally fair and mouse-like) and her green eyes. 
 
As I said the books are pretty vague about her ethnic appearance. The best we can get is that she was descibed as pale, green eyed and having ashen hair - none of those attributes can tell us anything about her ethnic background. Being pale doesn't necessarily equal white as it only describes the lightness of the complexion (same as tan doesn't mean ""black""). Especially in polish the word for pale (which is ""blady"") means more that person looks anemic/ill or light-shaded. As for the ashen-grey hair, it doesn't exist naturally in the real world among children. That's why it's literally a fantasy and doesn't very well translate to the real world, eh?

**Ciri's parents &amp; isn't Ciri ""polish"" or ""Slavic""?**

The books state that Ciri has elven blood on her mother's side and on her father's side she is Nilfgardian. Nilfgaard is described as Southern Kingdoms in the books (as opposed to the Northern Kingdoms who are being invaded by Nilfgaardian Empire.) If you wanted to make an allegory to Europe Nilfgaard would be Spain, France and the like and Nothern Empires would be England, Germany, Poland etc. Spanish or Mediterranean people in general have more darker complexion than people from Northern Europe. Either way this comparison isn't really relevant as again we're talking about a fantasy realm but it might be a bit useful to disprove the claim that Ciri is ""polish"" or ""northern"". I mean her full name is literally Cirilla Fiona Elen Riannon, that doesn't sound very slavic or polish, does it?

**Sapkowski**

Now what is undoubtedly polish is the Author. But that doesn't necessarily make every character in the book polish like, does it? There is a little piece of information about Sapkowski's opinion on casting BAME people as characters in the Witcher series -

&gt; She went on to say that the author of the Witcher books, Andrzej Sapkowski, told her himself that recognizing the diversity in her show would be honoring his intentions as a writer.

 https://kotaku.com/netflix-witcher-writer-tries-to-smooth-unfounded-racial-1825960625

""honoring his intentions as a writer"" - this isn't really surprising if you know the general context and message hidden in the books. Books (and games to an extent) show a world where discrimination against different races - Humans, dwarfs and Elves - is common. Sapkowski wanted to show how prejudice and discrimination can be destructive. Same goes for making a lot of strong female characters in the series - there is a lot of progressive messages hidden in the Witcher series. Ciri is also gay in the books, she even has a special tattoo reminding her of her girlfriend Misiles.

**""World of the Witcher is POLISH, therefore every person is white""**

Again the world isn't polish. It's loosely based on medieval Europe and includes a lot of myths from all over Europe, not only Poland. For example The Wild Hunt is actually a very Germanic myth. It also includes dragons, mutants, trolls, water hags, witchers and all kinds of different beings. I mean it's literally impossible in that world for Ciri to be non white...

Here is an interesting quote from an interview with Sapkowski about the boundaries in fantasy where he says:

&gt; Fantasy takes place neither in the past nor in the future. What do you mean you can't use a certain item or requisite because the people ""didn't know it"" in that times? Too many people see fantasy in that way now. it's a misunderstanding of the genre.

Source: https://sapkowskipl.wordpress.com/2017/03/13/rozmowa-z-andrzejem-sapkowskim/

Also hi everyone, this is my first post here! Sorry for a big wall of text. 

Edit: Seems like this post is being brigaded now - https://i.imgur.com/ufk9mXq.png (NSFW) Thank you for the gold and it was nice to talk with you in a civil manner without all the usual reddit circlejerking.",GirlGamers
Dysgraphia and Gaming [vent],"I talked about this on the discord already but I wanted to make an actual post about it. I have dysgraphia and hate how people treat others who have issues pushing buttons and admit it. I really struggle with both push to talk and push to mute, although push to mute is a bit easier. However, when I say I'm having issues, people range from dicks to just coming across as unfeeling. Part of it is my mechanical keyboard, but I've had people suggest push to talk when I'm having issues with push to mute (like if I specifically say the issue is pushing the button, idk how push to talk is any better) and probably the worst reaction I had was someone tell me smugly ""I just got used to pushing the button."" That's like telling someone with dyslexia ""I just got used to reading the right letters."" It holds me back a lot, but the thing I hate most about it is how people don't really understand it. Because of it I've been bullied by both peers and teachers, and it makes me feel like a ""fake"" gamer. I'll never be good because of it, but I can get decent. I just needed to vent, but if others have this or a similar issue I'd like to know how you cope. I know with dysgraphia it really depends on the gamer. One of my professors was a gamer with severe dysgraphia and he preferred controller vs keyboard and mouse, which is what I prefer. I can aim so much better with keyboard and mouse, but controller can really streamline the buttons for you. ",GirlGamers
"My SO's little brother immediately showed me women in Battlefield because he knew how excited I'd be, but then said that a lot of people were mad about it because women weren't actually in the war.","He was so excited to show me that Battlefield had women, even on the loading screen and not just hidden as an option. But he's seen youtubers he watches making a huge deal about how women shouldn't be in this game. 

How can I explain well to someone young (14) that if this is the only thing you complain about, it doesn't mean you're pro-realism, it just means that you're anti-woman?",GirlGamers
Hellblade: Senua's Sacrifice is a Steam Weekend Deal with 50% discount!,,GirlGamers
League of Legends players being against women-only League panel at PAX,"So at PAX West, Riot Games hosted sessions focused on supporting women and non-binary people (probably in response to the sexism exposed at the company earlier). To no one’s surprise, several people of our lovely League community were against that because men weren’t included FOR ONCE. They threw pretty big fits over this. Two Rioters responded against this backlash pretty aggressively over social media. One of them was Daniel Z Klein, a pretty known Systems Designer at Riot. 


Both of them got fired due to not following the policies. They were told not to engage with the public regarding this. Personally, I think it’s fair enough if they’re let go because of not following the company’s policies. What I’m frustrated about is the League community, especially the League subreddit right now. They’re crying about how it wasn’t fair that there were sessions meant for only women and non-binary people... and not men. 



Anyway, Chef Lu Bu made a sarcastic tweet in response to those crying for a men-only panel too. His tweet: https://m.imgur.com/3Nx0Gut


The Rioter Daniel Z Klein retweeted it. League subreddit’s response?! “Daniel Z Klein is tweeting that all male players need to die!”


Fucking facepalm. I really don’t know what to do with this community. ",GirlGamers
Rainy Night Switch Bed-tle Station. Time to lay flat on my stomach and play Iconoclasts &lt;3,,GirlGamers
Boyfriend gets upset when I play poorly?,"Hey all, I'm a girl who plays games and I met a guy about a year ago online through mutual friends. It was all fun and we started liking each other. We've been in a long-distance relationship. We always play games together and for the most part, it's fine. However, he gets upset/annoyed at me when I play badly or make a mistake in game. I'm not a competitive player, I play to have fun and talk with him because we can never have a conversation without any distractions on his side. He always has to be playing a game or watching a video on the side so he usually isn't focused on the topic and rambles useless things. That's the main reason why I try games he enjoys because otherwise, we can't hang out at all.

Him, on the other hand, is a competitive player. He likes to be on the top of rankings and win games. He gives me so much pressure when I play with him. When I make a bad play, he gets annoyed and questions me. ""Why did you do that?"" ""What were you thinking?"" ""Why didn't you do this, that, blahblah?"" I've mentioned to him numerous times that I dislike it when he questions my game play because I hate myself for doing it too. I know I'm not as good as he is, and I know I'll never be as good... but when he says those things, I feel unmotivated to keep playing with him. When I confront him, telling him that I don't think he should get annoyed or upset at me over a game, he tells me I shouldn't be getting upset at him because he was only upset for a few minutes. But no matter how long he was upset at me for, he still got upset at me over a game, which is the main reason why I get annoyed at him. He sometimes wouldn't even admit that he was upset/annoyed even though it's obvious he was.

Am I overreacting? It really brings my mood down and makes me feel like I'm not good enough to play with him. I usually look forward to playing games and talking to him, but when he tells me I'm bad, I just feel like I don't ever want to play with him again. He reasons that I just haven't played the games enough to be good at it. If he cared, shouldn't he be trying to motivate me instead of putting me down? Please let me know what you guys think!",GirlGamers
My first gaming keyboard! Once you go blue switch you never go back! (more info in comments),,GirlGamers
"[Twitter thread] following Riot scandal, the company engages a law firm specialized in union busting and fires employee threatened and harassed by neo-nazis",,GirlGamers
"I've never liked Princess Peach's design, and had an idea - I would love to hear from anyone who loves that character what makes her awesome!",,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - September 07, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
"Found this video to be interesting, thought I would share!",,GirlGamers
"Before my boyfriend and I started dating, we bonded over playing Portal co-op which led me to make this mug for him. 6 years later we're still playing multiplayer games together ☺",,GirlGamers
Safe Playstation Gamer groups?," I'm quite introverted and a shy but I love to game and make friends on the Ps4. Unfortunately guys are hard to read, being a girl on the Playstation.. I guess you all know how the story goes. Are there any groups I could join Preferably UK based where I can make more friends (Girls &amp; guys) and people to game and talk with regularly... without the usual harassment that comes with trying to be friendly?",GirlGamers
What would you want to see in a gaming club?,"Hello ladies!

I am the treasurer for a large gaming club at a college! I'm a WoC and while I love the club and find it really fun we are sorely lacking in diversity! I know that women and PoC are often put down in nerdy spaces so they are hesitant to join and I really want to reach out to those groups! I am lucky to attend a very friendly school and everyone in the club has agreed diversity is a huge issue but we aren't sure how to go about changing it. I know oftentimes these groups have been put down a lot for their interests so they don't even consider coming to our events.

We run events like board games night, video games, DnD, Warhammer, MTG, Nerf gun fights, and movie showings! All out events are beginner friendly and we even have free magic drafts and lend people Warhammer figures if they don't have them. We are also willing to create new events whenever we have enough interest!

What would make you want to come to a gaming club? Do you guys have any suggestions that will help new female members and PoC feel welcomed? Any input appreciated!",GirlGamers
The USB port on my Anne Pro broke so I upgraded to the new model. It is absolutely perfect.,,GirlGamers
Boss Fight Music,I love using boss fight music to amp up my activities like studying or work outs. Do you guys have a favorite playlist or game music? I also play pokemon music playlists on youtube when I want to relax and cook. ,GirlGamers
Very excited to get my first piece of my gaming PC in the mail today!!!,,GirlGamers
Reclaiming my gamer identity!,"Not sure if it’s okay to post this but it’s worth a shot!

I’ve (18f) always been a huge gamer and nerd all around, but when I started highschool I religiously hid it; a lot of my friends just weren’t into gaming and the groups of people who were, weren’t the friendliest or respectful. I also dated an abusive partner that mocked gaming as a whole, that really forced me to feel shameful about it and avoid being perceived as a stereotype (greasy, cringy gamer). 

This part January I got very sick, almost passed away and spent a month in my states children hospital and during that time I realized I shouldn’t be ashamed of something I love so dearly. In the past I struggled to find a healthy balance of gaming and responsibilities, I’d either completely unhealthily invest myself into games or just completely ignored them. 

Now I’ve found my perfect balance, in the evening for a few hours I’ll play games, and on weekends I might spend a bit more time; but most importantly I’m not afraid to be open about it, I’m considering purchasing a few figurines here and there when I’m able to become employed and I’m also considering starting streaming or a YouTube! 

I’m sure this sounds like inner monologue word vomit but I’ve just been very happy about it lately! I also owe a big thanks to my SO who encourages me to be myself:) 
",GirlGamers
"[Request] Want to get bf some kind of PC upgrade for a gift, any help?","I'm pretty bad at computer stuff so I'm not really sure what's considered good but my bf has had his pc for quite a while and I thought it would be nice to maybe gift him something to upgrade it but I don't really know where to start. He has an NVIDIA Geforce GTX 970, 6GB of RAM (so not much left) and an Intel Core i7 CPU (bear in mind I don't really know what's relevant here so I might just be sounding like an idiot lol). Any pointers would be much appreciated!
Edit: thank you for all your responses! Mega helpful &lt;3333",GirlGamers
"After Four Years, A Just Dance Streamer Hits The Breaking Point",,GirlGamers
Cosplayed Janna after maining her (when playing support) in season 3/4 - SaberCreative,,GirlGamers
Anyone play Armello?,"[Armello](https://armello.com/) is a great talking animal fantasy digital board game with dice rolling and card playing, jolly good art and music, and exciting or dreadful ruthlessness, as there can only be one new king or queen to rule Armello! The devs are involved with their player base, and come out with new updates (and bugs to be fixed :P) and dice skin collections. Right now they're working on a big 2.0 update that'll be released around the end of the year. My favorite heroes to play are Brun, Sana, Hargrave, River, Fang, but I enjoy a few of the others now and then as well. My headcanon successor to the throne is Sana.

I keep talking about Armellian things with some of my siblings, but none of them are as into as I am. Anyone here enjoy it? :D",GirlGamers
Katarina cosplay by @nascentiaa on instagram. Who loves to play this champion too? :D,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - September 05, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
Girl Gamer Communities In Sydney Or Aussie In General?,"Hi there lovely folks on this thread! :D 

Not sure if this is allowed as I'm looking for external links? I'm currently doing a uni project on Australian women in gaming, and I'm having trouble looking for girl gamer communities or personalities in Sydney (or Australia) to reach out to. I would really appreciate it if anyone could refer some active FB groups or communities to me? I also want to join these for my personal reasons as it's been difficult finding peeps to talk or game with since I've been here. D:

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks so much everyone! &lt;3 ",GirlGamers
Nice to see the new Spider-Man game doing some equal opportunity fan service! 💦 (suit spoilers),,GirlGamers
EGX - Birmingham UK,"Just thought I’d ask as there’s quite a fe good games that they are displaying this year but are any ladies going to EGX in the UK on the 21st -23rd?

I went for the first time ever last year and going again this year with a couple of girls I made friends with playing online PS4 and switch :
If you are going we should totally do a gathering  it’s always lovely meeting and getting to know female gamers 😁. ",GirlGamers
Finally followed my dream and cosplayed as Lara Croft!,,GirlGamers
Thoughts for a newbie?,"Anyone have suggestions for a brand new gamer? Need an Xbox game that's easy-ish to start with and would like to start building a chill group of other female gamers to hang with. 

I'm totally new to this so any thoughts or sharing of experiences helps! The only video game I've really gotten into in the past was Need for Speed. I'd like to get into more tactical, fantasy, or strategic games but feel a bit lost and intimidated.

Thanks!",GirlGamers
"Headset cable management tips, anyone?","# Who ain't frustrated by the cables getting stuck with the legs of your computer chair and stuff? 

\- Well i know i am! I kinda don't want to get cordless headset so i'm just wondering if you ladies have any nice organization/management tips for those nasty cords? 

Pics would be so nice!   


&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/spxw1vwlfbk11.png",GirlGamers
Strategy games?,"We never seem to talk about strategy games—my favorite genre—much around here. 

What’ve you been playing?  What do you like / dislike about it?  Would you suggest it to somebody else?",GirlGamers
"Suggestions for FPS games to play with my dad? (We only have one console, must be split-screen for two or more)","My dad recently approached me asking if I knew any console shooter games that we could play together. The only game I have that we can play split-screen is Minecraft, and he said that he thought that was boring and wanted a shooter game. I only play Overwatch, Fortnite, and Gigantic so I didn't really have anything for split-screen use. I tried searching for some good FPS  games, but I can't find any good split-screen ones and I only have one console, and he's not gonna buy another one for himself, so we're going to have to play together on the console with two controllers. Does anyone have any suggestions? Nothing too violent please (no excessive gore or anything like that).",GirlGamers
This gave me a bit of a laugh,,GirlGamers
Me with makeup vs. Me without makeup,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - September 04, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"This is sad. Girls against other girls, don’t we have enough trouble already with guys?",,GirlGamers
"For all you Hordies, I finished up this alcohol ink painting",,GirlGamers
"How do you beat ""post-game depression""?","I just finished my first run of Xenoblade Chronicles 2. I have plenty of side content and DLC to look forward to, not to mention NG+, but I am still sad that the first experience is done. I really, really love this game.

I'm familiar with this feeling from other games and books. Usually I just wait for it to go away, but I figured I'd ask anyway-

What are your go-to ways to distract yourself from that post-game funk? Do you wait it out? Immediately jump into another run? Eat your feelings? Tell me about your favorite remedies.",GirlGamers
How do you find gamers you can get along with?,"Hi folks! So I've been playing ESO for over a year on and off but any time I get a request to group to do a quest it inevitably leads to a conversation about how I'm a girl (news to me, glad you brought it up) etc etc. A particularly memorable encounter devolved into literally ""Lemme see your character with fewer clothes because that will tell me a lot about you.""
How do you guys find other like minded gamers?? I have yet to randomly come across anyone that I'd want to continue playing with. I've played a few other games with friends I knew irl but none of them play ESO and I'm kind of stumped because I really want to get into ESO seeing as the next Elder Scrolls won't be out until I'm 89. Thanks for any help!",GirlGamers
Grim Dawn is 70% off!!,"Hey all, this is like my favourite arpg ever! It's made by the OG devs from Titan Quest many years ago.

There is a new expansion coming out soon and I just wanted to share the sale with everyone because I love this game so much! (But I mean don't just take my word for it; almost 20k steam reviews and 91% are positive!)

This is the REAL Diablo 3 lol -- [https://www.humblebundle.com/store/search?sort=bestselling&amp;search=grim%20dawn](https://www.humblebundle.com/store/search?sort=bestselling&amp;search=grim%20dawn)

Also, it's on sale for another 9 days-ish, that's plenty of time to check it out!

Cheers :)",GirlGamers
Here is my gaming companion. She likes to sit on my tower while I play :-),,GirlGamers
Can't handle the sexism on the League of Legends subreddit,"The sexism scandal just seems to be the butt of every joke on the main LoL subreddit. I'm tired of all the memes. I scroll through the threads and see stuff like:

""If there were women-only queues, every game would be 5 supports v 5 supports""

""Why is that commentator defending women when she herself is trying to be a man.""

""To make things fair we need to remove all male champions from league.""

""Women can do anything that men can do, when you don't let men do anything.""

I know these are jokes, but they are sexist jokes, the same stuff Riot was getting in trouble for just a few weeks ago. It's so upsetting. I unsubscribed from the subreddit.

Also, I saw so many users saying they were 'quitting league' when Riot declared the NB/female-only room at PAX. Oh, but the years of sexism against women before that didn't make you want to quit? Because ONE rioter called you a manbaby (which I absolutely do NOT condone - that is NOT okay language) you want to quit? As opposed to the years of sexism that women faced?

It seems so... Childish... Like the subreddit is just stomping its feet and whining. I hate all the sexism talk. Can't we just get back to playing the game?",GirlGamers
Visual Novels Recommendations,"Hello all!

I decided to catch a cold and discovered that visual novels are great to play while being sick. I've played Doki Doki Literature Club and Long Live The Queen and absolutely loved both for fake cuteness and unpredictable plot. I finally won in LLTQ so now I'm curious if there're other games similar to these two. 

Thanks in advance and have a wonderful week :)",GirlGamers
Wholesome,,GirlGamers
I wanna talk about To The Moon,"This is a game I picked up at a steam sale ages ago and left it in my library to play later. I knew it was one of those lite on gameplay heavy on story type of games but that's about it. Yesterday I was bored and figured I'd give it a try. I ended up spending my whole evening playing it start to finish, there was just never a point where I got bored of it or didn't want to know what happened next. Even now, a full day later I still can't get it out of my head. I can't possibly recommend this game enough, if you want a good story you'll find it in To The Mom.

This game left me a blubbering mess and I loved every second of it. But even as sad as it was, there's still a bunch of really funny moments. Trying not to spoil anything but the NASA presentation bit had me in stitches. I'm going to stop here because I'm honestly afraid that this is just going to devolve into a spoiler filled fangasum. Just... Check this game out some time, if it looks like something you'd like it probably is.",GirlGamers
"This gamer girl needs a new monitor! You got any ideas? (min 24'', min 144hz, max ~400e)","So, like the title says, i'm looking for a new monitor! It would be mainly for gaming, but I'd like if movies etc look good too. I've been using 2 kinda old monitors ^((BenQ G2420HDB and HP E221c)) and i'd like to buy a proper one now since i've started playing more. I really don't know that much about monitors (and tbh computers in common) but i've gathered some ""requirements"" for the monitor; 

⏺️ NO monitors with known issues of; screen tearing, shadowing, color leaking etc (i know you can get a Monday piece with bad luck but yeah..). I bought Acer Predator GN246HL (144hz) but it sucked. It had really bad shadowing and i had to return it and now i want to try again :D  
⏺️ I'm using GeForce GTX 1060 but I don't think I require g-sync (and it's super expensive)  
⏺️ 144hz  
⏺️ Price max \~400€  
⏺️ 24'' (I wouldn't have anything against a bigger one, but they are also way too expensive)  
⏺️ Pivot and so on ain't required but ofc it's a nice bonus if i can move it around 😂

​

I have been checking these two out;  
Acer Predator XB240HBbmjdpr  
Asus MG248QR

Any thoughs about these two?

\~ **Every help is appreciated! &lt;3**",GirlGamers
Yonder is Underrated! It's a great game if you want to relax,,GirlGamers
Recent find at MicroPlay! Anyone else play the Sabrina games?,,GirlGamers
Any destiny 2 all girl clans?,I’m getting back in it for the new dlc and would love to find an active clan. Ideally all girls would be awesome! I’m on Xbox. ,GirlGamers
"Today I worked on this Alliance piece, pretty happy with the outcome!",,GirlGamers
Who else loves video game soundtracks?,"So as much as I love gaming, I enjoy music immensely more. I often find myself working, studying or reading to OSTs of video games and find them really focusing for me.

 DAE have any they love &amp; would like to share?",GirlGamers
"Sorry if this has been asked before, I tried searching first. Does anyone know of any youtube channels from female gamers? Or any good female streamers?","Particularly any who play fortnite or any of the newer games. I have been out of the gaming scene for a while, and I like to watch videos of people playing games and reviewing them and stuff like that to help me find the next game I want to play. But I'd particuarly like to see reviews or gameplay from a female perspective. All the popular female youtubers/streamers I can find seem to be more for male entertainment than just being female gamers. Not that they aren't real gamers or anything...but I hope what i'm saying makes sense. Thanks! ",GirlGamers
Little late to the tattoo sharing party but here are my heels!,,GirlGamers
Losing My Girl Gamer Identity,"Recently for the past year, I've feel like I haven't had the time to play video games or board games even though I use my free time to cook, clean, or watch anime. Sometimes it feels like I'm losing the gamer girl identity and when I try to get back into Overwatch or League the toxic community and catching up on game updates takes a lot of time. I'm thinking of buying a console next year so that I can have games to pick up and play by myself or with my SO. Is there anyway that I can rekindle my passion for video games? ",GirlGamers
Finally got my favorite Overwatch character!,,GirlGamers
"Room 613 at Pax West will only be available to women and non-binary people until 2:30, after 2:30 everyone is welcome.","Announcement link:

[https://na.leagueoflegends.com/en/news/community/community-events/riot-pax-west](https://na.leagueoflegends.com/en/news/community/community-events/riot-pax-west)

To quote from the link above for those too lazy to read the whole thing:

&gt;Right next door in **Room 613** we’re hosting a variety of sessions to support women and non-binary folks who are interested in getting into games professionally. Stop by to learn from and get to know some of the badass women of Riot! Tentative schedule below, but all subject to change—stop by the room Friday-Monday for a daily schedule.

Some of presentations include:

* Art + Champions/Skins Design
* How to be a Producer
* Narrative Writing
* Production Careers
* Game Design
* Advanced Cosplay

&amp;#x200B;

However, the only catch is women will be able to join/participate in these presentations.

This decision was immediately met with huge backlash from the community. Just check out r/leagueoflegends to see what kind of commotion it is currently causing. To add fuel to the fire, DanielZKlein (a Riot employee with over 18,300 followers) retorted back on Twitter, even going as far as calling a large portion of the community 'manbabies' for disagreeing with the decision. Down below are his responses:

[https://twitter.com/danielzklein/status/1035726260612157440](https://twitter.com/danielzklein/status/1035726260612157440)

Froskurinn, another Riot employee also added in her thoughts on Twitter:

[https://twitter.com/Froskurinn/status/1035865050974539776](https://twitter.com/Froskurinn/status/1035865050974539776)

​

Obviously, since LoL is a mostly male dominated community they would be against this decision. But what do you guys think?",GirlGamers
PAX West meetup!,"Hey ladies!

A few of us are at PAX West and we want to give everyone an opportunity to meet up with each other and hang out :)

If you are at PAX West or in the Seattle area, come hang out with us at Yard House on 4th and Pike (https://www.yardhouse.com/locations/wa/seattle/seattle-4th-and-pike/8343) tomorrow (Sunday, Sept 2nd) at ~~1:00 PM!~~ 11:30 AM!

RSVP here: https://www.facebook.com/events/296207361169361/

If you have any questions feel free to message me on reddit or on the discord.

Hope to see you there!

Update: event moved to 11:30 am due to scheduling conflicts!",GirlGamers
What are some fun games to play with your SO?,"Hey ladies! I have a dilemma (sort of).

So, normally I play a lot of indie or farming games. Stardew Valley, Runescape, A Hat in Time are basically my top 3 games for PC. I really like games that are similar to Harvest Moon or Animal Crossing too; basically casual. Something with an end goal in mind is ideal.

However, I have noticed my boyfriend doesn't really share the same genre of games as me. For example, he's a HUGE fan of Monster Hunter (and I'd prefer to play something where combat isn't a main thing, or is just optional in general). I have bought us both GTAV, and will get A Hat in Time for him once it goes co-op.

I do have a few indie games which don't hold my interest for too long and/or aren't multi-player (Slime Rancher, Yonder: Cloud Catcher Chronicles, Staxel, My Time at Portia, Don't Starve Together, Overcooked 1, etc).

We both tend to play Town of Salem together and occasionally RuneScape. (Does anyone know of any MMOs like this besides WoW?) and what games do you guys find playing with your SO?

Thank you so much!",GirlGamers
Working on a series of WoW inspired paintings w/ symbols from the game. First up: Kirin Tor!,,GirlGamers
Headphones and Glasses,"Unfortunately my eyes are too dry for contacts :/

But after about 45 minutes of playing with headphones on my glasses give me a headache from the pressure of the headphones

Anyone here wear headphones with glasses? What do you do to make yourself more comfortable, or what headset do you use?",GirlGamers
This assassins creed : odyssey theme has got me so hyped for The new release! I love how they put real history into these games. It’s like you’re going back in time! Is that just me?,,GirlGamers
"Anyone else used to feel like they had to ignore their ""girly side?""","I was one of those tomboys growing up that hated pink and dresses all because that's what girls were supposed to like.  I grew up in a very close minded town and was very influenced by that mindset.  It wasn't until college that I realized feminism wasn't a bad thing and that being ""girly"" isn't a bad thing.  Still, it wasn't until recently where I've started to admit that I like pink and dresses are really cute.


Being into gaming, comics, and fantasy were things only boys liked in my town.  I felt like I couldn't have a ""girly"" side growing up.  But I also hated how my mom always said, ""Everyone is going to think you're a boy.""  Or similar things.  It didn't help that every other girl my age seemed to hate all my interests, but all the boys were too embarrassed to hang out with a girl.


Now I'm out of that backwards town and living with my boyfriend.  My battle station is filled with pink and purple, a Tracer poster to my right, and a shelf full of funko pops and gaming figurines to my left.  It's great finally embracing both worlds.  All I need to do is cable management and get some LED strips for my case and it'll be perfect.

Edit: Formatting, words, and adding quotations to the word ""girly.""

All the responses have been great and I just wanted to say this sub is wonderful. Thank you for being such an amazing community.",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - August 31, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Are there any girl gamer WOW guilds?,"Sorry if this has been asked before but I searched and couldn't find what I was looking for.

I recently started playing warcraft (EU server, Horde) and I love the game, but I haven't got anybody to play with as the only person I know who plays is my bf and he's alliance so I can't level with him.

I've been trying to join a guild but I haven't had any luck finding one.

Is anyone in a friendly guild which is welcoming to women?

I'm only level 40 so I'm a long way off raiding or anything yet, I just want some company while I play! ",GirlGamers
Sekiro,"What does everyone here think about Sekiro? I can't find any one talking about sekiro on here, open up your hearts and give new things a try &lt;/3

Dark souls 1 is a game about godly adventure fantasy, dungeon crawling exploration and deep combat and level traversal which involves strategy (which many people confuse with pride conquests and masochism because the art and need for thinking seems to be so unusual to people XD)

Bloodborne is more orientated around aggressive/flashy gameplay. Demon's souls was even more closer to ocarina of time puzzles and boss strategies. Amazingly designed levels and lovecraftian feels. Dark souls 2 and 3 are streamlined and not designed in the same way entirely tho sadly...

BUT ALL OF THESE GOOD QUALITIES that you can only dream of a game having, and now finally a ninja game is coming out with all of the same features and more meaningful stuff added on to it.

And I can not find 1 post on this sub-reddit ;-;
I want to make friends that like this kind of deep design and dungeon crawling adventure stuff so badly.....
but I'll never be understood...",GirlGamers
New!,Hi! Anyone know a recentish shooter game that's good for beginners? I'm pretty shit at shooting but I want to get better. All of my other games are more text based adventure kind of games. Any recommendations/tips? ,GirlGamers
"Get Warhammer 40,000: Space Marine for free","Pretty good game, and its free, https://www.humblebundle.com/store/warhammer-40000-space-marine?partner=tdyt",GirlGamers
I'm a gamer and my boyfriend hates it. RANT,"One of the first things that I said about me when we first started talking to my boyfriend was I play video games (which was pretty obvious considering my username on the site we met on was Lok'tar Ogar) . In reply I got ""gamer girls are hot, blah blah blah."" I told him no I'm not a ""gamer girl"", I play video games. Still, I'd constantly be called his ""cute little gamer girl"". Now we live together and I play things like Overwatch daily, he doesn't like it at all. I get loud but I don't go psycho like he does, but whenever I say in a frustrated tone ""why are my team mates running into ults"" etc. He gets so annoyed and mad. It's so frustrating when guys expect girls to be the stereotypical gamer girl who gets excited over getting one kill while dying 10+ times in one game. When we're actually good, try to give pointers like ""I'm playing a healer, let me heal you before you try to take on the whole enemy team by yourself with no health"", we're not ""cute gamer girls"" anymore, we're annoying girls who shouldn't play. Guys can get as loud as they like, if we say otherwise we're in the wrong. But if we get into a game, we're annoying. You date a gamer, expect them to act just like you when it comes to video games. 
Sorry for the rant. Just really frustrated.",GirlGamers
Dragoncon ladies?,Dragoncon is this weekend in the southeast US. Are any of you ladies going?,GirlGamers
my new overwatch /ponyo themed desktop setup !!,,GirlGamers
Riot Games made the announcement regarding recent accusations of sexism and toxic corporate culture,,GirlGamers
ahhh... the beautiful community of Fortnite,"i was playing random squads and of course, was met with the question ""are you a girl?"" by the teenaged boy on my team (couldn't be any older than 13). i responded with, ""maybe, i dunno"" (my go-to reply). then he says, ""can i stick my cock in your throat?"" (followed by a group of kids laughing in the background) ....... i didn't even know what to say, but then he quickly asked if i have a boyfriend. i said ""yeah man, he's right here, wanna talk to him?"" and he immediately disconnected LOL. it's the little victories that make this shit not ruin my day. ",GirlGamers
No Heroes Here,Anyone tried this charming little gem? It's a tower defense game on Nintendo Switch and PS4. Gameplay reminds me of overcooked in the sense that you have to craft all your ammo before you can use it. There's lots of running up and down ladders and yelling at your SO and/or friends because you don't have ANY gunpowder and wtf just gave me a bag of unprocessed gunpowder? Like what am I supposed to do with this? The workshop is on the other end of the castle! Lol Anyway it's really cute and offers different levels of difficulty which I think adds to the fun. ,GirlGamers
Skyrim,"The last Flash Sale on PS4 (I think it was a flash sale) I bought Skyrim special edition, and now I am so addicted.  The story, the advancement of my character, and the urge to just help the people of Skyrim has me hooked. I regret not getting into the games years ago when it first came out, cause for the longest I didn't know what fus ro dah is. 

This game has grabbed me in a way that the witcher 3 couldn't. ",GirlGamers
Major CS:GO vent,"Mobile, so sorry for formatting. 

I used to be a pretty avid CS:GO player. It has been nearly half a year since I played, so I jumped onto some retake servers to get myself back in the flow of things. I’m pretty trash at the moment due to my extended period of no game play. I’ve never been great at it, so I stick to community servers built for learning purposes anyways. 

While in this retake, I encountered the nastiest, most vulgar player I have ever had the displeasure of being on the same team as. Immediately he started calling me retarded, saying that I had downs, and just kept it going. Eventually I was just like “Hey, I get it, I haven’t played in months. No reason to be rude. This is retake; if you want to help out and give tips then great, I’d be more than happy to listen.” I get met with being told that I sound like I am the nastiest cunt he had ever heard, that my pussy is probably the most disgusting thing on this planet, and that I should just never use a mic or talk because I’m a bitch. I sat there dumbfounded for a good few seconds and finally managed to muster up a response of saying that he is the definition of the toxicity in this community that ruins gameplay and discourages new users from wanting to play. There was more on his end that pretty much was a slew of insults relating to me, my voice, and my vagina. I ended up just disconnecting and going into a different server before he was even finished ranting. 

I’ve had my fair share of experiences in CS, being that it is in general a toxic community, but this one definitely tops all of them. I’ve never seen a community that is so toxic to female players.",GirlGamers
Destiny 2 (base game) is free for PS Plus for September 2018,,GirlGamers
Spelunky 2 - Gameplay Trailer | PS4,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - August 29, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
I know we've been posting our gaming themed tattoos so heres mine! A little Moogle cosplaying as Cloud Strife,,GirlGamers
would it be weird if I ranted for a minute?,"this past weekend has been pretty stressful and annoying for me, for a couple reasons, and I feel like I just need to get my feelings out there. sorry if this isn't the right place for this, mods

Shine 2018 just took place recently. Shine is a yearly tournament series that takes place in my city. my wife and I attended the first Shine two years ago to both help run things, and to play Super Smash Bros. Melee, a game that we both loved very much. as women in gaming, we weren't strangers to the standard gamerdude vitriol, but in many ways this event was the last straw.

through a total fluke, my wife and I both ended up playing on the events Twitch stream, which had tons of viewers. and I made the mistake of looking at the chat. it was a disgusting, sobering reminder that as women we were largely not welcome in the same way men are in the community. even with all of the chat mods, the chat was dominated by people arguing over whether I was ""doable"". my wife had it even worse.

it was so disappointing. this wasn't the first time something like that had happened, but it was largest scale I'd ever personally experienced it. when dudes get on stream, people talk about the gameplay, the matchups and the strategy. every time a woman got on stream the only topic of discussion was whether she was fuckable. our dedication and practice and skills didn't matter. we were just an oddity, a sideshow. between that weekend and the harassment we were experiencing at our own local venue, we stopped playing that game. it didn't feel worth it anymore.

now like I said, this was literally years ago, and maybe I just need to get over it. and I really really try to do that, by putting myself back out there, not letting assholes keep me from the things I love. this past week I attempted to distract myself from the painful memories by playing the new WoW expansion with a friend of mine. she doesn't like doing dungeons though, so I figured I'd just queue in with four random other players. like, they can't tell I'm a girl, surely I won't experience any gendered harassment right? shouldn't be a problem.

I'll admit, I made a silly mistake right towards the beginning. but that's when the party chat devolved into chaos for the rest of the run.

""girl gamer detected?""

I apologize for my mistake.

""yup lmao only girls say sorry and play resto druid""

""fucking furries wasting our time""

""get off your boyfriends account and make him a sandwich""

at that point it didn't matter what I said or did, they already decided I was a shitty fake girl gamer even though they could not see or hear me. the insults continued as I healed them through the instance. after we won, I got a private message. I heard the alert sound and thought maybe for a second someone was gonna apologize, maybe even tell me I did a good job. but no

""delete your account, bitch""

I was trying to forget about the time I was harassed out of community, but ended up with a whole new crappy memory on top of it.

I... don't really know what point I was trying to make with all this. it just hurts so much to be constantly pushed out of my hobbies for no reason. even as the years pass, it feels like things don't get any easier for women in gaming.

so I guess my point is that I really *really* admire all of y'all who continue to do what you love in the face of overwhelming toxicity. you're all so strong and awesome and inspiring and I hope I'm able to find that same courage in myself someday. I love you all.

EDIT: I never do this but thank you all so much for your responses. people like you are the reason I keep going, and I hope I can continue to do the same for others. just wanna thank you all in the OP in case I don't get around to responding to everyone :x",GirlGamers
An Interview with Polygon's Allegra Frank,,GirlGamers
Donut County came out today! I just finished it - highly recommend this adorable for anyone looking for a chill time playing as a hole driven by a raccoon.,,GirlGamers
Even when you're old enough to be their grandmother they're still nasty,,GirlGamers
Just had to share my frustration with some ladies who would feel my pain,"So I get home one day and turn on my PS4 to watch a little Netflix before bed. It was corrupted. I've played video games since I was a child like many of you, so I'm no stranger to having issues like this. I am, however, horrible with tech so I had a friend come over and see if anything could be done to salvage it, as it was booting up in safe mode at least with a few options of actions. Well many attempts at many different things later, and it just wasn't going to work. We had to reinitialize the console which means wiping all of the data.

Ladies, I have to start EVERYTHING over from scratch. It fucking hurts. My farms in Stardew Valley, my file in the Witcher which I have been savoring and playing through every little detail ever since the game came out. The list goes on of games I'll have to start fresh with. It's been a few days and I just don't even have the motivation to start. I tried being optimistic, getting to play it all from the beginning how fun! But honestly I just feel so defeated and upset. Maybe I just need to let my disappointment simmer for a bit. I truly hope I'll have the motivation to start playing again. 

Thanks for reading, just needed to vent my frustrations :/ moral of the story is back up your save data onto a flash drive or external hard drive every now and again. I don't pay for Play Station Plus or whatever it is so I couldn't just automatically back up saves to their cloud or what have you. It sucks. ",GirlGamers
Barry Hawkins - The Story of Why I Left Riot Games,,GirlGamers
"My friend is making a game from Renaissance paintings, which is available to back now on Kickstarter!",,GirlGamers
My brother got me a BoTW puzzle for my husband and I to put together and hang in our game room. I think Link is jealous of the attention it's getting!,,GirlGamers
Found a good use for my letter board!,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - August 28, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
Pachimari is now decorating my keys. Too stinking cute.,,GirlGamers
Hyped for Cyberpunk 2077,,GirlGamers
Skyrim trouble,"I’m trying to adopt a child in Skyrim, but even though I have created two child beds downstairs and a chest of drawers,  it’s not letting me adopt. Does anyone know if it’s a glitch or have I missed a step? Haha ",GirlGamers
Upcoming indie games,"I've compiled a list of upcoming indies (procrastination, yep), and thought that it can be useful for people here too.

I focused on bigger more maistream games, that could be released on Steam (there's much more upcoming games on itch.io and other more niche sites, of course).

The definition of modern indie is debatable, but I was looking at format, not financial independence (I believe indie has already become a format in gaming, as it is in music or comics). But I understand that there're a lot of grey areas.

The genre distribution is tentative, since it's unclear for some games yet, others combine genres.

The links are to Steam and dedicated sites when Steam is unavailable (these are in italic).

It's be really great to learn about other upcoming indies, so, please, post away.

Pls correct mistakes.

So:

## Adventure

[In The Valley of Gods](https://store.steampowered.com/app/687440/In_The_Valley_of_Gods/)

[Sable](https://store.steampowered.com/app/757310/Sable/)

[Mineko's Night Market](https://store.steampowered.com/app/762940/Minekos_Night_Market/)

[Knights And Bikes](https://store.steampowered.com/app/592480/Knights_And_Bikes/) (meant for co-op)

[Where Cards Fall](https://store.steampowered.com/app/589450/Where_Cards_Fall)

[Mosaic](https://store.steampowered.com/app/349270/Mosaic/)

[Lost Ember](https://store.steampowered.com/app/563840/Lost_Ember/)

[Afterparty](https://store.steampowered.com/app/762220/Afterparty/)

[Rainswept](https://store.steampowered.com/app/772290/Rainswept/)

[Neo Cab](https://store.steampowered.com/app/794540/Neo_Cab/)

[Night Call](https://store.steampowered.com/app/680380/Night_Call/)

[Jenny LeClue – Detectivu](https://store.steampowered.com/app/319870/Jenny_LeClue__Detectivu/)

[Heaven's Vault](https://store.steampowered.com/app/774201/Heavens_Vault/)

[K'NOSSOS](https://store.steampowered.com/app/696770/KNOSSOS/) (free)

[11-11: Memories Retold](https://store.steampowered.com/app/735580/1111_Memories_Retold/)

[The Occupation](https://store.steampowered.com/app/765880/The_Occupation/)

[Someday You'll Return](https://store.steampowered.com/app/840370/Someday_Youll_Return/)

[Genesis Noir ](http://www.genesisnoirgame.com/)

[The Stillness of the Wind](https://store.steampowered.com/app/828900/The_Stillness_of_the_Wind/)

[Asylopole](https://store.steampowered.com/app/602250/Asylopole/)

[To Azimuth](https://store.steampowered.com/app/404380/To_Azimuth/)

[Outer Wilds](https://store.steampowered.com/app/753640/Outer_Wilds/)

[*Sea of Solitude*](http://seaofsolitude.com/) (published by EA, so will be available in Origin)

[*Vane*](http://www.friendandfoegames.com/vane/) *(PS4, maybe PC)*

[*Concrete Genie*](https://www.playstation.com/en-us/games/concrete-genie-ps4/) *PS4*

[*Totem Teller*](http://www.totemteller.com/)

[*Little Devil Inside*](http://www.neostream.com/)

[*SOMERVILLE*](https://jumpship.co.uk/)

[*3rd eye*](http://3rdeye.sai-chan.com/en/)

[*Way to the Woods*](http://www.waytothewoodsgame.com/)

# Point and click adventure

[Luna](https://store.steampowered.com/app/465100/LUNA_The_Shadow_Dust/)

[TSIOQUE](https://store.steampowered.com/app/393190/TSIOQUE/)

[No Longer Home](https://humblegrove.com/)

[*Harold Halibut*](http://haroldhalibut.com/)

[*Growbot*](https://www.growbotgame.com/)

[*Devotion*](https://youtu.be/KoEUtvHr9c0)

## Adventure platformer

[GRIS](https://store.steampowered.com/app/683320/GRIS/)

[The Last Night](https://store.steampowered.com/app/612400/The_Last_Night/) (controversial dev)

[Once Upon a Coma](https://store.steampowered.com/app/733210/Once_Upon_a_Coma/)

[SCARF](https://store.steampowered.com/app/645320/SCARF/)

[*Darq*](http://darqgame.com/)

[*The Missing: J.J. Macfield And The Island Of Memories*](https://youtu.be/u7fqQK0bl_U) (Swery's new game)

[*Recompile*](http://phidinh.com/)

[*5734L3R*](https://www.patreon.com/08games)

## RPG

[Quote](https://store.steampowered.com/app/432890/Quote)

[Praey for the Gods](https://store.steampowered.com/app/494430/Praey_for_the_Gods/)

[NYKRA](https://store.steampowered.com/app/867660/NYKRA/)

[Indivisible](https://store.steampowered.com/app/421170/Indivisible/)

[Wytchwood](https://store.steampowered.com/app/729000/Wytchwood/)

[Immortal: Unchained](https://store.steampowered.com/app/369440/Immortal_Unchained)

[Kofi Quest: Alpha MOD](https://store.steampowered.com/app/705340/Kofi_Quest_Alpha_MOD/)

[INSOMNIA: The Ark](https://store.steampowered.com/app/783170/INSOMNIA_The_Ark/)

[Griftlands](https://store.steampowered.com/app/601840/Griftlands/)

[Stygian: Reign of the Old Ones](https://store.steampowered.com/app/779290/Stygian_Reign_of_the_Old_Ones/)

[Grimshade](https://store.steampowered.com/app/858100/Grimshade/)

[Disco Elysium](https://store.steampowered.com/app/632470/Disco_Elysium)

[HellSign](https://store.steampowered.com/app/606500/HellSign/)

[Mansions of Madness: Mother's Embrace](https://store.steampowered.com/app/840210/Mansions_of_Madness_Mothers_Embrace/)

[Heartbound](https://store.steampowered.com/app/567380/Heartbound)

[Long Gone Days](https://store.steampowered.com/app/510540/Long_Gone_Days)

[Baobabs Mausoleum](https://store.steampowered.com/app/646600/Baobabs_Mausoleum_Ep1_Ovnifagos_Dont_Eat_Flamingos)

[Anodyne 2: Return to Dust](https://store.steampowered.com/app/877810/Anodyne_2_Return_to_Dust/)

[Spire of Sorcery](https://store.steampowered.com/app/637050/Spire_of_Sorcery/)

[Fated Kingdom](https://store.steampowered.com/app/837400/Fated_Kingdom/)

[The Iron Oath](https://store.steampowered.com/app/699330/The_Iron_Oath/)

[Fell Seal: Arbiter's Mark](https://store.steampowered.com/app/699170/Fell_Seal_Arbiters_Mark/)

[*Sui Generis*](http://www.baremettle.com/)

[*Pendula Swing*](http://valiant.se/games/pendula-swing)

[*Copper Dreams* ](http://copper-dreams.com/)

[*Eastward*](https://eastwardgame.com/)

[*Selling Sunlight*](http://sellingsunlight.com/)

[*Death Trash*](http://deathtrash.com/)

[*Blue Omen*](https://blueomendev.itch.io/blueomenksdemo)

[*UnDungeon*](http://undungeon.com/)

## Metroidvania

[TUNIC](https://store.steampowered.com/app/553420/TUNIC/)

[Feudal Alloy](https://store.steampowered.com/app/699670/Feudal_Alloy)

[Touhou Luna Nights](https://store.steampowered.com/app/851100/Touhou_Luna_Nights/)

[*Paradise Lost: First Contact*](http://www.asthreeworks.com/)

[*The Siege and the Sandfox*](https://thesiegeandthesandfox.co.uk/)

[*Inmost*](https://inmostgame.com/)

[Gato Roboto](https://youtu.be/akZHaKCO7_8)

? [*Narita Boy*](https://studiokoba.com/)

? [*The Artful Escape of Francis Vendetti*](http://theartfulescape.com/)

## Souls clone

[Ashen](https://store.steampowered.com/app/649950/Ashen/)

[EITR](https://store.steampowered.com/app/350050/EITR/)

[SINNER: Sacrifice for Redemption](https://store.steampowered.com/app/691280/SINNER_Sacrifice_for_Redemption)

[Dark Devotion](https://store.steampowered.com/app/718590/Dark_Devotion/)

[*Blasphemous*](http://blasphemousgame.com/)

## Visual novel (with something extra)

[Boyfriend Dungeon](https://store.steampowered.com/app/674930/Boyfriend_Dungeon/)

[The World Next Door](https://store.steampowered.com/app/755470/The_World_Next_Door/)

[Necrobarista](https://store.steampowered.com/app/725270/Necrobarista/)

[Unlucky Seven](https://store.steampowered.com/app/579120/Unlucky_Seven/)

[*Small Talk*](https://paleroom.itch.io/small-talk)

[*AI: The Somnium Files*](https://youtu.be/qARQz82CChc)  (by Kotaro Uchikoshi)

## Walking simulator

[DYSTOA](https://store.steampowered.com/app/640260/DYSTOA/)

[Memory of a Broken Dimension](https://store.steampowered.com/app/544300/Memory_of_a_Broken_Dimension/)

[Under a Porcelain Sun](https://store.steampowered.com/app/532230/Under_a_Porcelain_Sun)

[*Forest of Sleep*](http://twistedtreegames.com/forest-of-sleep/)

## Puzzle

[The Gardens Between](https://store.steampowered.com/app/600990/The_Gardens_Between)

[Etherborn](https://store.steampowered.com/app/812160/Etherborn)

[Manifold Garden](https://store.steampowered.com/app/473950/Manifold_Garden)

[Path to Mnemosyne](https://store.steampowered.com/app/770410/Path_to_Mnemosyne)

[The Sojourn](https://store.steampowered.com/app/794960/The_Sojourn/)

[Night Lights](https://store.steampowered.com/app/590850/Night_Lights)

[*The Forest Quartet*](https://www.theforestquartet.org/)

[*Miegakure*](http://miegakure.com/)

## Action

[My Friend Pedro](https://store.steampowered.com/app/557340/My_Friend_Pedro)

[Untitled Goose Game](https://store.steampowered.com/app/837470/Untitled_Goose_Game/)

[Atomic Heart](https://store.steampowered.com/app/668580/Atomic_Heart)

[9 Monkeys of Shaolin](https://store.steampowered.com/app/739080/9_Monkeys_of_Shaolin)

[Unto The End](https://store.steampowered.com/app/600080/Unto_The_End/)

[PLANET ALPHA](https://store.steampowered.com/app/485030/PLANET_ALPHA)

[Bloodroots](https://store.steampowered.com/app/820540/Bloodroots)

[Skelattack](https://store.steampowered.com/app/605800/Skelattack/)

[*Steel Rats*](http://steelratsgame.com/)

[*Fight Knight*](http://dangenentertainment.com/games/fight-knight)

## Strategy

[Industries of Titan](https://store.steampowered.com/app/427940/Industries_of_Titan)

[Bad North](https://store.steampowered.com/app/688420/Bad_North/)

[Satisfactory](https://store.steampowered.com/app/526870/Satisfactory)

[Pathway](https://store.steampowered.com/app/546430/Pathway/)

## Farming and Crafting

[Ooblets](https://store.steampowered.com/app/593150/Ooblets/)

[Kynseed](https://store.steampowered.com/app/758870/Kynseed/)

[Orcish Inn](https://store.steampowered.com/app/533800/Orcish_Inn)

[Alchemic Cutie](https://store.steampowered.com/app/913720/Alchemic_Cutie/)

[Farm Folks](https://store.steampowered.com/app/895160/Farm_Folks/)

## Roguelike

[BELOW](https://store.steampowered.com/app/250680/BELOW/)

[Beacon](https://store.steampowered.com/app/856610/Beacon/)

[Overland](https://store.steampowered.com/app/355680/Overland/)

[Children of Morta](https://store.steampowered.com/app/330020/Children_of_Morta/)

[Slay the Spire](https://store.steampowered.com/app/646570/Slay_the_Spire/)

[GUNHEAD](https://store.steampowered.com/app/704000/GUNHEAD/)

[Star Renegades](https://store.steampowered.com/app/651670/Star_Renegades/)

[*Orion*](http://orionthegame.com/)

[*Doko Roko*](https://okobugames.com/)

## Horror

[The Inner Friend](https://store.steampowered.com/app/790350/The_Inner_Friend)

[Winter Hall](http://lostforestgames.com/winter-hall/)

[DISTRAINT 2](https://store.steampowered.com/app/743390/DISTRAINT_2/)

[The Cursed Forest](https://store.steampowered.com/app/345430/The_Cursed_Forest/)

## Experimental

[The Hex](https://store.steampowered.com/app/510420/The_Hex/)

[KIDS](https://store.steampowered.com/app/793370/KIDS/)

[Baba Is You](https://store.steampowered.com/app/736260/Baba_Is_You/)

[Transference](https://store.steampowered.com/app/647570/Transference/) (meant for VR)

## Co-op

[The Blackout Club](https://store.steampowered.com/app/599080/The_Blackout_Club/)",GirlGamers
"Anyone know of any good, skill-based FPS's?","I'm getting bored of TF2, and I'm looking for a game that is similar (high skill ceiling, fast-paced). I've played a game called Dirty Bomb, which was fun, and really good, but the dev team is shit and fucked up and killed an amazing game.

I've seen a game called Quake: Champions around, is that any good?

Anyway, do you have any suggestions for fast-paced, skill-based FPS's? Thank you :)",GirlGamers
There's a new community tool for Heroes of the Storm which can tell you if you're on stream.,"[https://www.reddit.com/r/heroesofthestorm/comments/9aqq3i/want\_to\_know\_if\_youre\_on\_stream/](https://www.reddit.com/r/heroesofthestorm/comments/9aqq3i/want_to_know_if_youre_on_stream/)

&amp;#x200B;

I feel like I saw a post on here about wanting to know if you're on stream so that you can mute your mic and avoid getting harassed by stream viewers.    


It's a really new tool, I haven't used it yet, but it at least claims to tell you all sorts of things about the players in your match, including whether any of them are streamers.",GirlGamers
Looking for some wholesome LoL players???,"My boyfriend introduced me (23F) to the game and I quite enjoy it (though admittedly I’m more interested in the lore and how the characters interact with each other - I’m not really into “meta” or becoming a diamond or master level player).  While I am looking for ways to improve my play here and there (cool combos, ways to interact with the map, builds, passive abilities), I find that he and most of his friends/siblings are significantly better than me and just get frustrated with me or are way too competitive...  so I just stay silent and try my best to not-fuck-up whenever I play with them. Enough incidents have happened now where I just refuse to play with people altogether because it makes me way too anxious and down on myself.

I’m looking for some friends who are easygoing and chill and just want to play League because it’s fun.  I’m not looking for a coach and I recognize that I’m “trash” so to speak but I don’t think that means I deserve to be talked down to or abused whenever I make a mistake or a poor play.  The League community can be pretty toxic so I’m just looking for some safety while learning, I guess.  

Anyway, my boyfriend is away for a couple days and I’d like to get some fun games in without feeling like he’s breathing down my neck and analyzing all my moves.  DM me if you wanna play!",GirlGamers
I finally set up my PC in my new home. Pretty happy with it so far,,GirlGamers
"Multiple fatalities in shooting at video game tournament in Jacksonville, Florida, authorities say",,GirlGamers
I'm a custom framer so naturally I had to preserve my very first video game,,GirlGamers
Can we talk about Sally Boyle from We Happy Few?,"I’m amazed at what a fully rounded complex fantastic character she is. The situations she was put in, how she’s fought hard to get where she is despite what she’s expected to do. That everyone just thinks the worst about her and she makes peace with it because that’s what she needs to survive. Yet I’m astounded by how EVERY SINGLE guy I’ve seen play through her section of the game comes away with a completely different interpretation of her character. (“Manipulative” and derision about her morals comes up a lot). 

I’d love to see how other ladies interpreted her character. ",GirlGamers
"Looking for a game involving rescue, hopefully stealth game","I've been playing a lot of Skyrim and am pretty tired of just mowing people down.  I'd like to play a game where I rescue people, not just one, but being sent on multiple missions. A stealth game would be great. Do any of the Assassins Creed games involve rescue? I've been looking into Origins II. ",GirlGamers
"Looking for some friends to play ESO with, are guilds a good way to go?","I was thinking about trying to join some guilds, but a lot of them have a list of requirements. I play pretty often, but still count myself a casual, and I game to ESCAPE all my adult responsibility not add more.  Anyone have experience with this?",GirlGamers
This is such a freaking badass game. How do great games like this go on sale for low prices but some shity game stay $50+ forever?,,GirlGamers
"Souls Games Are Great, Except for the Sexist Messages From Some Players",,GirlGamers
"Cyberpunk: game takes place in 2077, punchlines from 2007.",,GirlGamers
"Cyberpunk 2077 Tweets Transphobic Joke, Studio Apologizes 'To All Those Offended'",,GirlGamers
Resident Evil 2 Remake Claire Gameplay,,GirlGamers
Jungle green everything!,,GirlGamers
My lil pink Sailor Moon-esque setup. Xposted on r/battlestations but thought some ladies here may enjoy it ✨,,GirlGamers
"""Platform Fluent"" my first comic (I had to make a political cartoon for my mass media class)",,GirlGamers
New Girl Streamer Looking for Advice!,"Hi there! This is my first reddit post ever so I don't really know if I'm doing this right haha but I recently started streaming on Twitch and I've managed to gain 27 followers with 1 consistent person who engages in chat. I love my regular chatter to death, but I'm just wondering how to build momentum.

Do I need to stream games that aren't as popular? Is it the time I'm streaming at? I also don't know how to engage in conversation when no one is watching me. I usually have my boyfriend and some friends on skype or discord with me to prevent dead air but nothing seems to be working.

Any advice will help! Thank you in advanced :)",GirlGamers
Anyone play Star Trek Online?,"Hello,

Do any of you lovely ladies play Star Trek Online? I bought a humble bundle and it came with a STO freebie...I don't play the game -- does anyone want it? I don't know what's in it, but they're calling it a ""Star Trek Online - Humble Trekkie Pack"". If you want it just respond here and I'll DM you the code. Hopefully it will allow me to share this code with you, and it's not Steam account bound.

xoxo!",GirlGamers
Warbringers: Azshara,,GirlGamers
Incredible Women Streamers To Watch,"BuzzFeed documented [23 women streamers](https://www.buzzfeed.com/cassiesmyth/badass-women-gamers-you-really-need-to-know-about?utm_term=.didAxR1d4w#.jlmnV1bD8J) for people to check out! Are there any from this list you watch, or have any to add? I've watched Geguri, Lindsey Jones and LadyLuckHerself, and I would totally add FRAN and Barcode\_OW as well.  

And yes, gamers do run the world ;)",GirlGamers
New Game!,"I’m getting massive burn out from ESO and Destiny 

So! I need some new games, preferably non online (time for myself, ya know?)

Thank in advance my ladies :)

Also, I’m PS4",GirlGamers
looking for girly games on steam,"Hello, I'm new to this subreddit and I was just wondering if anyone could recommend some steam games to me, I'd really like to play more games that are girl-orientated on steam or pc like the creator intended the game to have a female audience specifically. No dating simulators, looking for something girlish like a dress up game or with cute visuals.
Thanks :)",GirlGamers
Hannah Plays Assassin's Creed: Odyssey [@Gamescom 2018],,GirlGamers
Valve played a segment for a felame Dota tournament in Brazil.,,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - August 24, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
I just beat the first Uncharted after 3 years! Now I've started Bioshock and it already seems great.,"I technically started Uncharted something like 3 or 4 years ago. When I first started trying to play it, I hadn't gotten my anxiety treated yet - and something about this game spikes my anxiety bad.

&amp;#x200B;

 It might be that I play a lot of fantasy games where weapons are unrealistic things like spells and such, and aggressive language has always been a bit reigned in. I didn't have much trouble with things like Skyrim, for example. However, I adored Fallout (3, New Vegas, and 4) which has plenty of actual/realistic weapons and aggressive language - but it's very non-linear so if a situation were stressing me out too much I could step back and do something else in game before trying again.

&amp;#x200B;

I had no idea how bad Uncharted would spike my anxiety but the combination of unrelenting gunfire in a closed space with repeating waves of enemies slowly closing in on me and yelling at me set me off. It's been 3 or 4 years collectively - I've restarted the game maybe 2 or 3 times. And for the most part I've only been able to play it for 20 mins at a time before it starts to raise my stress again - but I wanted to be like Indiana Jones! I wanted to fight some bad guys, explore some ruins and find sweet treasure!

&amp;#x200B;

Beating it feels like beating my anxiety to a certain extent. I've come a long way from how I used to be and I finished this thing that I struggled with but knew I wanted to do. I just started Bioshock today and it already seems great. 

&amp;#x200B;

I have Uncharted 2 and 3, but I'm really torn on if I should even try to play them considering the first one was so difficult for me personally. I have heard that the games get much better - but that could mean a lot of different things. I'd like to hear some insight from anyone willing to share! If the rest of the series focuses on story and puzzles more, that would be a huge plus.",GirlGamers
Now popular in Second Life's virtual fashion scene: Cellulite &amp; stretch marks for female avatars,,GirlGamers
“the great journey waits for no one” - the prophet of truth,,GirlGamers
Minority advantage,,GirlGamers
Halo: Silent Storm | Special Excerpt Voiced by Steve Downes,,GirlGamers
Twilight princess cosplay! :),,GirlGamers
Hard Crit,,GirlGamers
Sheever's Story - Valve dedicated a segment during TI8 to Dota 2 host Sheever on her journey in fighting breast cancer,,GirlGamers
Scuf controller for ps4...are you happy with your purchase??,"All my friends who have them say they're game changing but after watching streamers who constantly talk about them breaking and reading reviews online I'm hesitant to buy one. Funds are short so I'm wondering if it'll be worth the investment, I just want to hear others experiences ! I mostly play fortnite and am starting to care more about my stats, i think having the paddles will help my gameplay a bit",GirlGamers
Anyone going to PAX West next weekend?,"I'm going to be spending the weekend going mostly solo, and was thinking t might be fun to meetup with some of you lovely folks and maybe wander around a bit? (or play some games together!)

I was thinking of making a temporary discord server just to co-ordinate, if there's more than one or two people interested.

I'm not talking about doing the whole weekend together or anything, but maybe meeting up here and there.",GirlGamers
Here’s an old pic of me in my fav top 😛D2 for life,,GirlGamers
"I'm going to a viewing party for Dota TI8 by myself, any suggestions?","I've never gone to events like this by myself before. I guess I'm kinda worried about being hit on when im just there to watch the games and make friends? It doesn't help that I'm married but my husband is out of town this weekend.

Any advice or support (ping ping ping wards pls) would be welcomed! ",GirlGamers
GRIS - Reveal Trailer,,GirlGamers
Overwatch Animated Short | “Shooting Star”,,GirlGamers
Here's my Tidehunter backpack for DotA 2's International :),,GirlGamers
Received Magic Leap One today. Pretty excited!,,GirlGamers
Multiplayer mobile games where I can actually maybe make some friends?,"Does such a thing exist? Or, does anyone know any relaxing multiplayer games for pc? Or multiplayer games that are kind of different/odd/interesting?

I like to play Second Life and Iike that you never really know what’s gonna happen, what you’re gonna find or who you’re gonna meet. But at the same time, it doesn’t have any objectives and if I’m not chasing people down to talk to them nothing ever happens. :(",GirlGamers
"For Honor Starter Edition is currently free on Steam, promo ends August 27",,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - August 22, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
The Surge 2 - Gamescom 2018: Gameplay First Look | PS4 (Upcoming RPG with Full Character Creator),,GirlGamers
( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) This cosplay is awesome.,,GirlGamers
Im running out of games to play,"Hey so as the title says I'm in need of a new game. I enjoy open world games, games I can do other stuff besides the story, like Skyrim, or Witcher 3 or Dragon Age inquisition, or even Horizon Zero Dawn. I preordered Spyro reignited trilogy last week and thought I only had a month but unfortunately they had to push back the release date which is fine I want the best gaming experience from my childhood game. 

But my plan was to play through a few of my other games and then assassin's Creed Origins, God Of War and then Horizon Zero Dawn in the three weeks leading up to the release but now I don't have anything to play at the end of Horizon, which sucks.

So I guess I'm looking for suggestions on what kind of games I can get on the PS4 or even PS3 that are similar to the ones I listed, with a story but also a nice amount of side quests. ",GirlGamers
Assassin's Creed Odyssey: Gamescom 2018 - Kassandra Cinematic Trailer,,GirlGamers
DOES ANYONE REMEMBER THIS ONLINE GAME??,"Hi! I've recently gotten into playing online games I did when I was younger, there's one game I completely cannot remember the name of!

​

You picked one of three monster/animal things to be your avatar and you could customize the color of it. Then you walked around on a server with other people playing their little monster/animal things. You could chat. There were quests you could complete and points you earned from games. It was similar to neopets in that.

​

I don't remember the name of the game or if it's even still up. I remember specifically that this game was SUPER cute.

​

TLDR; There's an old game I'm trying to find where your avatar is a little monster and you run around solving quests. Or is there a better sub for this? Y'all, I'm just trying to relive the simpler times in my gaming. Pls help!!

​

Edit 1: The time frame would have been about 8 years ago.

&amp;#x200B;

EDIT 2: Thanks to u/ShadyFountain I found the game! It was Petpet park. Sad it's no longer up. :( ",GirlGamers
Man of Medan Reveal Trailer - New horror game by developers of Until Dawn,,GirlGamers
The wife and I redid our woman cave over the weekend.,,GirlGamers
Farming Simulator 19 will feature rideable horses,,GirlGamers
"One of my hobbies is over-analyzing horse animations in video games. Here's a close look at the horses in the Red Dead Redemption 2 gameplay trailer, in case any of you share that interest.",,GirlGamers
Feel like an idiot,"I feel like a idiot, i have been talking to a guy for about a year and we are very close. We tell each other everything and i have helped him through losing a loved one. 

I am in my late 20s, and stupidly i have developed feelings for him. Doesn't help he is based in the US and me UK.

I told him i am crushing, he didnt say anything apart from it was a fantastic day for him. He even said he crushes me too but we haven't said anything since. 

We once fell out and didnt speak for 5 days, he messaged me this sweet paragraph asking to go back to how it was because he misses me. 

Just recently however, he has been cold, talking about other nice girls he plays with. He doesn't even type alot as we speak everyday. He is always the first to message me though.

I just feel like a fool because of my age and the fact i really like this guy. I am just going to get hurt because i dont think he likes me too. 

I'm such a fool :(",GirlGamers
When I get hyped about playing Skyrim I do my hair like a Nord.,,GirlGamers
"Going through my library of books, wanted to share this heartwarming story with you all 💚",,GirlGamers
Awe you guys are all cute here is mine ❤️,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - August 21, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"Welp, looks like my ""friends"" are into destroying friendships now...","My friends and I got burnt out on Overwatch (again, hey it happens!) and we decided to try out a game called Deceit. With the unbeatable price point of FREE it was hard to resist.

I'm not a horror game player, but they like coaxing me into playing them because it's funny when your friends get scared right? I mean I'm terrified of Dead by Daylight, but it's exhilarating and I suck at it, but it's all in good fun.

So back to Deceit. If you're not familiar with the game, there are 6 people in the game. Two are infected and become terrors at night. Main objective is for the innocents to escape through three zones, or the terrors to kill everyone. Pretty simple right?

:C

Well, there are blood bags around the map, for the terrors to drink. You can usually hear if they're drinking, so if you're camping a blood bag to see if anyone drinks, then cool, you can say you saw them drink it... but they can also turn that around on you. There are antidotes to pick up downed players, a lethal injection to instakill someone you think is infected, and a scanner that can help you scan and find out if a person is infected too.

The LIES!!!!!! I can't tell you how many times I've fallen for them, and yet, I myself have played the tune of terror as well and have framed innocent people! Either way, even though the point is to never trust anything someone is saying unless you see it with your own eyes, my trust in these people is forever changed! :3

Thanks for letting me share! If you made it this far, I'll share some tattoo tax, since I think it's the new trend now :D

For Honor and Glory! My Reinhardt tattoo [https://imgur.com/a/JrnCngn](https://imgur.com/a/JrnCngn)",GirlGamers
Life is Strange 2 Official Reveal Trailer,,GirlGamers
So were posting tattoos! Let me share mine.,,GirlGamers
A Hat in Time - Seal the Deal Announcement (DLC and Switch port),,GirlGamers
My Fallout4 cosplay for DragonCon ATL,,GirlGamers
Anyone else excited for September 14th?! TR!!,"I am obsessed with TR, have been since I was 5! I’m 26 😂",GirlGamers
Sharing That Geeky Tat Love!,,GirlGamers
USB headset suggestions,"Hello,

I'm looking to replace my headset with a girlier one. Pink would be best. I require a USB headset, which has made my efforts to find one more difficult. I liked the Razer Kraken, but could not find a pink USB version. Any assistance would be greatly appreciated. 

Thanks!",GirlGamers
Finally got around to playing MGSV; Quiet is so much worse than I thought,"Wow. Like honestly wow. Kojima you outdid yourself on being a creepy, immature bastard.

Quiet in this game is a waking nightmare of the most disgusting, crass objectification, brutalization, and humiliation female characters face in video games and popular media in general. I have literally never seen such a thoroughly disgusting display of sexism and perversion on this level.

Quiet is so much worse than simply being a female character in a sexualized outfit. I've seen that before. I hate it, but I'm used to it. Literally everything about Quiet - every aspect of her characterization, every moment of screentime she occupies - is designed to turn Quiet into a submissive sexual object. 

She doesn't speak, which wouldn't be a problem if she still displayed some form of agency without words. Aside from her introduction where she tries to kill Snake (on the orders of another man) and a few scenes where she beats up some Mother Base soldiers for implicit sexual harassment (and oh boy we'll get to that shit later), Quiet does nothing but submit to Snake and his cohorts the entire game, despite literally being an assassin sent on a mission to kill him and his whole operation. The reason for this is apparently nothing more than Quiet being totally, innately brought down by Snake's sheer macho power and sex appeal and not actively trying to kill her once she's back on Mother Base. She remains a subservient, passive, loyal companion throughout the rest of the game, literally only existing as either a sex object or a weapon who doesn't even fire her weapon unless ordered to do so by Snake. Her story culminates with her sacrificing her life for Snake, because of course it does, but not before she is almost raped by a bunch of Soviet soldiers, which I shouldn't be surprised by since I'm pretty sure creators like Kojima are physically incapable of writing stories without at least one gratuitous instance of sexual violence. Oh but don't worry, she ends up ""empowered"" by having her pants ripped off so she can murder her assaulters in a fetishized action sequence.

And lets talk about how she's physically presented because ""male gaze"" doesn't even cut how fucking disgusting it is. Like the rest of the buddies in the game, you can gain bond levels with Quiet to access more abilities and weapons for her. Like the other buddies, one of the ways to do this is by taking her on missions and using her abilities. Unlike the other companions, it is also built by interacting with her between missions. When I say ""interacting"", by the way, I literally mean staring at her. You actually get extra bonding points if you stare at her breasts. As you build your bond level with her, she starts to pose for Snake in the chopper. When you reach max bond level with her, she will approach Snake in the chopper and bend over to display her breasts, then turn around and get in a cat pose to show off her ass. Back at Mother Base, she will get up from her bed to slowly snake her way across her cage while sensually staring at Snake before showering. In cutscenes, the camera practically licks its way across her breasts and ass like a wet tongue, taking every opportunity to reduce her to a disjointed series of sexual body parts whenever possible.

There's so much more I could say, like how Quiet is the only female presence in the game aside from Paz, who appears as some sort of hospital waifu fever vision to Snake, and the random female soldiers you can recruit to Mother Base (oh yeah there's the female Skulls too. [This is how they are introduced.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WFF9XglJAJc) I want to actually fucking die now thanks). The level of casual sexism and misogyny concentrated into Quiet is frankly remarkable. And don't even get me started on how people dismiss gross shit like this by saying ""it's Kojima!! He's just weird like that!!!"". I fucking detest whenever any creator (and they're always male creators) reach untouchable auteur status and everything they do is beyond criticism. Fuck that, and fuck Kojima for creating a character as detestable and regressive as Quiet. Fuck him for putting gratuitous, needless sexual violence in his games. Fuck him for apparently not being able to design a female character without giving her at least a plunging neckline. Fuck him for a lot of things. I'm already dreading what kind of gross shit he's put in *Death Stranding*, especially given the absolutely creepy way he's discussed Lea Seydoux and Lindsay Wagner. I'm sure he'll get away with it then too.",GirlGamers
I was really mad.....,,GirlGamers
Hopping on board with the tattoo posts! Zora's Sapphire and Deku Flowers from LoZ.,,GirlGamers
Video Game Convention Goers! &lt;3,"Hey guys!  
Out of interest, when you gorgeous girls visit a convention... do you go with the purpose of buying goodies? Specifically clothing goodies?  


I'm considering embarking on my first video game convention stall and wasn't sure how happy people are to spend!!  
It's a huge risk because I have nooooo idea what to expect! I'd love to hear your experiences &lt;3  


Thanks guys!",GirlGamers
My Fallout 3/NV tat :),,GirlGamers
Getting onboard the gaming tattoo train!,,GirlGamers
Noise Enforcer,"I've gone through the usual nonsense female gamers get.

-You're a girl?  Daddy will carry you.
-This match isn't going well, blame the girl.
-You're playing that character because you're a girl, that's what girls play.
-Girls should just play healers.
-She's actually good for a girl.
-Crazy PMs.

Etcetera.

But the other day I got my first taste of a bit of crazy I never would have thought of.

Here I am, playing Overwatch with a friend.  I caught a yawn, did a full body stretch.  My yawn was audible and I made one of those involuntary stretch noises.

Almost immediately the guy I was playing with starts this conversation.

""Stop that.  Don't make those noises.""

""What?  What are you talking about?""

""You know what I'm talking about.  I watched a youtube video all about a streamer girl who would make arousing sounds 'accidentally' and pretend she didn't mean to.""

""Um...okay, well I was yawning and stretching.""

""Sure you were.""

His tone was between deadpan and patronizing.  The 'I-don't-care-what-you're-saying-I-know-better-and-I'm-right' tone.

Are you kidding me?  You're scolding me for making normal body sounds because something-something sexy streamer you heard about?  Was that even true or more boys deciding the girl was trying to arouse them with normal noises?  His tone continued to be pretty similar for awhile, so he was some kind of upset still over it.

Definitely was not trying to seduce you, sir.  But you definitely made me uncomfortable deciding that I was.  I cannot imagine one of my guy friends making that kind of weird accusation at another guy.  

Anyone had this happen?  Heard of this sexy streamer?  Have their own weird gamer girl stories?



",GirlGamers
Jumping into the tattoo bandwagon with my watercolor triforce.,,GirlGamers
Race in WoW,,GirlGamers
Oh you guys are adorable. Here is my nerd tattoo :),,GirlGamers
My battle station is still in progress but it is all mine,,GirlGamers
Adding to the gaming tattoos. My hunters mark from bloodborne.😊😊😊,,GirlGamers
Finished my first build! :),,GirlGamers
Little tattoo of Kingdom Hearts,,GirlGamers
"Since we are all posting our gamer tats, check my new D.Va tattoo!",,GirlGamers
As long as we're doing tattoos here's my Dark Souls tattoo,,GirlGamers
Sharing tattoos? Here's my Red XIII from FF7 tat!,,GirlGamers
Continuing the Game Tattoo Trend... here is my Cubone!,,GirlGamers
Game suggestions?,"Hi all!

I've been out of gaming for a bit and I wanted to get back into it and wanted to see if you guys had any recommendations for me?

I'm a pc gamer and I love RPG's.  However, I really like playing online and forming a community with others as well (though I guess I'm ok if it's just single player!).  I tried out Destiny 2 with a friend a few months ago and I really liked it but it seemed more like a solo player game where other people happened to be as well.

I tried WOW for a little bit but didn't keep going because 1. Though the world was beautiful, the graphics kind of took away from the experience for me, 2. Maybe this was just because I was low level, but again it just seemed like a solo player game where other people happened to be.

Any suggestions?

Thank you all in advance!

(PS: everyone's tattoo's are AMAZING)",GirlGamers
"Another gaming tattoo, this time Parasol Kirby.",,GirlGamers
Any Fallout Fans out there? My Fallout Tattoo.,,GirlGamers
I saw we're sharing gaming tats?? My little portal and halo pieces 💜,,GirlGamers
Hard to get good photos of my tattoo but I have the Gate of Time from Zelda on my shoulder!,,GirlGamers
Decided to play Fortnite today and it sucked!,I had voice chat on and played squads for a bit and eventually I just turned it off because people kept saying “are you a girl?” and following me around to see if I was good I guess? Eventually some kid said “imeowxx I’m gonna win this game for you” and I didn’t say anything but he died before I did so ha. That’s enough Fortnite for the year. :),GirlGamers
"While we’re sharing game ink, here’s my Bioshock Infinite key",,GirlGamers
"I saw a girl who got an awesome skyrim tattoo the same day as me, figured I would show mine off too!",,GirlGamers
"I'm so up for sharing gaming tats. A simple keyblade, but I adore it. 🗝❤",,GirlGamers
Since gaming tattoos are being shared.. it’s ok to share some I’ve done? I love doing Final Fantasy designs! (@lientietattoos),,GirlGamers
We still doing game tats posts? Here’s my Oblivion one!,,GirlGamers
"Here’s my input to the nerdy tattoo posts: my Skyrim Kyne’s Peace tattoo. Nothing to extravagant, just a little something for my first tattoo, dedicated to my all-time favorite game and my field of work (veterinarian) :) Done by Jen at Golden Hammer Studios in Milford, PA",,GirlGamers
"""Super Princess Peach Isn't Just a PMS Joke""","While the execution of the game could have been stronger, the implications regarding emotional intelligence are worth noting [https://the-power-button.ghost.io/why-super-princess-peach-isnt-just-a-pms-joke/](https://the-power-button.ghost.io/why-super-princess-peach-isnt-just-a-pms-joke/)",GirlGamers
"""Strong Female Characters Taught Me How to be Myself"" by Kira Leigh. (Same here! great read)",[https://medium.com/gamerjibe/strong-female-characters-taught-me-how-to-be-myself-eba06d4353a](https://medium.com/gamerjibe/strong-female-characters-taught-me-how-to-be-myself-eba06d4353a),GirlGamers
Nintendo/Nintendo Console Games w/Female Protagonists,"Hi everyone! I know the question of games with female protagonists has been asked many times but a lot of them have recs for consoles that I just don't own and can't play :( So I'm looking for action/adventure games and if it helps I love zelda so I would appreciate recs that are similar to it. I currently own a switch, wii, 2 ds xl (basically 3ds), and a gameboy advanced sp. I would prefer games for the newer consoles like the switch or 3ds but I'll look into older games for the other consoles I mentioned above. Also not a huge fan of platformers but I won't rule them out if they're really good! I'm totally open to indie games and digital only releases as well. If possible pls give reasoning for why I should purchase the game! Thank you in advance!",GirlGamers
"While we're sharing nerdy tattoos, my healed Mercy tattoo.",,GirlGamers
Favorite overwatch skins? I'm still in love with pink Mercy!!!,,GirlGamers
Women-Centric Twitch Teams?,"Hello all! I am a streamer and was wondering if there are any women-centric Twitch teams that are good. I'm currently in a team, but it's male-dominated and sometimes their ""banter"" goes too far.",GirlGamers
Has anyone been to Geek Girl Con or Planning on Going?,"A friend of mine introduced me to [this convention](https://geekgirlcon.com) earlier today. It brings together women from different fields: STEM, comics, art, literature, gaming, the list goes on. She's never been, but she thought it would be cool for me to show up and discuss all things artificial intelligence while in cosplay. Has anyone been to this con? Any experiences to share from this? It looks like fun!",GirlGamers
"Since it's apparently nerd tattoo day, here are my Binding of Isaac and Terraria tattoos",,GirlGamers
Ro - Balance — fresh tat!,,GirlGamers
Inexpensive Gaming Headset?,"Hi everyone! I'm new to multiplayer gaming, and I was looking for a good inexpensive headset I can use to chat with people in game or in Discord. Does anyone have any suggestions? My budget is about $35 - $40 if that helps. :)",GirlGamers
Nerdy tattoos? Time to shine! TLOU'S firefly.,,GirlGamers
ConTESSA Pannel at GenCon all about Cultivating Safe &amp; Inclusive Tables for TTRPGs,,GirlGamers
Nerdy tattoos — people keep asking me about what other tattoos I have since the post with my new Skyrim one blew up. Well here’s a pic showcasing them all! I definitely want more.,,GirlGamers
This is what my battlestation looks like RIGHT NOW,,GirlGamers
"My PC corner isn’t the most organised, but it sure is cozy!",,GirlGamers
Best Light-Weight Gaming Headset for PC?,"My Astro A50 headset has broken for the 3rd time. I'm looking for a new one.

My biggest complaint about the Astro A50 is that it's kind of heavy and my neck always winds up hurting after 3+ hrs of use.

Looking for something preferably Wireless - I like walking around while chatting on discord.

What headsets do you use/recommend?",GirlGamers
I've seen a few battle stations posted on here recently and I wanted to share mine. It's less colour coordinated than others but I love it,,GirlGamers
Games that lost their magic on replay,"I used to like Prince of Persia: Sands of Time when I was a kid, and I recently decided to replay the game, and the protagonist still remain one of the best written male characters I've ever seen in a video game and the level design is great and even the graphics hold up really well for a game that old. 

But, the game also has severe camera issues I didn't notice or cared much about as a kid. For example, the camera suddenly switches direction during difficult platform segments and fight scenes, and I died several times because an odd camera angle made me miscalculate a jump or because the monsters I was fighting ended up blocked from my view by a pillar in front of the camera. And worst of all, *every time* the camera changes angle there is a ""Whoosh!"" sound effect, which didn't seem that bad at first but became infuriating towards the end of the game.

Has anyone else experienced that replaying a game you really liked years ago changed your perspective on it?",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - August 17, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Spyro Reignited pushed back 2 months..,,GirlGamers
I hate how people assume what games I like based of my gender,"This is basically a rant/vent post (my first one, lol).
I have a friend who I haven’t known for that long, and he seems like a nice-ish dude. He gifted me a couple games today and told me that they’re “cutesy” so I’ll probably like them. I’m not ungrateful or anything, I do like cutesy-ish games (to a degree), I just don’t like that he assumed I liked the cutesy stuff because I’m a girl. 
I know it’s a minor thing, but it bothers me a bit because I feel he doesn’t take me seriously as a person who plays games, or as a woman.

Does anyone else have this kind of stuff happen to them here? It’s seriously bumming me out more than I’d like it to. I just wanted to make friends who game, but it just feels so hard sometimes, especially with cases like this for me. I don’t know, maybe I’m reading too much into it, but I found it a little disrespectful. ",GirlGamers
"Ana Ribeiro on Pixel Ripped 1989, her acclaimed VR game about being a girl gamer in the 80s",,GirlGamers
anyone remember those 90s flowchart quizzes in girly magazines?,,GirlGamers
honestly why is that a thing???,,GirlGamers
alright ladies! this was tonights painting! and yes i suck at stars haha gotta figure out how to make them more better,,GirlGamers
Sticking with a game,"For the past few months I’ve struggled to stay interested in a game longer than a few short play sessions. I’ve struggled with depression on and off and in the past video games have always been a good activity for me to enjoy and I felt it always helped me improve. I own enough games to play as I realized I haven’t beaten much of my current collection. I want to enjoy video games like I always have but I don’t know how to hook myself back into it. There are a lot of newer games that I really want to play also but I don’t really want to buy more games until I knock a few of these out. Any suggestions or anyone feeling similar? 

Games I have that I really want to play through: Batman Arkham Knight (currently on and off playing), Fallout 4, Shadow of Mordor, Alien Isolation (might be too scared to actually play), Mass Effect Andromeda, Dragon Age Inquisition, Ratchet and Clank, Wolfenstein the new order and Bloodborne. ",GirlGamers
Thanks IndieGala! Because posts like this really make me want to buy games from you 😒,,GirlGamers
How do you stay comfortable sitting at your desk all day? I have a nice chair but lately my butt gets sore very easily ☹,"When I'm actually sitting it's fine but as soon as I shift positions or stand up my butt really hurts, like all the blood is suddenly rushing to it or something.  My chair is really nice and cushy and I've tried sitting on pillows and things and nothing is helping, always soreness as soon as I stand up.  It's to the point I dread having to get up because I know it's going to hurt.

Any idea what this might be?  Any solutions?  How do you guys stay comfortable during long periods at your desk?

Sorry this isn't strictly gaming related but it kind of goes with gaming so I thought it would be okay here.  If anyone has ideas for another place I could post it just let me know.

",GirlGamers
I finally pulled together my pink+ice blue battle station!,,GirlGamers
Boyfriend Dungeon Kickstarter is live! Yay!,,GirlGamers
"I made this to send to all the guys begging for a ""face reveal""",,GirlGamers
My limited edition preorder of Okami HD for the Switch arrived a couple days ago and everything is just so pretty and cute!,,GirlGamers
Hey my gamer sisters!,"If you have seen any of my posts the last two days, im painting some gamer/nerd type paintings for a mom and pop cafe thats also a game room. i have 10 million ideas of what i could paint but i wanted yalls opinions! what do you think i should paint? if you have one thing in particular that you would love to see send me a link or imgur =) 

i would love to hear what my girls would love to see! ",GirlGamers
"Looking for a casual, online game to play with long distance boyfriend","I'm not a gamer, but my boyfriend is, and I think doing an activity would be a fun way to stay connected. He has a computer for gaming and plays Dota among some other games that I don't know. I am not a gamer, and he is worried that my laptop doesn't have enough (power?, ram?, memory?) to play a game, sorry for my lack of knowledge. I grew up playing Pokemon on Game Boy Color, which is about the extent of my video game abilities, unless you count being terrible at Halo 2 and Star Wars Battlefront on xbox. Does anyone have any recommendations for an online game that a new comer could try on a PC?",GirlGamers
What are your favorite two player games?,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - August 15, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
I wish there were more colorful headsets for gamers,"I am here at Wal-Mart trying to find a decent headset for my ps4. I have the wide variety of white, black, grey, and camo. That's it.

I want to buy a headset that is purple, pink, blue, yellow, orange. Just something other than boring neutrals. Looking on Amazon, it's pretty similiar. The only option I see is paying Hugh dollar to get a customer skin for a headset or have a customer headset built.

I know its just cosmetic, but I want to be girly when I game. ",GirlGamers
DAE get really bothered by everyone assuming youre male unless otherwise,"its especially ""triggering"" for me because im trans and im really sick of being referred to as a male, to say the least.  but its like its uncomfortable for them if youre not one of them.  they say ay bro in an almost questioning way like, are you cool, are you a dude, you gotta be cool, and you gotta be a dude. maybe i feel that pressure because i was born/assigned male, but its aggravating.  i get the communal spirit of being ""a bro"", but its also a coldhearted tough love community that i fucking cant cope with.  so maybe im bothered for no reason, according to them, but just wondered if other girls are irked at the very least.   i know bringing it up in itself is a problem, because then im the special snowflake thats too bothered by things that shouldnt bother me.  but i feel thats them talking from a group, and its easier to feel superior when inside a group.  idk if im even making sense, i just hate the gaming community a lot, and am always at odds and just standing up for myself gets attacked as ""taking it personally"" and ""triggered"" and whatever else.  doesnt help that using a voice comm online would get me gendered male, which i guess from a cis female perspective might be seen as a good thing, because they'll take me more seriously because of my male voice, which is privilege, even if i despise my male voice.   just ranting now, sorry. i come off like im playing the victim and asking for pity :/  is what it is",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - August 14, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
Tonights gamer painting for the mom and pop cafe,,GirlGamers
This is a repost but I don't remember op or subreddit it was posted on. But this is definitely me.,,GirlGamers
Saw someone posted their Battlestation and wanted to feel included :),,GirlGamers
So I got into Monster Hunter World...,"...but I started playing just as my period had begun. It was late and I was smashing monster's heads when suddenly I felt really bad - they're kinda cute, ya know? And like, I know the Elder Dragon's a big issue, but what about the others? Why am I killing them all and making armour out of their families? Hohh my god I'm an awful person. So I started capturing ONLY because it made me feel a bit better, but as I was fighting a Diablos (one of my favs) I brought my hammer down... and he DIED. I thought he had enough health left and I had my pitfall trap ready... my hunter cheered triumphantly. I started tearing up. Now hear me out, at this point it was 5am and I was running on iced coffee alone. My mental state was not good. Before I knew it, I was crying. I quit the game and went to bed. When I woke up about an hour ago, my period had begun, and all I could think was ""... oh."" 

Any of you guys ever suffer from heightened emotions and get overly dramatic while gaming on your period? Also, who here is playing Monster Hunter World? I'm kinda crap and get sad over killing the monsters, but I'd be down to play with others. Lemme know in the comments - I'll be trying to read them!",GirlGamers
"Painting i did tonight for local mom and pop cafe! its not the best but oh well, i worked my butt off to get it done in one night",,GirlGamers
"I don't have much of a set up, but I do have my pretty controller!",,GirlGamers
Looking for a warframe clan,"Pretty much what the title says. My bf and I are looking for a warframe clan (EU / PC). We didn't have much luck so far as we only got 2 offers after our post on the recruitment subreddit, one of which gave us some really weird vibes and the others were expecting a little too much commitment for comfort. So, is any WF player here who could help us out? ",GirlGamers
Anyone know a nice ESO guild?,"Yoo i got into ESO now (yes, a bit late to the band wagon maybe lol) and i'm looking for a nice guild, but i'm kinda scared to just join anything, i dont wanna end up in a stereotypical hoard of asshole mmo gamers. So does anyone know a nice one, maybe explicitely for girls &amp; nonbinaries or something? i play on PC on the EU server.",GirlGamers
"In light of the Ninja controversy, lets give some love to our favorite female streamers this week. Link some of your favorte female streamers in the comments.",There's a lot of negativity going around so let's spread some love. ,GirlGamers
"GUNNAR Optiks posted a tone deaf piece of marketing, perpetuating the ‘gatekeeping’ of women from gaming",,GirlGamers
"""Eyes up, Guardian!""",,GirlGamers
About no man’s sky’s lack of gender choice,"I’ve seen many people around the internet being disappointed that, in no man’s sky’s latest update which let’s you customize the appearance of your character, there’s no option to make your character a “woman”. Some people say it’s enough for them to not play it and to you I ask your attention. 

It’s no surprise that we live in a patriarchal society and that men, especially in gaming, are seen as “normal”, while women are supposedly the “exception”. We are all socialized to believe that men are the default, I’m therefore not blaming you or anyone for believing that the lack of gender option means you’re stuck to being a man, especially since there are games with character customization that only allow for male characters. 

But no man’s sky is not that way, and it’s pretty explicit about it. Since launch, every npc you meet as been referred to with the pronouns “they/them”. I know it’s not the biggest flashiest sign, they don’t advertise it or anything but it’s there. The game exists outside of gender, none of the aliens are strictly male or female, therefore neither is your character. Even when you meet with characters with the names of “Artemis” or “Apollo” who are originally Greek gods with gender, the game uses gender neutral pronouns. The game isn’t erasing women from its story, it’s creating a world outside of gender and any perceived idea of gender is really only put their by our own human perspective. So please don’t write it off as another male centric game because it’s so much more. 

Fuck the gender binary anyway ",GirlGamers
WarFrame (ps4),"I just started playing, and was wondering if anyone had some tips or advice , anything really (:",GirlGamers
Used to be big into PlayStation when I was young. Wanna get into P.C gaming. Help?,"Okay so my brother was always a big console gamer.  So when I was young my sisters and I used to always play on his PS1/2/3(not so much). We played ALL the games because he used to trade, so there was always something new(to us) to play. Thankfully he has quite good taste and didn't just play one kind of game. I did do P.C gaming aswell, Skyrim, Thief, The Sims, WoW that sort of thing.

Anyways its been several years since Iv touched a console and I don't think Iv actually ever played an xbox. I desperately want to get back into gaming, this time with a P.C. I sort of didn't do anything for a few years because of mental health problems, but Iv been slowly getting my sh!t together. So this is a thing I'm doing for me. Honestly, missing something  and remembering how much I enjoyed doing something is kind of a big thing with depression. So yeah, I'm finally working properly even if it is only part-time. so I have money! Yahoo lol

I'm not knowledgeable about building my own computer whatsoever, but I have 2 friends and my brother who have been doing it for years. So with their help I put together a list and they have approved it ha. I gave them a budget of E700 for the components. Now we are hoping to get a good deal on a graphics card on Black Friday/Cyber Monday and if we do then that changes some things. My brother is currently upgrading his system, so if he gets lucky in the sales then I might get some parts off him, saving me money yay. I will be 'borrowing' a decent monitor, keyboard and mouse. So I will be saving up for them at a later stage. I will however need to get a desk and chair. I might just make my own desk because my bedroom is a weird shape and just..awkward. i have zero real idea on what makes a good chair.

So ladies, I would love if ye could give opinions on the list of parts. then what kind of chairs, monitors, keyboards(mechanical please), mouse ye use, or are good budget options etc. [List of parts.](https://fr.pcpartpicker.com/list/6mcbTB)

Apologies if this is too long.

Oh and I'm in Ireland, so if I'm ordering stuff from the UK I'm gonna wanna do that before the end of the year just with BREXIT and stuff.",GirlGamers
Hiroko Yokoyama (early SNK artist) shares her experience of discrimination within game industry,,GirlGamers
Need help with improving skill with my controller - Draonball Fighterz,"Hi there! The majority of the games I play are on my PC so I am more used to playing games with the keyboard and mouse. My boyfriend got me Dragonball Fighterz on Steam for my birthday, a game I REALLY want to play! However, I absolutely suck at landing the combos to execute the special moves with the controller I plug into the USB. I have done all the tutorials and spammed the practice arenas in the try mode to do them over and over so I could build some sort of muscle memory but still, I cannot for the life of me easily make the combos work for the special moves. It's super frustrating. The combos I'm referencing are for example the down arrow + RL or up arrow + RL, etc. Do you guys have any tips or if any of you had the same struggle did you find a certain make/brand of controller to be easier? I want to play this game and feel I'm actually playing it, not just spamming any random combo of keys and hoping to get lucky with a special move. ",GirlGamers
Dodger RE: the Ninja Article About Not Playing With Women,,GirlGamers
Fortnite streamer Ninja refuses to play with FeMaLe GaMeRs CuZ of RuMoRs,,GirlGamers
"Girls, help me out","I’ve played games my whole life (Im 25 and my summers were spent on my game boy playing pokémon from age 7-12), but beyond the aforementioned Pokemon, I was never an avid gamer. I had a gamecube, N64, wii and PS2 but recently got big into online gaming when my boyfriend gave me his PS4.

Without going on and on, I’m interested in getting a PC solely for gaming and since I’m not sure how much I’d love it...I’m basically wondering how little I can spend on a PC that will still run Overwatch, primarily and maybe a few other things. Entry level thing for someone who isn’t obsessed with HQ graphics and such. I just want it to run. 

(I am a Mac person so this PC would be gaming only). 

I’m too shy to ask my male gamer friends too :/ 

help me out ladies! 

",GirlGamers
Thought some of you ladies can relate,,GirlGamers
Valkyria Chronicles 4 demo,"So I've been psyched to play VC4 demo on the switch before it comes out and downloaded it this morning and played through. I just wanted to have a minor vent in this sub about the sexist dialogue, I mean in this day and age what the fuck? Can't they just leave it out? At one point a female Navy soldier comes into one of the cut scenes and it pans into her butt and one of the male soldiers from my barracks makes a comment on her ass and how he'd like to have a piece of it. WHY???? Micro aggressions like this really piss me off in otherwise wholesome and awesome games.",GirlGamers
Anyone see games with male protagonists and think about how great it'd be if you could have a female protag?,"I don't have a problem playing as male characters, but when I watched the new Red Dead Redemption 2 trailer, I couldn't help but imagine playing the game as a female character. I do this for a lot of games, haha.",GirlGamers
What could cause my finger pain?,"I get a pain in the tip of my index finger, in the middle, if I touch something. It feels like a pin or needle.

If I continue touching and pressing with it, then it goes away, but it ""recharges"" after a few minutes and hurts again if I touch something.

I switched my mouse since about a week ago to a new one, a [Steelseries Rival 110](https://steelseries.com/gaming-mice/rival-110). It feels comfortable, but I do notice something about it. The surface of the buttons are tilted outwards and my index finger is pressed slightly on the right side of it, not really in the middle. (This happens on the old mouse too, but less.)

The old mouse was a Gigabyte [M6980X](https://www.gigabyte.com/Mouse/M6980X).

My hand size is 20,5 cm × 19,5 cm.
My grip is like a flat fingertip grip, and the mouse is pushed to where the base of my little finger is. They never feel strained.

The pain started about 2 days ago.
First I thought it's a splinter, but I dismissed the idea since it goes away with pressing, and there is nothing visible that looks like a splinter.

I've read about others with similar issues, but nobody said it feels like a needle.",GirlGamers
Free Weekend ! Rainbow six Siege,,GirlGamers
How do you feel about girl gamer stereotypes? Do they affect how you play games?,"So I'll be the first to (proudly) admit that I'm about as stereotypical as girl gamer gets. I have every single Sims expansion pack. Sometimes I replay Pokemon X and Y just so I can dress up my player character. I've spent unimaginable hours modding every game I can just so I can give my characters pretty hair and longer eyelashes, I love dress up games, I almost only play female champions in League, I own all the star guardian skins, I main support in Overwatch, the first skill in Runescape I maxed out was cooking... I pretty much check all the boxes. (also, it will never fail to crack me up that most of the guys who make fun of me for only maxing cooking/fishing/woodcutting/firemaking in rs eventually end up admitting that they haven't maxed a single skill... like ????)

I feel like, for a really long time, I was really worried about people not taking me seriously because my interests in games were so feminine. I'd always pretend that I didn't play the sims or care about character customization, because if I admitted to it, guys would always make fun of me for being an ""e-girl"" and all that entailed. Like, I genuinely felt horribly guilty for liking the things I liked because I thought they meant I wasn't a ""real gamer"" (because apparently the sims isn't a real video game, because it's not a super manly fps...), even though having stereotypically feminine interests in games is just as valid as only playing fps games (or whatever ""real gamers"" play).

Did you guys ever feel guilty for fitting into any stereotypes about female gamers? If so, how have you been able to become more confident about it or reconcile yourself with the fact that there's actually nothing wrong with liking stereotypically feminine things in games? How do you deal with people who try to invalidate your interests because of it?",GirlGamers
I made a Discord bot for League of Legends pro player stats!,"Hey, female engineer here! I chat about LoL stats with friends in Discord a lot, and we always wanted a way to easily reference player / champion stats + match results in-chat. 

I ended up making a Discord bot to aggregate stats and player info from pro League games, so you can query a bunch of stuff, including win probabilities for upcoming series — here’s an example:

[https://imgur.com/a/KPzIhVG](https://imgur.com/a/KPzIhVG)

You can join our Discord server to try out the bot and discuss stats / matches: [https://discord.gg/gQ6jQy2](https://discord.gg/gQ6jQy2)

Add it to your own server using this link: [https://discordapp.com/oauth2/authorize?&amp;client\_id=475912556020760576&amp;scope=bot&amp;permissions=522304](https://discordapp.com/oauth2/authorize?&amp;client_id=475912556020760576&amp;scope=bot&amp;permissions=522304)

Let me know if it’s useful / what can be improved! Full command reference at [https://camelot.ai/bot](https://camelot.ai/bot).",GirlGamers
Anyone playing the beta for FighterZ on Switch?,,GirlGamers
"Guy kept leaving nasty comments on my Steam profile after we lost a game, then he kept deleting them, but he kept this one up. My friends and I reported the guy, but recently, the word 'raped' became censored by hearts. Wow, thanks Steam. :/",,GirlGamers
Any gaming mothers out there?,"Gaming is a passion for me. But I have a one year old daughter, I work part time and I just don’t have the energy to do it at night. I end up just browsing reddit or listening to podcasts as it doesn’t involve hand/eye coordination. Or I do chores! 

I was playing ni no kuni with the husband but that’s fell by the wayside. I was enjoying darksiders warmastered edition that I got in a PSN sale. I have little big planet 3 and a couple of other platformers that I haven’t touched. I was half way through Okami (for like the 5th time but still) I just can’t be arsed. I’m really looking forward to tomb raider, Spyro and spiderman in September, I’m SHITTING myself for smash bros!! but I feel like I’m never gonna have the chance to play. I get the urge to play old games every now and then but never follow through. 

I don’t really know what this rant was for other than I feel like a hobby and something I enjoyed that was important to me is falling by the wayside and I feel my identity is being eroded by motherhood. I have a very supportive husband who is also a gamer so no issues there I just can’t be arsed and I’m annoying myself. I fondly remember weekends just before my daughter was born relaxing and playing breath of the wild. Is it sad that I’m sad about losing that?! 

I love my daughter, she’s a gem. I live close to the beach and love going there with her it’s not that I don’t enjoy my time with her but I feel I don’t get proper to myself anymore and when I do I’m too tired to do the things I want or I feel guilty and do chores. 

Are there any mothers out there who feel the same and can have a good old bitch with me?! ",GirlGamers
"Shadow of the Tomb Raider lets you independently tweak puzzle, combat, traversal difficulty",,GirlGamers
Hey girls :) anyone else playing fantasy football this season? We've just started a new subreddit /r/WFF - Women's Fantasy Football! Feel free to join up!,"The subreddit is private at the moment to keep trolls etc out, and it will be a women's space. If you play fantasy football, would like to join a league or find more ladies for your league (or would just like to hang out and chat about football etc), either visit /r/WFF and request entry or reply in this thread and I'll add you :)

https://i.imgur.com/N4lWM6R.png",GirlGamers
"Heads-up for Spyro fans, Reignited Physical Edition is 1/3 of the trilogy on a disk - not exactly the meaning of Physical Edition.",,GirlGamers
Looking for Recommendations; Games with lots of little sprites.,"I'm not sure how to categorize this. I LOVE Games that have lots of little people sprites that go to and fro. 

Like, Cities: Skyline and Planet Coaster, Cities in Motion. Prison Architect. 

But I've played all those a lot. 

I don't mind early access and indie titles. Any suggestions? Thanks in advance! ",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - August 10, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Guild Wars 2 Cooking - Steak and Eggs Drottot,,GirlGamers
Dead by Daylight,Is it me or the graphics in dbd (ps4) are extremely bad? ,GirlGamers
Six Months at Riot Games,,GirlGamers
Monster Hunter World (PC) Out Today! Anyone grabbing it?,"So Monster Hunter World comes out on PC  today(11am eat I believe)  and I'm psyched. My boyfriend's picking it up too so we can destroy beasts together. 

I was watching some beginner guides last night so I had a slight idea of what I was getting into and it looks amazing. Really beautiful graphics and tons of customization. I'm hoping I enjoy some of ranged weapons because when we tried a similar game I wasn't into the melee too much.

Apparently it's supposed to be a nice entry point to the Monster Hunter series as well.

Anyone going to check it out or already have it on console? What weapons are your favorite? Any tips for a beginner Monster Hunter also welcome.",GirlGamers
(Help/Advice greatly appreciated) Two questions to all female overwatch players:,"One: I'm stuck in silver right now on console and don't really seem to be climbing at all even though I feel that I've improved greatly. I've read that communication really is key to winning games, but I feel very awkward being the only one shotcalling (or speaking in general) and if someone does come on, It's normally them saying either a) shut uppppp girlllll or b) some other sexist sentence. I've tried LFG and joined ""Comms only"" groups, but I mostly feel too shy to talk, especially when all the other mics are all men/boys (I don't know why, I'm more shy around guys then girls). I've also joined an Overwatch girl gamers discord, but most of the time no one is really on console at the same time I am playing. What tips do you guys have?

Two: Does anyone have any suggestions on how to avoid the whole ""Girls should play Mercy"" thing? I must say that I really enjoy Mercy's playstyle because I enjoy assisting my team - I don't feel like I need to be the one getting all the kills or POTG. But it gets much harder when you have people telling you that OF COURSE you play Mercy, you're female. It just irks me and makes me want to switch, but a) I don't want to, because as I said earlier, I really enjoy playing as Mercy, and b) I am mostly (at least at Silver) the only healer in my group - the rest are DPS mains trying to get POTG or the occasional tank. What should I do?




Edit: Thank you all for the advice/ positivity! I will start applying it to my games - hopefully it helps!",GirlGamers
"Polygon: ""Discord is going to start selling games""",,GirlGamers
Why some girls rather buy their games online...,,GirlGamers
X post from r/Pokemon. This palette I designed!,,GirlGamers
I love playing overwatch. My mains is D.Va. Who is your main? Why do you love overwatch?,ALL THINGS OVERWATCH WOOH! ,GirlGamers
"new to gaming, recs appreciated","hey friends! so i'm really new to gaming and i recently found this sub. i really only play minecraft right now but i'm interested in getting into overwatch as well. my laptop can't run overwatch, sadly, and it's time for a new one anyway. so if you've got any recs for a laptop that can run a game like overwatch (while also just being able to do things like basic internet browsing + running word bc i need to write papers for school) i'd really appreciate it &lt;3 

(i also really love star wars and i'm wondering if battlefront II is worth buying for PC?) 

also any game, mouse, headsets, and keyboard recs are really welcomed! thank you :D",GirlGamers
"MiniWhiteRabbit, one of the sources in the Riot sexism article, is currently doing an AM(a)A on Twitch about her experiences.",,GirlGamers
"For women on Twitch, disclosing their relationship status is a minefield",,GirlGamers
I matched my nails to my newly completed PC 💅✨,,GirlGamers
Inside The Culture Of Sexism At Riot Games,,GirlGamers
Have something wholesome for a change 😊,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - August 08, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
Abusive ex boyfriend twitch streams and it makes me mad. I can't seem to enjoy games as much ever since.,"Me and my emotionally abusive ex had been split up for a month now (we lived together for 4 years). Unfortunately, he was still trying to talk to me while dating another woman secretly on twitch while we were broken up (literally was trying to get me to come back to his house). He streams on twitch all the time, and honestly it makes me sick how fake he acts around those other people. I feel so petty, because I felt fine until I figured out about the other girl, and now I feel sick everyday, because when I learned about the other girl, I went off on him, and then he ghosted me and called me a crazy ex girlfriend. Now playing games and even thinking about the things we did together makes me feel bad, even though it was my hobby since childhood. Have any of you other girls gone through something similar? I try to get over it, but I seem to break down in tears everyday. 
",GirlGamers
Who needs cheat codes?,,GirlGamers
Who is your favorite villain and why?,"Here I am again, with my random questions. :)  Anyway, I am curious to know who yalls favorite villains are and why they are your favorite. (Video game villains only please! And try to use spoiler tags please if its someone/something that isn't obvious to others aka plot twist) 

For me it would be good ol' **Handsome Jack**. I personally enjoyed seeing his growth throughout the Borderland series and, because of that, came to understand why he acted the way he acted. Plus, he was hilarious (props to the writers of the series). ",GirlGamers
"This looks hilarious: ""Max Gentlemen Sexy Business is a Victorian Business and Dating Simulator. With the help of a mysterious investor and your loyal servants, you must reclaim your rightful place as a rich person.""",,GirlGamers
Nerf is making Overwatch guns!,"These both look pretty cool! Set to be released in 2019, they're releasing Reaper's shotgun and D. Va's pistol!

https://www.gamebyte.com/nerf-are-bringing-out-overwatch-guns-and-they-couldnt-be-more-perfect/",GirlGamers
First 15 Minutes of Shadow of the Tomb Raider in 4K - IGN First,,GirlGamers
Have you ever played Resonance of Fate/End of Eternity?,"When I came around to playing it, I was intrigued by the setting, the story at first was reminding me of old fantasy RPGs and the fighting mechanics were creative. In fact I spend the first few hours grinding just because it was so fun.

You take control of a small group of three characters, Vashyron, Zephyr and Leanne. For all of them there are many outfit choices and you can combine those of one character in different ways. In the opening movie Leanne, the only girl out of these three, is shown to make a suicide attempt but is saved by Zephyr. Despite that, Vashyron and Zephyr would always give her smack, tell her to make food or peeve on her. Even after I leveled her immensely as she was my preferred character, they would still criticize her before and after many enemy encounters. As the story episodically ""progressed"" (it did not really though) at one time Leanne got sick and could not go on adventure. I was left with Vashyron and Zephyr to retrieve some medicine from a facility overrun with enemies. This proved to be stupendously difficult with only two party members. And afterwards Leanne's level was not even adjusted. Some episodes later, I was already pretty angry at how she was treated throughout the game, Leanne was removed from the party again. Only this time because Vashyron and Zephyr had practically bullied her into prostitution (no offense against sexual labour intended from my side), because they wanted something from an important but enormously creepy church member. I did not even finish that mission, I just quit and never revisited that game.",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - August 07, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
A parody on how to design a AAA video game hero,,GirlGamers
Long-term harassment in game,"I'm not even sure where to start this... I've been gaming most of my adult life and have encountered several creeps in my time. Out of all of those encounters there is one creep that will not leave me alone. I'm past annoyed at this point, I'm angry. This has been going on for eight years now.

Before this began he was an on and off again member of my guild and we had many mutual friends. We chatted and played together in game, that was it. I started dating someone and that's when all this started, creeper threw me a bunch of rude messages regarding my new partner, said that he had always loved me and would die for me.

I blocked him and quit playing shortly after that happened, but one of those mutual friends leaked my real name to him and he started messaging me on social media. I blocked him there and cut off all contact with that group for awhile.  I started playing again on a new server with a new name about a year or so after his last contact. I dont know how he found me that time but there he was on the same server as me. I stopped playing again but I missed the good friends I did have in game so I came back and took over my old guild, removed anyone I knew that was associated with him that I couldn't trust and moved us to a new server. Here lies the biggest problem, he finds me because of my guild now. Our name is the same as it was all those years ago and I'm not willing to change it because it's something we all take pride in. I think this is what makes me the angriest because I know in order to completely stop being harassed by him I would have to leave my team behind and that's not something I should have to do.

More recently he's been trying to add me every few weeks and I've continued to block those tags. Now hes moved onto creating characters on my server and whispering me from them. Always being annoying but never saying enough to actually make it so he could get in trouble with a game master. I've talked to cs about it but there is nothing they can do about new characters in game sending me messages. I guess I should have reported it more back in the day instead of just blocking.

I honestly dont know how to deal with this anymore. I have told him in the past I want nothing to do with him but he keeps trying to make contact. I'm tired of blocking character after character. I want to lash out and say something very very mean to him but the rational side of me is like ""No, that will just give him what he wants.""

This has also made me incredibly hesitant to start content creating and streaming the game I love so much because I know eventually he's going to find me.

Thank you for reading this and if you have any ideas on how to deal with this feel free to share. Also yes posting from an alt account because my team and the creep know my name on here.

Ps. I dont know how to flair this the new reddit layout is confusing..

Edit: Thank you all for the support and suggestions. I have been keeping screenshots of when he tries to add or message me, I will be trying to open a ticket with the game devs tomorrow and see if there is anything else they can do. Hopefully I will get someone who understands because as one of you pointed out yes it is against the TOS to create characters and do that I never thought to point it out to them before. If they can't do anything I will call the police and see if they can do something, which I'm not sure they can, but it can't hurt to call right? I do have his real name but that is all I know about him.

Also I would like to add that if anyone reading this is going thru anything remotely similiar, please keep proof of what they are saying to you. Screenshot everything and do it early, don't wait till its been years.

Edit #2: I heard back from the dev's today and was told that they investigated things from their end and will take appropriate action but cannot discuss the action taken due to privacy. Fairly typical response I suppose but that doesn't tell me whether or not they are actually doing anything which is frustrating but I get it. They told me I need to block one of his characters on all of mine to block the account fully in game which makes no sense to me but I'll give it a try. They said if he bypasses that then to report it and it will build on top of this report and more serious action will be taken on their account. Overall I'm happy you all encouraged me to finally open a ticket. Thank you again for all the support, you are all great people  &lt;3",GirlGamers
Dead or Alive finally tries to shed its sexist outfits and characters! No more jiggle physics!!,,GirlGamers
"Sort of silly question, anyone had any luck playing dating sims/otome they liked?","Yeah, so I guess up until recently I've never tried any of these types of games. But then I start seeing adds on my phone for mobile ones, my interest is piqued, I mean if I've enjoyed occasional dabbling in fanfiction+romance books, why not a game?


Then I remember why I hate mobile games, 35 days straight to complete a story? With shitty cuts of ""chapters"", or pay 35 bucks to unlock one romance line? Not even the whole game fuck that!


So I tried a PC game instead, but a lot of these games seem to be Japanese, so like ok I pick up one recommended for women (cause like as much as I don't care of the gender fxf, fxm, mxm, FxF written for men just idk it has its moments where it makes my skin crawl?!?!) Which was interesting, not quite what I expected. But had it rear it's ugly head with some really gross anime type sterotypes I am just really not a fan of.

So I was wondering what do you guys think? Is there any good ones out there? Or have you had just as bad luck trying them out? It seems like very neat in theory... but harder to enjoy for me.",GirlGamers
Bugs and glitches that freak you out?,"I was thinking about Oblivion recently, and remembered that the ""I HAVE NO GREETING"" bug in Shivering Isles really bothered me for some reason. Not entirely sure why. So, what are some bugs that bothered you in games?",GirlGamers
MFW I buy a game and they ask if it’s for my boyfriend,,GirlGamers
Slay The Spire Strategy,"Hey everyone! I was just wondering if anyone else played Slay the Spire (or just me :'(). I'm looking to find any strategies that have worked in the higher ascensions.

I've beaten Ironclad Asc 12, Silent Asc 14, Defect Asc 12, and all I seem to do is the same decks every time:  
Ironclad: Shrug, Shrug, Entrench, Slam, Slam, with the occasional Offering, Barricade, Rage, Battle Trance, Flex etc.  
Silent: Footwork x5, Backflip, Backflip, Escape Plan, Blur and just wait for them to die from Noxious Fumes/Crippling Poison/Deadly Poison. Throw in a Burst if lucky.  
Defect: Claw, Claw, Claw, All For One, Claw, Claw, Claw, Scrape, Claw, Claw, Claw, Reboot, Claw, Claw, Claw, Claw, Claw. Throw in a Hyperbeam if lucky.   

If anyone can give a short primer on alternative strategies, I'd be grateful to hear them!

Edit: I've tried some other strategies but they all come unstuck to [Order 66](https://i.redd.it/60g5qrh0nj811.jpg).
",GirlGamers
Looking for a game like Episodes: Choose your story,"Hey girls, 

My girlfriend really loved mobile game called ""Episodes: Choose your story"". Sadly, that game has very unpleasant model  of pay-to-play. So, im looking for a similar game, may be mobile but prefered on PC. I've found some japanese stuff, but that's really not her thing. Can you girls advise something?   


Cheers",GirlGamers
Discord,What discords are you guys in? Looking to add more to my list :) ,GirlGamers
Persona Q2 trailer. The female maincharacter is back!,,GirlGamers
All green everythang,,GirlGamers
Headset recommendations?,"I play a lot of overwatch on my ps4 with my friends and I recently adopted a kitten. He broke the little headset that came with my ps4 and I ordered a new one only to have him break it the next day I had it. I don’t think I’m going to order another one of those little headsets for fear of him breaking it again but I don’t know what I should get that he won’t be able to destroy? The wire on the ps4 headset thing was very flimsy so the next one I get can’t be a thin wire. I’m just not sure which kind would be durable and not very expensive since I only really use it to play overwatch. Hopefully you can recommend me some smaller headsets or girly looking ones because I’d feel stupid with a giant hardcore looking headset lol 
Thanks!!!",GirlGamers
I’m tired of being stared at.,"Im tired of being stared at when I go to GameStop for new games. 


I’m tired of being stared at when I go to Best Buy for a new headset. 


I’m tired of being stared at when I got to my TTRPG store for new dice. 


Is it really that hard for you people to believe that girls play games??? Yeah I play Overwatch and I LIKE IT. Yeah I play Dungeons and Dragons and I LIKE IT. Yeah I wear skirts and I LIKE THAT TOO. Stop thinking like a barbarian because there’s more of us than you realize and you’re not going to stop seeing us. ",GirlGamers
Hacking the Planet. If I ever get another controller I want Junkrat. XD,,GirlGamers
"League of Legends Discrimination. “Akali, are you a she?” Context in a comment.",,GirlGamers
New skins for my PS4 controllers. &lt;3,,GirlGamers
"""Just ignore it""","As I'm sure you all know, there's a lot of bullshit and straight up mean people in the world. 

Every youtube comment section for everything ever is always bullshit and awful. That said, gaming is a large hobby and there are some straight up shit heads that get me down.

The advice I've been given is just to ignore it. But honestly, it's kind of hard. It's annoying and keeps me from feeling like I can participate in the community. 

Anyone else deal with this? What helped?",GirlGamers
"79% of Female Gamers Under 30 Classify Themselves as Core/Hardcore -- Overwatch, League of Legends, Fallout 4 Among Their Favorites",,GirlGamers
Fortnite (BR) advice?,"Hey all, I just picked up Fortnite for the Switch, and my SO and I have been messing around in playgrounds mode (when it’s there), but I want more! The thing is... I’m not too good at shooter style games. :/

Or at least, I don’t think I am. Which seems like a better way to frame this. I haven’t played many, to be honest. 

What are your tips for getting better? Any good YouTube vids or the like? 

Thanks - I feel a bit silly asking this because sometimes it feels like everyone else who games is super good at shooters already, but I logically know that’s not the case, and no one’s born knowing. I’m glad this community is here to ask since I know y’all won’t be mean about it. :)",GirlGamers
"What is your gamer tag? ....... ""I dont Know"".","So here is a bit of back story. Also sorry for any grammar or punctuation errors I'm on mobile. 

So this happened at work Thursday night. I started  a new job 2 weeks ago and met this girl in my training glass we will call her Sam. Her and I have been training together since so we mainly just talk to each other. I found out Thursday night that she and her boyfirend likes and plays video games. So we started talking about the New Fallout 76, TLOU2, and E3 2018. This made me excited because I just found a potential couple that my fiance and I can play with online. So naturally I asked her what her Gamer tag is? This is the part of the story that let me down. She says , ""Oh, I have no Idea what my gamer tag is. I didnt make it my self. My boyfriend made it for me. So I dont know what it is"".  My question is if you play games whether it's on Ps4, Xbox, PC, etc... shouldn't you know your Gamer tag? Needles to say I was a little disappointed because this is not the first time this has happened. 

Has anyone else run into the same or similar situation?

Sorry for the rant.😊😊😊",GirlGamers
Dunno if anyone saw this over in r/gaming today.... Parents didn't get her one cos she was a girl. Booooo.,,GirlGamers
Are there any game sites/magazines that are run primarily by woman and/or minorites?,"If not, we should make one! You ladies are fantastic, and I'd love to create a community celebrating women and minorities in gaming!",GirlGamers
What is your favorite girly game ?,,GirlGamers
Favorite Strategy or 4x Game?,"I'm a big strategy and 4x fan who loves Crusader Kings (which I call ""the real Sims Medieval"") and Civilization, and I was wondering if anyone else wants to share in my geekery. :)",GirlGamers
OWL commissioner Nate Nanzer: Geguri has inspired “millions of girls” around the world,,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - August 03, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
My own son :-(,"My son recently wanted to access one of my games (STW) I said ok but he had to go to low levels, not trade or do anything silly. He was to complete the mission and be a good team mate. 
He said “ok mum, if anyone wants to trade I will tell them I can’t as this is my DAD’S account”
I wanted to curl up into a ball. It’s started already 

Edit: I did talk to him about it. I think he was concerned about being teased so I told him to say someone else’s account as he is still very young. His older sister is also a gamer so hopefully he will be more open minded throughout his life.",GirlGamers
Gaming podcast recommendation,"Hello! Title pretty much says it all - I'm looking for podcasts about games (general discussions, news etc). Gender of creator(s) doesn't matter, but I prefer something non-offensive and inclusive, obviously. 

Thanks &lt;3",GirlGamers
(Advice needed) how to go about upgrading to a gaming PC/desktop setup?,"Hello!
I’ve mostly been a console player all my life but I’ve always felt like I’m missing out when a lot of my friends co-op in PC games like league, overwatch etc and in general my laptop can barely run some games off Steam and I feel in general I’d much prefer getting a desktop setup or trying to build a PC so I can run games smoother, play with more people/find an online community I’m comfortable with or girls only ones and maybe even try twitch streaming! 

What advice do people have for slowly building your own PC? I’m honestly super clueless when it comes to these things but want to try and build it at the cheapest price possible because I’m a student with a minimum wage job haha

Any advice? What parts do I need and what parts is it better to save up and fork out for and what parts is it ok to try and get secondhand?

Any tips are welcome! Thank you so much! 🍬🎮",GirlGamers
Game recommendations for an outdated computer,"I bought my PC in 2013 and it does not have the best hardware, so I would like to have some game recommendations please. (any game genre is accepted) ",GirlGamers
I was one of the winners to receive a grant from 1DF because of a post I saw on this subreddit in March! I'll be able to go to Twitch Con now. Thank you to whoever posted it!,,GirlGamers
What Men and Women Consider Hardcore Gaming Are Not The Same,,GirlGamers
Did you ever felt attracted to a man/woman because he/she was very good in a game?,"Being with someone who likes games is one of many elements that I want in my futur significant other. If he/she is good, I feel like we can enjoy more the game (like FPS) since winning is the goal. How to you feel about that ?",GirlGamers
[Vent] Apparently all girls who are duoing are trying to get boosted!,"Honestly I'm getting really sick of the League of Legends community.

Duoing with my friend means that he's trying to get in my pants right? And that I, like all other female gamers, belong in a kitchen making sandwiches while ""delusional eboys"" boost me to an undeserved rank? And then when my friend starts to get mad and defend himself (our team started to call him degrading names, specifically ""fag"" and that really upset him because he has been dealing with homophobia all his life), he gets called a white-knight. It's like most of these players have never spoken to a woman before. It's just baffling that a functional human being thinks this way. 

At its core, I really enjoy the game. I love to queue up with my friends and mess around in normals, but that doesn't happen much since our schedules don't align. I queue ranked for more serious gameplay, but instead what I get are incels. Sure there's always muting and reporting, but it's not right that I have to deal with people like that just because I happen to be a female that plays support. Is there any reason for me to still play this game? Are there better ways to deal with this? Even though I've had this happen to me for a long time, it's still just as frustrating. ",GirlGamers
Pendula Swing - Tolkien meets The Great Gatsby in a new episodic adventure game set in a fantasy version of the Roaring 20s,"Hey everyone, and thank you, GirlGamers, for your kind approval to post about our game here.

**About Pendula Swing**

Pendula Swing is an episodic adventure game set in a fantasy version of the 1920s. You play as Brialynne, an old lady dwarf who was once the most famous hero of Pendula. She however retired on her idyllic, secluded island, to spend her days with her love, the healer Taheena. 400 years after her retirement, Brialynne - now a widow - is forced to return to civilisation. She discovers a fascinating new world, where glamour hides far darker stories. 

Pendula Swing Episode 1 and 2 will be launched on August 15.   You can wishlist them 
**[HERE](https://store.steampowered.com/app/840290/Pendula_Swing_Episode_1__Tired_and_Retired/)** and **[HERE](https://store.steampowered.com/app/861950/Pendula_Swing_Episode_2__The_Old_Heros_New_Journey/)**. Episode 1 will be free and Episode 2 will cost USD 4,99. We hope you like the concept enough to wishlist our game!

**About Valiant Game Studio**

[Valiant](https://twitter.com/Valiant_GS) is founded by [Anna Jenelius](https://twitter.com/TheAnaka) and [Laura Bularca](https://twitter.com/sarienn), sharing a combined experience in the games industry of over 15 years. We are joined by Eva Sokolova, who is our wonderful artist. We work with a handful of freelancers on a per need basis, and we are happy to say that most of our freelancers are ladies, too. This is an unintended but happy fact - we hope that the subject, setting, our team and culture draws the interest of lady developers :).

We are inspired by TV series for our games. TV series have short but catchy episodes. Many series tackle actual and important subjects from politics, business, relations and more. We believe that our world and our history is rich of interesting settings, situations and stories and that games can do a great job leveraging that. We want to make games that have meaningful and relevant stories. We want to bring to life unusual heroes, like the old, wise, impressive dwarf lady Brialynne. We want to provide beautiful, interactive contexts to freely talk and explore social subjects like racism, prejudice, inequality.

We know our games are not for everybody but we feel there are many like us, who crave more profound stories from games and who have unusual role models and dreams. 

Once again, Thank You So Much!  ",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - August 01, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
I got my gamertag and passion for love &amp; peace as a license plate! 🌻,,GirlGamers
"Don't Feed the Trolls, and Other Hideous Lies",,GirlGamers
I cannot believe how much I like the Kingdom Hearts games,"I haven't seen a lot of loves for these games and I want to geek out to a bunch of fellow nerds.

My wife took me to see the Kingdom Hearts Orchestra live - and the music was already pretty BEFORE an orchestra played it 50 feet in front of my face!

And now I can't stop watching the cinematics and/or listening to the soundtrack.  I've played through 1.5, 2.5, Birth by Sleep, I'm 'playing' (read: watching) 385/2 this evening and I'm also working on Dream Drop Distance.  Aqua is my favorite character and I already played .2 fragmentary passage - so I'm a little spoiled for Dream Drop but I love all these stupid friendships so much I don't care about some spoilers.

Beyond these friendships - can we talk about how Birth By Sleep is like a very good Star Wars prequel?!  Like they pulled off an Anakin story line that is incredibly relatable and now I have to save all my children and the only ending I can take is that their stupid wayfinders bring them together again.

Does anyone else feel that way about this series?  I usually like FPS or violent/stealth games and then these friggin children AND MICKEY MOUSE??????? have my heart.",GirlGamers
"(crosspost from r/MakeupAddiction) Posted my Pharah-inspired look a couple months back, here's my Sombra! (Overwatch)",,GirlGamers
Warbringers: Sylvanas,,GirlGamers
What’s your favorite online RPG?,"Looking for recs &lt;3 I only have a PS4 console, and am very new to online gaming. If anyone has any suggestions, I’d appreciate it! ",GirlGamers
Defiance 2050,"Long story short, I have a extra code for the Defiance 2050: Ultimate Founder's Pack on the Xbox. 

First come, first serve... I have no need for the code. 

V3MRG-MXG76-HM9X6-JT9G6-Q96QZ

",GirlGamers
So happy this sub exists,"Hey ladies, just found this sub as I was searching for a place to pose a question around good let's play-accounts for Skyrim (searching girl player+skyrim on YouTube did not, unsurprisingly, render particularly satisfying results). Lo and behold, I found this subreddit which has a staggering 57' readers! Even if not a 100% of those are defining themselves as girls, I must say that this number puts the notion that ""gaming is for boys"" to shame. Just wanted to share my excitement and also cheer y'all on, especially you who deal with online harassment and shit because of your gaming (or any reason, really, but yeah).",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - July 31, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"People calling you a ""kid"" or saying you use a voice changer?",Does anyone else have the unfortunate event of being called a kid or being told you use a voice changer every other game? or is that just a CSGO thing?,GirlGamers
Game Request/Suggestions for Beginner,"Hey, my boyfriend built me a super awesome computer so I could get into gaming. I'm looking for recommendations on games, and maybe some other girls to play with. I am new to games (please don't crucify me) but I know I REALLY enjoy fallout, I have started playing skyrim and love it, and I play sims. I know that is a pretty small repertoire, but that's what this post is for! Any input/suggestions related to the post are welcome :)",GirlGamers
A little taste of what it's like to be a woman in Overwatch,,GirlGamers
Looking for female gaming community.,"I’m looking for a female gaming community on PS4.
I play Destiny 2 and Call of Duty, if anyone has any suggestions I would appreciate it. ",GirlGamers
"New to the Sub, looking for PC Gals who play destiny 2!",,GirlGamers
Indie Game recommendations?,"I'm in need of some new games and I'm big on Indie gaming (like a good 85% of my steam library is indie games lol), preferably on steam but PS4 is good too.",GirlGamers
"New comp set up, finally got a second monitor!",,GirlGamers
Why do guy gamers treat girl gamer like a different species?,"Im just wondering?
Not all but the few i met like chill just cause you met me dosent mean im going to be your girlfriend??? ",GirlGamers
Great documentary on personal accounts of sexual harassment towards girl gamers and those fighting against the harassment.,,GirlGamers
"Ah, yes, the good ol' cat + gamer girl combo 💜🐱",,GirlGamers
PS4 Game Recommendations?,"Hey ladies! I have been gaming since around 2011, I started with Skyrim. I’m currently playing Bioshock and Overwatch but I really want to branch out a bit. Are there any shooter suggestions anyone has? I want to get more experience with those. I’m also really into horror games! Let me know if you have any suggestions! ",GirlGamers
I fucking hate everyone right now. I’m so tired of this bullshit.,,GirlGamers
I made these Fortnite fridge magnets out of shrink plastic,,GirlGamers
Does anyone here play Champions Online?,"Heya! I was thinking of starting to play Champions again, but I haven't played for a long time and am curious if anyone still plays it. ",GirlGamers
Worth switching from Xbox 360-gamepad to Xbone-gamepad?,"I'm currently using a Xbox 360 controller with a wireless adapter for playing on PC. I'm thinking about maybe replacing it with a Xbone-controller instead, since that seems to be the new *de-facto* PC gamepad.

Would you say it's worth it? Are there any new advantages compared to the 360 controller?

Edit: I bought one, and in general I like it. Had to adjust how to hold it somewhat, but now it feels fine.",GirlGamers
Im getting married next year and we're 3D printing our centerpieces. I figured you'd all enjoy the first 2 of 20 game themed lithophanes.,"So I got engaged last month and we are super nerdy gamers. (Like our first few dates were dragging computers back and forth to our homes so we could play WoW together in the same room or playing Civ Revolution for hours at night.) While we were trying to figure out logistics of the wedding we decided we wanted to honor our nerdtastic leanings in a classy kind of way. Well, I also had bought a 3D printer to print my DnD mini's among other fun little items and with that we decided to create lithophane lanterns for various franchises, movies, and games we love. These are the first two I figured this group would appreciate. (If you sub to 3Dprinting  or the WoW subreddit you saw my fiance post these there too)

[https://imgur.com/gallery/CKyIVgB](https://imgur.com/gallery/CKyIVgB) \- For our WoW table

[https://imgur.com/a/STkn9kS](https://imgur.com/a/STkn9kS) \- For our Mario table (Bonus CAT!)

Currently on the printer is a Portal litho. Other franchises on the list are one for each of Blizzards games (we're super fan girl/boy), Final Fantasy, Kingdom Hearts, DnD, Dragon Age, XCOM, GoT. Avengers, Civ, Phantasy Star, and a handful of others.

Edit: DnD one came off the print! [https://imgur.com/a/PT94xUt#N3AezHu](https://imgur.com/a/PT94xUt#N3AezHu)

Edit Edit: Portal! [https://imgur.com/a/wrEFuAI](https://imgur.com/a/wrEFuAI)

More Edits: OW [https://gfycat.com/DismalThatAstarte](https://gfycat.com/DismalThatAstarte)",GirlGamers
‘NBA Live 19’ will let you create female players,,GirlGamers
"PROfiles: Se-Yeon ""Geguri"" Kim | Overwatch League Player Profile",,GirlGamers
Any ladies here into WoW? I made this Horde key chain from polymer clay in honour of BFA coming out soon!,,GirlGamers
I am really enjoying this 34-inch 3440x1440p monitor. Movies &amp; games look magnificent,,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - July 27, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
My simple summer setup! Anyone have advice for cool desk lamps/decorations?,,GirlGamers
Typical 9Gag.. You cant comment there without getting those answers everytime,,GirlGamers
Good gaming keypad for small hands,"I recently got my boyfriend a Razer Tartarus V2 for his birthday. I tried using it too but can't reach the top row of keys. His hands are bigger than mine but even he needs to stretch his fingers a bit to reach them.

Are there any good keypads that are made for smaller hands? ",GirlGamers
Rocket League is really fun!,"So I recently bought Rocket Leauge for my Switch and I freaking love it! At first the controls were kinda hard to understand because I just threw myself into the game, but only after a day of playing I've gotten pretty decent at the game. I'd say if you were considering getting this game, you should! It's very competitive and encourages you to play well. Any time I made a mistake I genuinely felt bad about it, and when I score I feel super good about it. Can't wait to level up and play ranked! Maybe I'll even try streaming it!  ",GirlGamers
Chill out: a new wave of relaxing video games shows there's more to them than violence,,GirlGamers
An analysis of female gamers' experience of online harassment and social support,,GirlGamers
"Gaming’s toxic men, explained",,GirlGamers
"How do you respond to ""Are you a boy or girl?""",I'm so tired of this question. I'm a grown-ass lady. ,GirlGamers
Top Ten Female Characters?,"I was just trying to think of my favorite female characters from games and was curious what your lists would be. They're not in any order though I fought over the last spot, and am rather surprised by just how Eastern focused my list is, but as much as I love Western games, I couldn't think of any women from them that really stuck out to me the same way.

Terra (FF6)

Celes (FF6)

Kat (Gravity Rush)

Raven (Gravity Rush)

Kaine (Nier)

Zero (Drakengard 3)

Ulala (Space Channel 5)

H'aanit (Octopath Traveler)

Primrose (Octopath Travel)

2B (Nier Automata)

I almost went with Bayonetta or Lara Croft for the last slot, it was a tough choice. So what are yours?

Edit: Had also originally meant to include Regina from Dino Crisis, but she slipped my mind when I was writing this up, so I give her honorable mention.",GirlGamers
Curating a battle station is harder than I'd anticipated,"I'm a young woman with some (albiet small) disposable income and I'm slowly upgrading my battle station. I want to lighten up my desk and really feel proud of my hobbies and interests in the comfort of my home.

During the process of upgrading my space I've realised how incredibly aggressive gaming systems look. It is almost entirely black with red, green or blue accents, with the occasional pink or purple thrown in for good measure. The towers, the keyboards, hell even the bloody mice are angular and aggressive. It feels like the category is: teenage-edgelord-extravangza sponsored by Lynx Africa (I think it's called Axe in the US). 

I'm not saying that Edgelord eleganza is necessarily bad but it feels like these are the only options when shopping around. I really had to search hard for a simple white case of which I had to compromise on (I'm clumsy and didn't want glass but there were no other options). I'm beginning to look at mice and key caps but again, a huge amount of aggressive angular styling which is not at all my scene.

Has anyone else felt this frustration? I am beginning to get to the point where I feel overly fussy and materialistic about wanting to make my personal space more feminine and pretty because apparently it's super hard to find anything remotely neutral and stylish.

Plus I can't find many nice huge mouse mats in the UK. Which has really bummed me out.

Edit: I'm sorry. I didn't make myself clear. I have a white case now which I am happy with. It just took me way longer and the case I REALLY wanted was only made in black (it had a honeycomb like pattern that would've been so cute in white). I'm more frustrated with the aggressive design and the overabundance of black.",GirlGamers
I’m sad that No Man’s Sky didn’t give feminine options in the character creator,"They added a giant update today that gave character customization but they couldn’t give feminine player models of the ‘human’ or other races in the game. 

Made me sad that they built all the character options and probably didn’t once think that women would want their own body represented too. :( 

Still a fun update though, y’all should check it out if you haven’t played in a year or two. ",GirlGamers
Do you work at your gaming desk?,"I’m a medical student and I looooove gaming. It’s my prime hobby I do at the end of each day. The issue is that I have a nice desk setup that was originally meant for focused studying, but now I just associate it with gaming too much. I’ve tried keeping discord and gaming clients closed to I can’t see my friends playing and even uninstalled a game during an exam week once. Should I just try to go elsewhere to study? What do you all do to stay focused at home?",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - July 25, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
The Wacky Adventures of a Female Twitch Streamer: Episode 1,,GirlGamers
President of Riot Games teasing about League of Legends MMO,,GirlGamers
"You are required to live in a video game as a NPC, which game do you choose?","*Pokemon?* Instead of becoming/being a member of the Elite Four, you become the Bug Catcher.

*GTA?* If you don't get hit by a car, you get hit by helicopter falling out of the sky.

*Minecraft?* Mobs.

But, if you choose something like Stardew Valley, Animal Crossing, or Sims you can live a relatively relaxed life. Hmm...

Choose carefully. ",GirlGamers
Warbringers Jaina Proudmoore,,GirlGamers
Made a post about being sexually harassed on Twitch and got these comments,,GirlGamers
16 Recommendations for Upcoming Games!,"Hi everyone! So last time I recommended Farm Folks on here and a lot of people loved it, so I thought I'd throw in some more (lesser known) upcoming games that you may be interested in :) I've tried to compare them to other games so it's easier for you to pick out which ones you may like!

Way to the Woods: 

Good for studio Ghibli, Legend of Zelda fans: [http://www.waytothewoodsgame.com/](http://www.waytothewoodsgame.com/)

TRAILER: 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rLfr8Kr5mG4](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rLfr8Kr5mG4)

Temtem: 

Basically Pokemon MMO but with it's own art style: [https://twitter.com/playtemtem?lang=en](https://twitter.com/playtemtem?lang=en)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1V0X31Ncwcg](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1V0X31Ncwcg)

Ooblets: 

Another Pokemon-type game, but with farming elements!: [https://store.steampowered.com/app/593150/Ooblets/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/593150/Ooblets/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PQDAbAhjEN4&amp;t=1s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PQDAbAhjEN4&amp;t=1s)

The Last Night: 

Not too sure what to compare this one too... but the visuals are incredible!: [https://store.steampowered.com/app/612400/The\_Last\_Night/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/612400/The_Last_Night/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=n4IPBiB7SF4](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=n4IPBiB7SF4)

Lost Ember: 

You play as multiple different animals you possess, there was another game like this but totally forgot the name... dammit!: [https://www.lostember.com/](https://www.lostember.com/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QuLnfXsPYGk](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QuLnfXsPYGk)

Pray for the Gods: 

Shadow of the Colossus but snowing: [https://store.steampowered.com/app/494430/Praey\_for\_the\_Gods/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/494430/Praey_for_the_Gods/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8Zulk8c\_8LY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8Zulk8c_8LY)

Granblue Fantasy Project Re:Link: 

Standard Fantasy JRPG but from PlatinumGames who brought us Nier:Automata!: [https://www.platinumgames.com/games/granblue-fantasy-project-relink](https://www.platinumgames.com/games/granblue-fantasy-project-relink)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-2s16sJAtRg](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-2s16sJAtRg)

Eitr: 

Beautiful pixel art combat game/dungeon crawler: [https://store.steampowered.com/app/350050/EITR/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/350050/EITR/)

TRAILER: 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=f0LtsUGhaW8](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=f0LtsUGhaW8)

The Gardens Between:

Kinda like Brothers: A Tale of Two Sons, but with time manipulation: [https://store.steampowered.com/app/600990/The\_Gardens\_Between/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/600990/The_Gardens_Between/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KfIqJaslnNk](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KfIqJaslnNk)

GTFO: 

Think Payday, Left 4 Dead and Killing Floor ;) : [https://store.steampowered.com/app/493520/GTFO/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/493520/GTFO/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-vSYJckIfi8](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-vSYJckIfi8)

Ashen: 

RPG adventure with visuals very similar to Absolver: [https://www.windowscentral.com/ashen-xbox-one-preview-2018](https://www.windowscentral.com/ashen-xbox-one-preview-2018)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4\_alSjWujdU](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4_alSjWujdU)

Children of Morta: 

Pixel art dungeon crawler: [https://store.steampowered.com/app/330020/Children\_of\_Morta/](https://store.steampowered.com/app/330020/Children_of_Morta/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DGKtjdl7fyY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DGKtjdl7fyY)

Witchbrook: 

Stardew Valley meets Harry Potter (and from the lovely Chucklefish!): [https://www.reddit.com/r/Witchbrook/](https://www.reddit.com/r/Witchbrook/)

(NO TRAILER YET, JUST SCREENSHOTS)

Farm Folks: 

Harvest Moon/Stardew Valley/My Time at Portia: [https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/bisonbit/farm-folks](https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/bisonbit/farm-folks)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5ZsSp6eYjRU](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5ZsSp6eYjRU)

Kynseed:

Stardew Valley/Fable: [https://pixelcountstudios.com/](https://pixelcountstudios.com/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3oQBaXORsdw](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3oQBaXORsdw)

Eastward: 

I get a lot of Mother/Earthbound vibes from this: [https://eastwardgame.com/](https://eastwardgame.com/)

TRAILER:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XtBwr5PSZCc](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XtBwr5PSZCc)

I hope you find something on here that you like! I also made a (very mediocre) video list too ([https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VTpCGcTIIws](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VTpCGcTIIws)) but the links I've shared above go into more detail.

Happy Tuesday all!",GirlGamers
How to Grow Your Twitch Follwoing,"Hi everyone! I wrote this article about how to grow your twitch following for my work. Its the first article I have ever written and wanted to share with you all. Let me know other tips and tricks you all have found to help grow your streaming audience!

[https://postlaunch.co/blog/feeling-twitchy-learn-to-grow-your-streaming-audience-through-community-outreach/](https://postlaunch.co/blog/feeling-twitchy-learn-to-grow-your-streaming-audience-through-community-outreach/)",GirlGamers
"AIRHEART releases today - it's a dieselpunk airplane action game where you play as Amelia, a young pilot and fisherwoman in a flying city in the clouds",,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - July 24, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
Peach x Samus 😍,,GirlGamers
I upgraded a little bit guys :3,,GirlGamers
Open World Game Recommendations,"**Hi hi! Im brand new to reddit but so excited to have found this group/page/section/subreddit (I don't understand terminology yet) I am in desperate need of a new game, I love all the Zelda games, Fable 2 &amp; 3 (I didn't get into 1 sorry), Skyrim Elder Scrolls, Horizon Zero Dawn, etc. I love open world adventure games, with fighting and if you can play as a girl its major bonus points. I have a PS4, Switch, and an Xbox 360 but if the game is good enough i'm open to getting something else. Thanks &lt;3**",GirlGamers
The Real Hard Hitting Question,First-person shooter or third-person shooter? Which do you prefer?,GirlGamers
Warcraft Warbringers,"The new Jaina short is out and it's amazing! I decided to check out the original trailer for them and I read the comments... big mistake.

Half of them are men having a whinge that it's all female characters. ""Wah stupid fimsims"" ""all war is caused by women"" ""pandering to sjw"". Is it not enough that almost everything else is about you? As the harbingers were male and no one cared but we've got to have a big whine because women got the spotlight ONCE.

I was going to pick Wow back up but after seeing how immature the players are I don't think I will. /rantover but I'm actually so angry haha",GirlGamers
Not Being Able to Connect with Characters Different From You,"This has been something that has always baffled me. Whether its pertaining about gaming or TV and movies, I just do not get it. How is it hard to resonate and connect with another human being? I understand how race, gender, sexuality, and socioeconomics can shape us and our experiences, but the lack of will and desire to connect with someone different from you is weak to me. Being a black woman, I have been able to connect and relate to and care for so many white characters, male and female (it would be hella hard being a gamer without it). I have no problem doing it, it's not like pulling out teeth. 

I get that there are things that I deal with that a white man or woman for that matter cannot understand or truly get. But at the very least people can empathize. I get sick and tired of hearing how female characters are hard to relate to especially when it retains to woc. How the hell does one relate and connect with Link but cannot do so with Chloe Frazer? 
 ",GirlGamers
Harassed on Twitch,"So I don't have the screenshot anymore because I banned the user, but I just started streaming on Twitch like 2 weeks ago and got this exchange:

\[shitty person\]: Do you have Ligma?

me: What is that?

\[shitty person\]: Ligma balls

\[nice person who watches my stream regularly\]: wow.... that was just dumb

\[shitty person\]: bitch

Even though I banned and reported it, the account was an obvious throwaway, and this person will probably just create more accounts to harass streamers.

Anyways, I knew going in that streaming wasn't going to be a 100% positive experience. I'm just still taken aback that people will go around just saying shitty things like this. 

**EDIT:** The part that bothers me is that the person immediately went from shitty joke to kind of aggressive profanity...not so much the shitty joke.",GirlGamers
What would you change about video games if you could?,What would you like to see more of in current day video games? What would you like to see less of? Asking for science.,GirlGamers
Guild Wars 2 Cooking,"I'm going to start a project soon (late next month or early September) where I'll eventually recreate every dish I possibly can from GW2.

Not sure where to start though.

Seasonings seems like a good place to start, but it doesn't make for good video content on its own.

I'm also wondering if anyone knows of a sortable food database or spreadsheet type thingy that would make it easy to begin putting things together and planning.

What foods do you think would be a good place to start?

Any suggestions for organization?

Edit:

Got this blog in the works as a place to start http://asurankitchen.blogspot.com/",GirlGamers
Happy Place 💕,,GirlGamers
EVERY TIME. 😹,,GirlGamers
I'm in love with how my PC finally turned out. Girl-Gamers-Cave!,,GirlGamers
"Women of Tabletop: Where are all the articles, youtube channels, and podcasts??","I'm an old, female gamer. Been gaming since 1994 and while I've never had too much trouble finding comfortable gaming environments, it's only in the past... 5 or so years that I've really seen this beloved hobby (read: obsession) of mine flourish with female gamers. 

A wee bit of backstory: I started with Wargaming and moved into Advanced Dungeons and Dragons, dipped my toes into MtG competitively for a while before college then quit both wargaming and card games  (I was a poor lass and most of my troops and decks were made illegal for play) and dove headlong into Dungeons and Dragons, which by then was 3.0 then eventually became 3.5. Switched to Pathfinder because I loathed 4.0 and while 5.0 isn't my favorite, my husband likes it so I sometimes play a session.

Oh, and I've been a dungeon master almost as long as I've been a player. I love it more than breathing. (And who doesn't love breathing?)

Now. In this era of inclusion. This dawn of ""everyone's invited"". I find the online community really lacking... 

Sure, there's a podcast or two of ""female only roleplayers"" or even a twitch channel here and there. But where are the reviews? Articles? Tips and tricks???

I typed in a simple question into Google. ""Female players playing male characters"" with either DnD or Pathfinder added interchangeably. Not only did I find NOTHING related to my ask (and yeah, I tried different combinations. My Google-fu is strong.) but I stumbled upon an article here on reddit that posited women were biologically unfit for playing tabletop games (Dude, really?). 

Now, don't take my frustration for anger. 

I've seen female youtubers who dip their toes into what I'm talking about - the ""tabletop crafting"" community is full of women crafting miniatures, their own dice, terrain, etc etc and there's even a group of them steadily growing. My husband adores them, as do I.

But finding women talking about rulesets, play styles, strategies, builds, reviewing books... Is it an empty barren field? Am I wrong?

I'd love your help on this.


******UPDATE******

Thank you all for helping me out! For pointing me towards some lovely avenues of media and for even getting the gears rolling on something potentially grand. I appreciate you all taking the time to respond to this post. I've compiled a list and will be checking it out this weekend.

Again, thanks!",GirlGamers
"Finally, my new battlestation is armed and ready to go.",,GirlGamers
Overwatch Sombra in tv animation.,"Hello! Lately, I've been playing Overwatch games lately and have really connected with the characters. I haven't played the competitive mode, just quick play and AI. I have watched the Blizzard shorts on Youtube about the characters, but I wouldn't mind a Sombra series in animation. Her upbringing, early adulthood and etc. 

Which character would you want to see in a stand alone series? ",GirlGamers
[Advice] Girls only discord server,"I'm new to this subreddit and looking for a discord server for girls only. I don't mind if we don't play the same games, I'd love to chat about the different games we are playing. I'm from Australia and my timezone is GMT+8, I'm happy to chat to someone from another country if we can make it work with our different timezones.  I play Path of Exile, GTA V, Stardew Valley &amp; Minecraft and would consider playing other games :) ",GirlGamers
"No Longer Home, a magical realist point and click game series is now funding on Kickstarter","As I know this is a supportive community, I wanted to share that my friends, two non-binary indie developers who work as part of the collective Humble Grove, have now made their game 'No Longer Home' available for backing on Kickstarter. 

It's already been greenlighted on Steam, and they're about 70% through the project - but need this last little boost to finally finish it. It's been three years in the making!

I'm super proud of them and just wanted to share this, as I think it's something that they've worked really hard on and so far it looks amazing. 

Thank you!

Correction: Sorry I missed the link! It's here: https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/humblegrove/no-longer-home?ref=390052&amp;token=8557fb02",GirlGamers
"20 Million+ Fortnite Players Are Female, Data Suggests",,GirlGamers
Question: Do any of you get game rage?,"Im probably posting way too much (sorry!), but I'm just new to reddit and pumped to have found this group. Reading about the different experiences and whatnot of other girl gamers has been great. So glad there are more out there!

Anyways...

Question: Do any of you game rage? 

Maybe I just haven't scoured enough...or I'm just the only one (hopefully not lol), but haven't seen this come up, so I'm curious. I'll throw out there that I do and that there are certain games I avoid because of it (basically just yelling and/or cursing off mic...I don't throw stuff or anything like that) 😅🙈. I have since learned to just step away a cool off...growth (?), yay!",GirlGamers
Some really cool afternoon reading from Game Informer (link in the comments).,,GirlGamers
Feeling pretty content with how my desk is coming together.,,GirlGamers
Am I the Only One Who Misses Good Skarboarding Games?,I grew up on the Tony Hawk Pro Skater series and delved in the underground series. Unfortunately I missed out on the Skate series and there has yet to be a good skateboarding game for this gen. I just wanna do some virtual kickflips damn it!,GirlGamers
When the game gets too real about outfits,,GirlGamers
In response to the gem u/actuallyaheron found in r/Rainbow6,,GirlGamers
Looking for a ESO girls-guild!,Are there any active girls-guilds still around in ESO? Most posts I found were pretty old. I'm on pc EU. Also i'd be cool with just a lgbt+ guild if anyone knows some :) ,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - July 20, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Nothing like comparing female game characters' bodies to make the women in your community feel welcome! (Rainbow Six Siege),,GirlGamers
Treated like a child during Left 4 Dead 2,"I was playing a public game with my boyfriend and two random guys. They were incredibly talkative bordering on annoying. I’ve been playing this game for about a month now, and while I’m not the greatest player ever, I’m still pretty damn good. Since they were so chatty and nice, I thought it would be fun to talk too and at first it was well received and they were super nice to me.  I tend to hang back a little to kill any stragglers, or since I’m obsessed with the boomer bile and katana, I’m typically looking for those in places. We made it about 30 minutes into the game before I accidentally got cornered by a tank, I hung back a little too far and was incapacitated, so one of the guys who was closest came back and revived me. After that he kept making comments about not leaving me behind and would constantly follow me and try to “protect me”. It felt like they were waiting for me to fuck up so they had a reason to babysit me. I know it’s small compared to the other shit that’s been said/done in games to women, but it made me feel like I was dumb in a game I normally feel really confident in. ",GirlGamers
Advice for a beginner in online gaming?,"So I only have a ps4 available to play and am very much a newb. Still learning the concept of pc gaming and online gaming and the different overwhelming ways one can PLAY now a days. I assume online gaming is possible on a ps4 console but I’m still hesitant to try it, seeing as I’ve never really played online and don’t understand much at all about MMOs and player connectivity. I mostly enjoy JRPGS and first person narratives, so, if anyone has any recommendations or advice for dipping my toe in online gaming, anything helps! Thank you! ",GirlGamers
To you ladies playing multiplayer games,"You guys are braver than the troops (jk). I admire your bravery and character. Some of you are out here using mics and actual profile pics of yourselves. I can't even imagine the sexist shit you guys put up with but this forum has given me a glimpse into the hell that is online gaming. 

In all of my life I have never played online, and the community is a big reason part of that. There's just no telling what type of crap would thrown my way, especially with me being black. All in all you online gamers have my respects. :)",GirlGamers
Before &amp; After. Easier to focus with less RGB.,,GirlGamers
Humble Trove Recommendations?,"I just got a 1-month Humble Monthly subscription (I really just wanted A Hat in Time) and that comes with access to the [Humble Trove](https://www.humblebundle.com/monthly/trove)!  

Anyone have any recs for game worth checking out?",GirlGamers
Moss' promises of representation falls short and I'm heartbroken,"I've been hearing for a year that Polyarc was making a game with a character that uses ASL. The videos were well made and the signing was clear and correct ASL grammar. I was SO excited to see the language that is a such a huge part of my life represented in gaming. I went to great lengths to get my hands on a VR headset to play this game. I'm heartbroken. She signs two words - ""THANK-YOU"" and ""FRIEND"" only 3 times (twice in game separatly and once after the credits ""THANK-YOU FRIEND""). It was a good game but I just can't let go of the missing signing.",GirlGamers
Super Smash Bros. anti-harassment efforts are resisted (5% of tournament players are women),,GirlGamers
Anybody looking forwards to No Man's Sky NEXT?,"Hey gamers! No Man's Sky is getting a *huge* update in less than a week and I'm so pumped. I used to play constantly on PS4 before I moved out, so I'm gonna try to buy the PC version the moment this update is released! Personally, I'm really hoping they revamp the fauna and flora, but they've already added so many changes (like actual multiplayer) that I wouldn't be surprised or disappointed if they don't. Hello Games has done a really impressive job of not backing down even after the initial backlash from release, and I really respect them for it. So I was wondering if any of y'all here play NMS too! If so, what are some of the coolest things you've seen/done? ",GirlGamers
"PC Gamer: ""I've somehow been WASDing wrong my whole life""",,GirlGamers
Girly but not Glowing,"Hi! I'm looking into building my first desktop in the next few months! I unfortunately *really* hate how everything glows and want that down to a minimum. I've been looking into solid cases, but they're typically matte black or rather expensive (I'd like to stick under $100 if possible). My laptop right now is red &amp; black, so its not the biggest issue, but if I'm putting the time and money into it, I want it to be something I love.

I'd like to find something that's a bit more girly or dressed up than just a solid black borg tower. Seen some brushed steel cases, which don't look too bad, but I'm fully on board the rose gold train or would like something pink/pearlized but not pepto-bismal pink (love the color in small amounts, and my sailor moon stuff will already fill that quota for me). Or is there a way I could customize it myself without it looking too arts &amp; crafts (as in child-like, I'd kill for a William Morris inspired case, even though he's rolling in his grave at that haha). 

Does anybody have some advice or can point me in the right direction? I've been looking at PC Part Picker, Amazon, and New Egg.   


Thank you! &lt;3",GirlGamers
Women Creating A Brighter Future For Games - How the industry is making efforts to reduce the gender gap and support women in gaming,,GirlGamers
This is why i suck at video games.,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - July 18, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
"Just want to repost this site. Attack on Geek is owned, run, and most of the content is made by an amazing Woman Dyahana Sena. There is no better way to support women in games media than helping an independent site like this with your patronage and sharing as it's excellent.",,GirlGamers
How about some competitive/PvP games?,"Hi there, just found this sub, seems pretty nice. The Stardew Valley theme got me thinking, how does this sub feel about skill-based, competitive PvP? Like Street Fighter, Pokemon, Smash, and Mario Kart.

I love it. I don't play a lot of multiplayer games, but the ones I do are mostly PvP. I love the feeling of competing against people and trying to get better. Especially when it's 1v1, so I can easily tell what I did right, and what I need to improve, and so I feel just how important my skill is to the result.

Anyway, what's your take on it? What PvP games do you play, if any?",GirlGamers
"Getting tired of the ""chosen one"" saves the world cliche. Games where the protagonist is does it because no one else will","Originally posted to r/gaming

I started replaying Kingdom Hearts last night, and was frustrated by the ""chosen one"" trope. I'd like to see more games where the protagonist is like ""whelp, looks like no one else is doing it. Guess I better.""

Any suggestions?
",GirlGamers
Anyone else excited for the Monster Hunter: World PC release?,"I currently have it for PS4, however, between being unable to read the text on my TV and not really wanting to pay for online have really hindered my progress despite my love for the game.

Here's hoping the PC port runs smoothly so I can love the game again!",GirlGamers
"Tabletop ladies, what do you use to hold your dice?","I've been searching for a cute option for holding my (way too many...) sets of polyhedral dice and can't seem to find anything that works! I got the idea to check out cosmetic/toiletry travel bags, but most of the ones I'm finding on Amazon have quotes about or images of makeup on the outside...looking for inspiration from y'all!",GirlGamers
does anyone here play osu by chance? just wondering--,"--because i feel like more of a guy for enjoying it.  im trans, and in predominantly male internet culture, trans=trap (it really doesnt, but to many people it does).  there are some crossdressing guys that play osu, and maybe some other trans girls too, but seeing as trans gals came from guy culture upbringing, i wonder if there are cis women that enjoy the game too.  even i, despite testosterone and attraction to women, find it a little too much at times with all the big boobed anime girl backgrounds on all the songs.  i enjoy rhythm games though, despite a bit of frustration and self-loathing",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - July 17, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"R6:Siege players, this is now the easiest way to win games",,GirlGamers
getting unfair treatment and being downgraded because you're a girl who plays games,"hey guys.  I'm sick of being treated like im subpar compared to guys who play the same video games as me. since im a girl and im usually the only girl who plays video games with a bunch of guys, all my guy friends just treat me as if I'm worse than them. I always feel like I have an inferiority complex and I _always_ have to prove them wrong and make sure I do well in-game. it's so fucking annoying when you always hear ""but you're a girl, why are you playing games?"" ""ah you're a girl. of course you'd play this champion (referring to league of legends)  or use this particular gun (referring to cs:go)"" that only """"""""""girls"""""""""" stereotypically use. and the fact that you ALWAYS get discredited when you achieve something fantastic in ranked/competitive games, like ""Oh she's a girl. she probably had some other guy helping her get that rank. that wasn't her own skill"". like cmon that shit is whack. after getting so much fucking shit from guys after you haven't being playing that well in games and BLAMING IT on the fact that you're a girl, IT JUST GETS TOO MUCH for me to handle. I'm so fucking TIRED of guys just downgrading my ability to play video games because I'm a girl and immediately assuming that I'm going to be a shitty player. it fucking irritates the FUCK out of me. okay I'm done with my rant. do you guys have any similar stories?  ",GirlGamers
Rant: What the hell CSGO?,"I got into a game last night and from minute one a guy would not stop asking me if I was ""trans"". This keeps happening over and over again, whenever I load into CSGO, I don't get asked as often if I'm a girl but if I'm ""trans"". 

I always give the same answer of, why does it fucking matter, can we just play this game? But last night was really bad. He started yelling at me that I was going to hell and that I was an IT. I'm a 32 married cis woman, not that it matters, but what the actual hell? He kept voting to kick me every few minutes, but luckily there was one guy on the team that wasn't an ass-hat. 

Is this the new version of being called a f*g with Gen Z? What the hell is going on?

It is the first time a guy has crossed the line from trying to be ""funny"" to actually abusive and hostile. I of course reported him but I don' think it is going to end up as a ban or anything. I also reported his steam profile because when I looked him up it is COVERED in nazi flags. ",GirlGamers
Returning to WoW,I use to be super addicted to WoW. Until the last to expansions. I just wasn't feeling it. I played till max level and then stopped. The new expansion drops next month so I was thinking about getting back into WoW to prepare. But I surprisingly feel nervous. I won't be playing with any friends. So anything I should know? Any videos or anything to help me get back in the game anyone can recommend would be amazing. ,GirlGamers
This feminist podcast did an episode on online harassment!,,GirlGamers
What headset do you use?,"I can't be the only one who is annoyed with big headsets made for guys heads sliding all over the place and hurting the top of my ears unless I adjust them every three seconds.

Loved my steelseries siberia v2 that sadly died a month or so after maany years of great service. I've been suggested buying a sennheiser gsp300 but I don't feel like getting anything without doing more research than I did last time (which ended somewhat badly, the hyperx cloud revolver was NOT made for girls, or shitty motherboards apparently, and now my anxiety has to deal with returning them RIP). 

SO, what are your suggestions? Price range up to \~$120 ish. ",GirlGamers
Ubisoft banning Rainbow Six Siege players for using homophobic and toxic slurs during gameplay,,GirlGamers
Rainbow Six Siege and FPSes - The worst genre when it comes to sexism? [Also looking for friends to play with!],"  After a God awful night trying to play R6S with a lady friend of mine, it occurred to me - the worst experiences I've had as far as gaming and communities go has always been with first person shooters. From Call of Duty, to Counter-Strike, it seems that this specific genre communities have the most problem when dealing with women, and in truth I can't really think why. While I have had bad experiences in MMOs and Strategy games, nothing ever came close to the deluge of slurs and threats that the FPS communities seem to be. What are your theories on this? Is it because FPS is relatively new when it comes to videogames in general? I swear to Christ, it seems every other game has always that one guy that makes the night seem even worse, so much so that me and my friend are almost afraid to use mics and we don't unless it's 100&amp;#37; necessary for a game. My gaming nights became so much better once I deactivated voice and text chat on most of my games, but it is really necessary for FPS games.   


Also, on another note, me and my lady friend are definetly looking for other girls to play some Siege with us on PC. Just PM me if you're interested.  Legitimately tired of douchey dudes on public lobbies.",GirlGamers
Final upgrades before water cooling!,,GirlGamers
The ArenaNet Catastrophe Has The Whole Game Industry Rethinking Harassment Policies,,GirlGamers
Thank you for changing my mind,"I had a really stressful period in my life about ten years ago so there was a gap where I did not keep up with popular games at the time. For a few years I didn't mind that I'd missed out and then when I did mind I figured it was too late and the games would have aged too much for me to enjoy them. 

Recently I ran out of games to play around the time I was reading a thread here about games we keep going back to and DA:Origins was mentioned. Instead of playing Persona 5 for the third time I decided to give DA:Origins a try and I am so happy I did. It's aged sure but still a lot of fun and because I've played Inquisition it's been amazing to put some of the pieces together and understand the references to this game. 

Thank you so much to those people who are so hooked on this game after all this time for convincing me that it was not too late.",GirlGamers
"When your companion makes you feel like you need to become a dominatrix to take back control, you build a special room ‘for those who deserve punishment’",,GirlGamers
Storytime: Dying Light in the middle of the Night,"After rushing through the campaign of dying light and becoming seemingly addicted to both the gameplay and the storytelling, I remembered seeing a difficulty screen pop up on the main menu when I first started playing. I knew this was the perfect opportunity to create a hardcore difficulty save which gives you limited stamina, less health, more susceptible to damage and lessens your ability to heal yourself. I also took it upon me to play the whole game with the night hunter mode on, which would allow player zombies to come and attempt to terrify me. I once again fell in love with the story. It was like watching your favourite movie for the second time, meeting all the characters again, seeing everyone feel much more different towards me, and knowing everyone's ulterior motives; it all just made it feel so carefully and excellently written. (Massive spoiler, don't open it unless you've played the game.)&gt;!The most shocking part being when Rais says that he believes he knows who you are.!&lt; 

So I was going along my own business, making sure I complete every single side-quest available, when all of a sudden I'm joined by this random person. I had no clue that my lobby was open, so my first reaction was to be a bit wary and maybe even prepare to kick him. However that wasn't the case. This person offered me some extremely powerful weaponry from the endgame, which I said I couldn't accept due to the difficulty I want, and he agreed to use less powerful weapons too in the meantime. He then suggested we do the DLC mission, which I wasn't even aware a had. And that adventure was so amazing. We stormed the &gt;!prison!&lt; together and cleared out endless waves of gunmen and zombies, and he showed me all kinds of cool gizmos to take them down like freezing crossbow bolts and explosive arrows. I had a few of my own tricks like dropkicking enemies and throwing my cheaply fashioned metal pipes at them. We had to really combine our heads to get past some of the locked doors. At one point, I honestly felt like I was in a zombie apocalypse when I told him to keep them busy for a few seconds while I picked a lock to get us through to the next zone. However that soon felt more like a comedy movie once I turned around with the door unlocked to see he had just finished killing the volatiles. We escaped the &gt;!prison!&lt; with so much loot, and I was amazed at just how good some it was, whilst still being in my level range.

However, all good things must come to an end, and it was time to say goodnight to this friend that I had just made. We added each other on steam and bid farewell, and I went to sleep as it was getting late. 

The next evening, I was completing some of the side quests at night, when all of a sudden the clear daylight sky went to pitch black, and in a span of a second, the game had told me I was being invaded. I was so scared, I had never been chased by any volatiles at night on this save, let alone by a night hunter itself. I immediately ran towards the safe zone and managed to get inside without encountering the beast. For a split second I was relieved, but then the night hunter began to type to me in chat, taunting me to come out and fight in fair combat. I thought he was out of his mind, how am I, a simple runner, supposed to take down such a potent adversary. I just bolted out of the back exit of the tower and dashed towards the objective in the hopes of reaching there before him, but instead I was met with the most unpleasant shriek I've ever heard, followed by tentacles wrapping around me at an alarming rate. I was scared shitless (sorry for my French), and to make matters worse, the monster turned my incapacitated self to face it, and then bit my entire head off. I never wanted to go through anything like that again, I just stayed at the safe zone after I respawned, and told him that I refuse to play against him anymore. That's when the kindest act imaginable occurred. The night hunter I was playing against not only said he'd teach me how to fight properly against him, but he also seemed pretty apologetic. We spent the next quarter of an hour sparring, with him giving me the opportunity to find the right timings for dodging and how to effectively use my flashlight. After the match ended, we said our goodbyes and I thanked him as well.

Now here's the good part. Later that evening, that friend that I had made the previous day asked if we could play again, and I was all for it. However he wanted me to turn off night invasions. I wanted to impress him by showing him how well I can take them down, so I decided to keep it on and taunt him a little. We were in the middle of doing a story mission in the middle of the night, when we got invaded by a random night hunter. Then two other people joined our server to help us, and all of a sudden, I was leading on an attack to destroy this night hunter's nest. It felt amazing dropkicking the night hunter in the chest, watching somebody so powerful just fall down two stories in slow motion. Then my friend got in on the action a bit, we ended up defeating the night invader, killing it more times than it had killed us. This was the most fun I've had in a while when it comes to video games, and I highly suggest this game to everyone if you wish to feel like an empowered zombie slayer like me!",GirlGamers
I Wish Women Gamers/Content Creators Wouldn't Turn on Each Other Simply Because of Unconscious Bias,"I was really enlightened by most of the comments in response to my last post. I realize that my angst was directed towards the wrong people. Over the years I have missed out on potential friendships due to my own jealousy and insecurity, while also enabling women YouTubers to sex shame other women who are doing what they want to with their freedoms **without harming anyone.**

I do understand that no one owes anyone their allegiance solely on the basis of gender, but we have to make an effort to hold each other accountable for what we say about each other and our life styles, because when we see women YouTubers tearing each other down on the basis of looks and sexuality, we're giving men permission to do so as well.",GirlGamers
Here Are Four Devs Who Would Never Fire a Female Employee Because They Don't Have One,,GirlGamers
Why can’t we play without getting these cringefest messages?,,GirlGamers
Heavy Rain &amp; a few other various games. For you ladies that are playing PS4,"It's up after waiting for what feels like ages (since I've played Beyond Two Souls) Heavy Rain is now up as a FREE download for Playstation Plus. I'm so excited!!! Figured somebody out there plays and enjoys these types of games as much as I do.

What did you ladies think of Heavy Rain? (It'll be my first time playing it, but I'm super stoked since this was on my game play list to play since the earlier consoles such as Playstation 2 &amp; 3).  ",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - July 13, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
My boyfriend gifted me this gorgeous keyboard for my birthday!,,GirlGamers
The Verge: ArenaNet firings cast a chilling shadow across the game industry,,GirlGamers
Does anyone have to act like a man to play video games online? (Vent kinda),"Every time I try to play a game online I have to act like a man or else I'm gonna be insulted and laugh at I lost so many friends because I told them i was a girl and the only friend I have doesn't even know it yet, it just frustrated like why can't I be myself without being judge. Does anyone one had to experience this?
Sorry for the vent I was holding it for too long lol",GirlGamers
Overwatch In-Game LFG,"What do you all think of the new -looking for group- feature?

I've been able to find groups so much more easily, nobody fights over roles anymore, it's amazing. I saw this group that really pissed me off one time called ""Guys Damage / Girls SUpport"". Pretty much ruined my day.",GirlGamers
"""We don't use the word 'fun'"" says The Last of Us 2 director Neil Druckmann",,GirlGamers
Added some Galaga (my favorite arcade game) art to my gaming room!,,GirlGamers
Typical,"Just because I'm a girl, don't assume I don't know how to play. If I don't, I'll ask. Simple. ",GirlGamers
I commissioned art of two of my WoW characters!,,GirlGamers
I painted my nails to match my custom controller. ☺️,,GirlGamers
Ellie from the last of us character analysis,,GirlGamers
Suggestion for f2p mmog's on PC,"Hi!  
I'm a Uruguayan (time zone UTC-3) male gamer, that lives with his girlfriend and am looking for f2p mmogs for her with the intention to help her make new friends.    
You see, she is quite reserved and has difficulties making new friends, but once you go through the external ice wall she's an amazing person and an exceptional good friend.  
Her interests regarding games are mostly shooters, but she has also been playing a few RPG's and loves the progression system and variety of options on them. Obviously, it has to be a non toxic, girl gamer friendly environment, that's why I'm posting here :)  
About her personal interests in life, they are varied and go from singing (she's a dramatic soprano that wants to become an opera singer someday) to drag-queen stylr makeup and a fan of the Kardashians haha she's a goth, plays guitar, is a cinephile and we've been together on the most perfect relationship for 2 years already &lt;3 she watches movies unsubtitled (meaning her dominion of English is very good) and is curious about the different cultures in the world.  
We have considered Warframe, Path of Exile, Guild Wars, Tera (BTW, I almost forgot... She HATES 'anime aesthetics' and would prefer a game with Western aesthetics), DC Universe Online, Secret World but would like to know which one has the best community. Any suggestions?  
Thank you!  
  
  
TL,DR: looking for f2p mmog's for my girlfriend, she's introverted but amazing and would like to make friends around the world",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - July 11, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
"I've just released the game I've spent a year developing myself, and you can now download it for free","Hello everyone! I've spent the last year making the script, story and graphics for a game titled **Commissar's Contrapasso**, a point and click adventure game set in WW2.

This is a project born from my passion in history as well as classic cartoons and adventure games, and I wanted to try and do a different take on a war story. This game is story-focused and has an aesthetic inspired by 1940's cartoons.

The game has a pay-what-you-want model, so you can pay for it if you wish to support a struggling artist or play it for free if you are short on cash or want to play the game before you decide whether it's worth your money. The game is currently playable in English and Swedish, but I hope to add more language options eventually and the game should be able to run on Windows and Linux.

[**You can download it here!**](https://gamejolt.com/games/commissars-contrapasso/291181)

I hope you'll enjoy playing it as much as I enjoyed making it!",GirlGamers
For Honor,Hey ladies! 😊 I just wanted to ask you whether some of you might just play with For Honor? I play it since its release. What are your experiences and opinions about the game and realistic female warriors? 😊,GirlGamers
does anyone else prefer to play as male character?,"(I'm hesitant to make post here since I've been just lurking for a long time, but I want to hear your thoughts so here goes)


So, I was talking to my coworker about games and such, and she said that she doesn't like playing games that doesn't allow you to choose your gender and ""forces"" you to play as male. She said she finds it hard to relate to male characters. And I thought that I felt exactly the same, except the opposite. I always play as male, and have never played as female. I once tried playing DA:I as female qunari, because I wanted to romance Sera (lol), but just couldn't get into it. 

Does anyone else feel the same? ",GirlGamers
Pink Peripherals,I'm looking for pink peripherals other than the basic [Razer Quartz](https://www.razer.com/quartz) . I might buy the mouse and headset but I'm still looking for different options. So far for the keyboard I found the [Vermilo Sakura](https://www.taekeyboards.com/single-post/REVIEW-Ducky-x-Varmilo-Miya-Pro-Mechanical-Keyboard?tag=hydrodip) . ,GirlGamers
"Polygon: ""ArenaNet ‘folded like a cheap card table,’ says fired Guild Wars 2 writer""",,GirlGamers
F1 2017,"Hi there! Was wondering if anyone here has played the game. If so what how has your experience been? Any pros/cons? 

Thanks ladies ",GirlGamers
Cute gaming mouse rec?,"So I'm in the market for a new gaming mouse. I've been using a cheap knockoff one I got in China for 20 yuan. Does anyone have a good recommendation for a gaming mouse that's decent *and* cute? I really dislike the general ""marketed to gamers"" aesthetic with all the black and epilepsy-inducing RGB lighting and specifically chose my parts and peripherals to not be like that. The only one I've seen so far is the [Razer D.Va one](https://www.razer.com/licensed-and-team-peripherals/dva-razer-abyssus-elite) which is pretty expensive - I am planning to get their D.Va mousepad though (although if anyone has recs for cute mousepads too let me know!). ",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - July 10, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
So happy with my gaming room - thought I'd share,,GirlGamers
Miffed about work situation (vent),"I work retail in a game store where, surprisingly enough, the majority of our staff is women who play games (4/6 are ladies. Go gals). I was assisting a female customer, her daughter, and her son. She was asking me plenty of questions about Nintendo and I was answering to the best of my ability. I personally don’t play Nintendo games and the only system I’ve ever owned was the GameCube (Harvest Moon, am I right?). The only question I wasn’t able to answer was what “Jame Ghost Hunter” was about. It’s apparently a new title coming out on the 3DS. I apologized, she said it was fine, and then we proceeded to the till. 

At the till is where this whole thing boils down. I’m ringing her up and she smiles at her children and looks me dead in the face “Oh I like coming here. The people here don’t know anything at all but at least they’re fun.” 

And that just rubbed me entirely the wrong way. If you’re going to insult me, at least do so when you’ve exited the store and after I’ve rung you through. I broke customer service rules and snapped back. “Actually ma’am, everyone here has their own niches. Mine happens to be PlayStation, which I own every single console produced so far and I’ve played all of the exclusive titles - including the smaller JRPGs - and the associate behind me is PC. We have another gal who specializes in Xbox, another in third person action games and bullet hell shooters, and a gentleman who specializes in Nintendo.” 

The reason this bothers me so much is because I guarantee my male coworker behind me wouldn’t have gotten the same flack I did for not knowing one, *one*, stupid game. ",GirlGamers
Overwatch with the Pink Mercy skin raised more than $12.7 million (USD) to support the Breast Cancer Research Foundation,,GirlGamers
"How do you play with Inverted Controls (X, Y, Both, Neither)?","So, I got really sick over the weekend.  While I’m been huddling under my tie blanket on the couch, I’ve been trying to rest up while passing the time until Octopath Traveler comes out.  (Couldn’t my body waited until next week to make me sick?!)  Anywho, my wife saw an ad somewhere mentioning a demo for Captain Toad Treasure Tracker was out, and so I grabbed it for her to watch while I play, like we usually do.  While watching, she said “Wifey, why do you keep turning the camera the wrong way?”  I told her it doesn’t appear this game lets me invert the axis of rotation for the way I think, so I was having trouble.   Does anyone else play with inverted controls and get upset when a game won’t let you change them?",GirlGamers
So Proud of My Wife!,"I'm not sure if this is exactly what this subreddit is for, but I just wanted someplace to boast about my wife because I'm so proud of her!

She's one of the best PvP healers in WoW that I've seen (Resto Druid), but she hates getting in group chat when they use voice because she gets all the comments about being a woman. She's also pretty good at Overwatch (though she sells herself short) and has recently started streaming mostly Overwatch. 

She was hesitant at first, being a female, and wasn't sure if she'd be successful at all because she dresses modestly and is more introverted. However, she's doing really well and has come out of her shell and I couldn't be more proud of her and the work she's putting into her channel and marketing and everything that goes into streaming!

I just had to share.",GirlGamers
Monster Hunter: World PC is officially coming out August 9th! I'm so excited!,,GirlGamers
Is This nOrMaL?,"I recently befriended some people. Joined their server, played Siege with them, and then I hear that somebody there doesn't like me. It's another girl. I wanted to talk to her because I really don't know that many women online and I don't get to play with others like me. She refused. Blocked me. I really wanted to befriend her but she just pushed back. Then one of the guys told me that she just didn't like me. Well, okay then. He said that she was jealous that I was there and getting more ""respect"" (her words). Which really upsets me because all I wanted was to meet another girl. I don't know if others girls are like this. I kinda regret joining the server now. I feel like I disrupted something.",GirlGamers
Need help deciding on a gaming chair!,I cant decide on which chair I want to go with. I'm only 5'5 about 126lbs so I'm not sure which chair would best suit my size. I've kind of narrowed it down to either DXracer Racing series or OPseat Master series. ,GirlGamers
Lost a save game with a bunch of progress and mad at myself for how mad I am about it,"This is mostly a rant, I guess. Had a major SNAFU with my save for stardew valley (which I just started playing a few weeks ago -- it's fantastic!) and basically have to start over from scratch after sinking a lot of hours in. And I don't know what upsets me more, losing a save that I put a lot of time into, or that it's making me physically ill and unable to sleep because I'm so upset about it. 

I don't know if this even belongs here, but I figured if anyone could relate, it would be you guys. ",GirlGamers
Am i in the wrong?,"Hey girls, i need some help.

So i am sure you guys all know my pain, i get a tonne of abuse online. By guys and girls, mostly on games like Overwatch. 

Anyway on Saturday night i was in a quick play game and this guy and girl were being toxic. They screamed at me constantly and told me to 'go get cancer and die' so i left. I blocked them and went to join my friend. I was upset but he said ignore it.

We join a comp game and these guys are all messing around so i join in too. They ignore me. We win the first round and one asks who has gold elims and i say i do with 30 as a joke. *Mercy* he says don't be so fucking stupid and shut up. Then says SLUT. His friends laugh and my friend sits there.

Afterwards i leave and say im upset. He says i was waiting for you to get angry and go of on them and laughed. You see he stood up for this girl he hates before and he says it was because a guy was shouting at her, that being called a slut isn't half as bad.

I haven't spoken to him since because it's made me dislike him a little if im honest. Not because he didn't white knight me but becuase he laughed and doesn't see how words can hurt.

Am i overreacting?",GirlGamers
This was way too relatable though.,,GirlGamers
Guild Wars studio fires two employees after Twitter clash with streamer (The Verge),,GirlGamers
"Thanks to encouragement from this sub, I've been braver with my plays and calls and reached what I thought was impossible.",,GirlGamers
Any good modded Minecraft servers around?,"Kinda jonsing to play some minecraft, but don't have the money (or gumption) to run my own server. Plus playing with people is a lot more fun than playing alone. 

Been a long time since I played, and just want to have some fun. Figured I'd ask here to see if any of you wonderful ladies has recommendations.",GirlGamers
Characters that aren't romance-able but you wish were.,There has been quite a few discussions on this sub on favourite romance-able characters (normally with Alistair and Garrus taking the lead). But are there any NPCs that you wish you could have had a romance with despite never having the option (whether the game has romance or not)?,GirlGamers
Suggestions for streamers for kids to watch!,"Hi guys! My nephews (6 year old boys) are starting to get into gaming and have been watching a lot of streams on YouTube. I’ve made them their own account and want to subscribe them to some female streamers so they can get used to girls in the gaming community. 

Have you got any good recommendations for family friendly female streamers? Or any family friendly gamers in general? ",GirlGamers
[GW2] This is what ArenaNet's recent firing of Jessica Price and Peter Fries has emboldened,,GirlGamers
WoW raiding/RP guild recruiting for BfA!,"Hi! I’m a trans female &amp; officer in the WoW guild Vindicated, Horde side, on the Wyrmrest Accord (NA) Server.

We’ve been very active in Legion clearing heroic raids for AotCs (Nighthold, Tome &amp; Argus); holding regular guild M+ nights; RPing with guild storylines as well as one-offs; and scheduling a few random guild Rated BG nights. So with that same mindset we’re opening active recruitment back up for BfA!

**Our Policies:** We’re an LGBTQIA+ guild that also welcomes Ally recruits (Pride Ally, not WoW Alliance). We maintain a staunch anti-hate speech policy: no harassment/jokes/slurs that involve sexism, racism, transphobia, homophobia, classism, ableism and other explicit forms of ignorance.

**Raiding &amp; Mythics+:** regular raid and M+ nights will be starting back up in BfA.

Our raiding goals include getting AotC for each new tier — just like we did in Legion — and maintaining a dedicated core team so we can step into Mythic to down a few bosses. We’ll never be a Cutting Edge guild, but we’d like to casually tackle Mythic while it’s still relevant for each tier.

Our raid tank and healing spots are filled, but even if you main a tank/healer, you’re welcome to DPS with us if you’d still like to be in our LGBTQIA+ &amp; Ally-friendly raid team.

As for Mythic+, all DPS &amp; Main Tanks/Healers are welcome to run guild Mythic+ groups!

Finally, our most important raiding and M+ goal that we adhere to is providing a very laid-back and chill atmosphere for all PvE content. So if you want to freak out/yell/scream during every mythic+, or about wiping on a raid boss, or even a mistake made, then this isn’t the guild for you.

**Role-Playing Events:** Our RP events are completely optional, but you’re encouraged to give them a try! We keep In Character and Out Of Character clearly separate, so our RP stories can be full of In Character drama-goodness, but once we’re done with the RP, its back to being friends &amp; guildies, killing NPC pixels and not each other.

We try to have an RP event once every other week, to every week, but random guild events happen. We’re looking to establish an RP officer to maintain an even more frequent RP event schedule.

**PvP:** We’d love to have a more regular and dedicated PvP side to the guild, and are looking to create a PvP officer position in the future. For now our PvP is very casual. And as with PvE, we're very chill about PvP: it's definitely more about fun than anything else, so no freak outs/screaming/yelling about losing/mistakes.

**Out of WoW Activities:** we’ve held a few streaming nights, where we get together in Discord to watch a member play a non-WoW game. Guild Overwatch guild nights have happened as well. We plan on continuing these and other non-WoW events from time to time as a way to change up the pace.

**Joining:** Regardless of the guild activity, whether its future raiding, mythic+, RP, PvP, or even if you primarily solo but would still like a safe place to be yourself, put in an application! We love having lots of good, genuinely kind people with us, no matter what you're interested in doing. :O)

Here’s our link for filling out an application: [https://vindicated.enjin.com/recruitment](https://vindicated.enjin.com/recruitment)

You can contact any of the following officers in-game for more info: Kitherea, Malsik, Ekon, Daroa

See you in game!",GirlGamers
Does it feel like big female streamers who look like super models make it hard for girls who don't look like them to be successful?,"It's hard to be a girl on camera on Twitch especially if you're plain looking. I've been thinking about streaming, but I have to accept the fact that I will never bloom out of an A cup, and that I also have glasses and braces at 20 compared to the women who's instagrams are flooded with stunning photos of themselves (and cleavage...). The angst that I feel sometimes comes from the fact that I simply don't fit the stereotypical definition of what a girl or woman should be--it seems like it's not just enough to be good at what you're streaming or to have a good personality. **I only want to be known for my gameplay but I've seen women on twitch who's looks don't measure up to bigger streamers get harassed constantly and have a harder time gaining views.** How should women like me--women who just want to  stream games for fun--approach streaming when we don't measure up physically to the girls who are gorgeous on top of producing good content? You rarely hear men worry about people not watching them because of their looks...",GirlGamers
Romance options in Far Cry?,"Would you like Ubisoft to implement romance options in the far cry games? A lot of people haa crushes on a few characters of Far Cry (specially Far Cry 5 xD) and I like the idea of romance and changes in the next Assassins Creed. What do you think? 

Btw, sorry for my english!
",GirlGamers
What video game trends are you glad for and/or wanting to see more of?,"Related to the [post that I made yesterday](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/8wcpka/what_is_the_worst_trend_in_current_video_games/), I have another question. I am glad that video game companies, and the video game industry as a whole, has decided to add more inclusivity in games, events, etc. ",GirlGamers
Suggestions for games / streamers that are your happy place?,"I'm going through a rough time right now and I'd love to watch some lighthearted playthroughs of games, but I feel like all the people I normally watch are doing horror/dark/sad games right now. Any suggestions?

My go-to is Cryaotic's Ratchet and Clank playthrough. I also like Detective Pikachu and Kirby games. Really just any fun lighthearted games played by chill streamers/Youtubers (not a lot of yelling). Nintendo games maybe? 

Thanks guys! &lt;3",GirlGamers
Guild Wars 2 writers fired after Twitter argument,,GirlGamers
"Women of Ubisoft - Interview with Melissa MacCoubrey, narrative director for Assassin's Creed Odyssey",,GirlGamers
Two things,"1. In about a month, We Happy Few, will be released and I can NOT wait.
2. I played Unraveled Two with my SD last night and this game is absolutely stunning. I *highly* recommend it. 

I thought about posting all of this last night but alas! I got a little post shy. However, this morning I'm still pretty stoked about both of these games  and I wanted to pass the excitability and recommendations on.

Happy gaming, Happy Friday ladies! ",GirlGamers
Just Finished Detroit: Become Human and Loved it. This is a great game for story driven gamers who don't like combat.,"Hi All,
So I'm pretty new to this sub, didn't even know it was thing but I'm glad I found it. So I recently played Detroit:Become Human and I though it was a great game. I've always been story driven and play most of my games on the easiest mode possible with some exceptions (games like Bioshock and Halo are always played on hard) and I figured there have to be other people like me who aren't really into the combat. I guess the best way to describe this game is that it is a bunch of quick-time events. You know those cinematic fight scenes where you have to quickly push the right button at the right time or fail that action? this is basically the entire game, with timed decision making. I would watch the AngryJoe review as it's pretty accurate, but I thought some would like to know that I thought it was worth it. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tiphSNWXIfM  ",GirlGamers
ArenaNet fired one of their female devs for taking a stand against mansplaining on Twitter - thoughts?,,GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - July 06, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
[SPOILERS] NieR:Automata was amazing.,"I finished endings [A]-[E] the other day, and I was blown away.

The story was one quite possibly the best I've ever seen in a game, and the themes of existential crises, discrimination, loneliness, depression, despair, all spoke to me at a level I've never experienced in a video game before.

I've played so so many games which I've adored, which have spoken to some of my deepest desires and fears, but I've never had a game rip out my heart and nail it to the television for me to see like NieR:Automata has done.

I struggle almost daily with feeling like I don't have any meaning in life, that my heart and soul are missing or fragmented... I watched 9S fall apart in route [C/D], as he learned that every meaning his life had ever had was either dead, or a lie; I wanted to hug him. I wanted to hold him and tell him that it would all be alright, but I couldn't.

Even if I could tell him, I couldn't, because it isn't all okay. Suffering is real, and often so much easier to find than happiness in this world. Their gods, the humans YoRHa was created to serve, are gone; worse than that, they were even there in the first place.

Every stable foundation they'd built themselves, their identities, upon possessed little more than an illusion of stability and meaning. They'd forced the androids to live in service to a lie.

How do you have hope without purpose? How do you create a purpose for yourself? How do you give anything meaning, and what even is meaning or purpose? To even speculate seems pointless.

I've seen NieR:Automata's path of existential despair with my own two eyes, and I can't think of a single game which expresses that melancholy better.

When 2B or 9S wonders about humanity, or their own sense of meaning, I felt pangs of guilt. It was as if they were begging for me to help them escape their despair, but I could do nothing.

I distinctly remember thinking near the end of the game ""Please, don't ask me these questions. I don't know. I can't help you; I'm sorry."" It hurt because it felt like the characters were turning to me for questions I also had no answers to, and I couldn't help but feel that I was letting them down.

I'm sure there are a million other things I could talk about, but I can hardly get these thoughts out into the world, let alone all the others.",GirlGamers
What is the worst trend in current video games?,"Personally, I am starting to dislike open world games. (Don't @ me XP)

For example, I love Assassin's Creed games. **LOVE.** But Origins left me a little bit unfulfilled. It seemed like the main story became a second thought because of all of the side quests, encounters, whatever that need to be scattered throughout the world. It becomes repetitive. 

What do you think?",GirlGamers
Good online games to make friends,"I'm sorry if this has been posted ad nauseam, but reddit's search function is absolute garbage. 

I'm currently staying in China, and while it's an awesome place, it's really hard to find English speakers. Sometimes it gets a little lonely. What online games would you ladies recommend I play where I can make friends and not just get hit on or whatever? Perferrable something that's not too expensive because I am a little on the broke side at the moment. 
",GirlGamers
Would you be pumped on a new gamer bar? I need advice!!,"Hey ladies, my name is Maggie. I am an entrepreneur living in San Jose California - **working on a project to open up an eSports bar in the Bay Area.** Will you give me some feedback on the idea?

There is nowhere for nerds to go get their drink on in a comfortable environment. I would literally rather die than step foot in a club. You couldn't pay me to go out dancing. I just want to kick it with some friends, have beers, and whoop some ass at video games. So where do we go? Living rooms. Basements. Garages. etc. I want a spot we can go out and do what we do best, but in a public environment. I am not talking about an eSports arena (because those are cool and all, but sitting in a huge room wearing headphones is not my kind of socializing), and I am not talking about a LAN center, I am talking a gamer bar.

A mix of console, VR, and computer gaming with eSPorts events and twitch streams on the TVs. Each booth with its own TV and access to every multiplayer game you can think of. You can chill and watch, chill and play, or get your competitive juices flowing and take on friends and other people at the bar.

There is a certain energy when a group of gamers get together and take each other on at our favorite games. The idea here is to get our butts out of the house and build a community. eSports are bigger than ever and growing rapidly. Gaming is no longer just for kids. We gotta step out of the shadows and show the world how gamers party! Gaming is cool, fun, competitive, and many peoples favorite hobby. From NES to Oculus Rift and everything in between.

If there was a spot with games, food, and booze - do you think it would succeed in the Bay Area? How do you picture a gamer bar? Would you come check it out?

Thanks everyone!

P.S. I know AFK was open for a few years and they had their share of internal issues. I would be stoked to work with those guys if they are down for a similar concept!",GirlGamers
I really wanted a standing desk. I have no funds for a standing desk.,,GirlGamers
A male friend was leveling a female character when suddenly...,,GirlGamers
What Games Do You Feel Alienated By?,"Personally I feel the Witcher series is just not made for me or women in general in mind. The oversexualisation of pretty much all the women in this game makes me feel excluded from a kind of fantasy boys club. I've heard people saying that these women are also usually powerful and important, but I just don't buy it.

Yes, I've heard the combat is great. Yes, I've heard there's a rich story...but I can't shake this feeling.

Do you agree or disagree about the Witcher? What games make you feel this way and why?

EDIT : Not shaming anyone who likes the Witcher or any games discussed within :) ",GirlGamers
Bloodborne players?,"Any girls here play this game or any Soulborne games??
I just recently platinumed it and now looking for other girls who've tried the game at least. ",GirlGamers
Calling All Hero of the Kingdom Fans!,"Hi guys! First of all, thanks to whoever linked to that r/steamdeals comment that had a huge list of short awesome games to play. I'm kind of addicted to Hero of the Kingdom so thank you from the bottom of my heart.

I'm kind of stuck right now though. Whenever I get really frustrated with a certain part I'll look up a walkthrough to get me through that tiny part. Unfortunately, there a lot more guides for the second game and I can't find any for the first. Can anyone point me to a comprehensive walkthrough for the first game? If there isn't one, can someone please tell me how to get the red mushrooms that the swamp frog man wants? I've been looking around for a while and I can't find them anywhere. Much appreciated!",GirlGamers
"Does anyone know any games like wii fit, or a game-like exercise?","It feels weird of me to ask but, I’m trying to get fit and healthy, I actually owned the game and balance board before it broke on me. Playing Wii fit I was at my lowest weight and highest fitness ... and I remember enjoying it. Which is why I want to recreate it years later, I have little motivation for regular exercise (except walking) I just feel bored and sore...",GirlGamers
"So, would it be a good idea to build a new PC this Q4?","On one hand, the obsolescence of this rig is getting visible and the new nVidia may be due this Gamescom. OTH, DDR5 is on the horizon, and the first chips are due next year.",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - July 04, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
Is there any video game you always play for some reason?,"Is there any video game you always want to play in a determined situation or moment? 
For example I like to play Far Cry 3 every summer. I always end up playing when it's hot lol. And when I felt nostagic I used to play some Final Fantasy game. What about you? :)",GirlGamers
"""every healthy caucasian male is a sexist""","I got this brilliant quote by a random person in one of my champion selects in league. https://i.imgur.com/L6j4GDN.jpg

Backstory: Me (Zyra/red) played a game against Olaf (purple), he was being sexist towards his female teammates in all chat, saying they were egrills trash, that girls are horrible at video games and can only play support/mid etc. I was stomping that game and playing super well, so I outed myself as a girl and told him to stop being sexist. This just made him insult me too.

Fast forward to my next champion select, I get placed on a team with this guy. I hover Zyra pick, he hovers to ban it. He did not end up banning it. I'm planning to dodge this game no matter what, and decide to remind him that he's a sexist asshole and ask him to stop playing league and go out and talk to some girls. This is where Vladimir (green), comes to his rescue, with this wonderful quote. 

TL;DR: decided to stick up to some girls getting harassed in all chat, met two sexist dudes.",GirlGamers
Eternal Card Game is the best CCG right now,"I made a post about three months ago about Eternal and how it's reignited my love for CCGs. It's even better now. The newest set just dropped a few days ago and it's EPIC. The new mechanics are fantastic and the art is to die for. If you're looking to try a new card game, give this one a go. It's very free-to-play friendly, you don't have to drop hundreds of dollars for a competitive deck. See you there!

[My original post](https://old.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/88kp40/eternal_card_game_is_the_best_ccg_right_now/)

Feel free to add me - Malcalypse+0709.

And a referral link if you're looking to start - https://www.direwolfdigital.com/eternal/register/?ref=2bdf4e39-2bf7-42ad-a4d8-78518bf605cc 

",GirlGamers
So I had my gamer pic set as my Snapchat picture for the longest time but after all the annoying spam invites and weird msgs because they knew I was a girl I decided to change to something more appropriate. I feel better now 🙂,,GirlGamers
A unique nickname!,"How did you come up with your username on steam, games, reddit? I’m looking for a cool, easy to pronounce username for games :) , do you have any recommendations on how to find one?",GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - July 03, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
"""Girl Gamer"" Imposter Syndrome?","Hi all,

So I've been trying to process these feelings for a while, ever since my world view was utterly blown when I realized how a ""girl gamer"" was normally treated by the gaming community. I grew up not really being able to play video games because my parents thought they were terrible (I still hide all my game stuff and tell them it's my BF's when they visit) so I sneakily played DS emulators and interactive fiction at school. All of my friends were girls and a lot of them gamed so I never thought there was anything unusual about girls playing video games. After I got into college, I began to actually play a lot more. It wasn't until a date saw my Steam library and was like ""wow you're actually a *real* gamer"" that I had any idea that ""girl gamers"" were rare. My bf was kinda surprised by my surprise because he pointed out that even though he hung out in the nerdiest circles at our (admittedly tiny) college, I was the only girl he knew that truly was interested in video games because I just *liked* them and not other reasons. 


So with that pointed out, and after seeing how talented all of you lovely ladies here are, I have - I don't know - weird feelings of imposter syndrome? Like I don't deserve the title of ""girl gamer"" somehow? My closest female friend that games is super competitive and into esports and FPS stuff and sometimes gatekeeps ""my"" kind of gaming, like I'm not really a true gamer. 


I don't like FPS's, I just generally don't like combat or violence that much. I love the narratives and stories of games, so I play almost every game on ""story mode"" because I'd much rather be a kleptomaniac and loot every item in game or run around and listen to every piece of lore or reroll my character until she's perfect or craft pretty armor than figure out the combat mechanics. I also like to play with walkthroughs because I obsessively want to experience *everything* in my one run because my backlog is so long and I get bored easily. I have horrible hand-eye coordination so I literally cannot walk and shoot at the same time in games.


All of these habits have been mocked teasingly by my friends. My bf tries to tell me I won't improve at being ""good"" at games until I stop being so afraid of failure and using walkthroughs as a crutch. He helped coach me through Overwatch but I didn't really get that much into the game - I liked the skins and aesthetics of the game but shooting things frustrates me. My friends - a lot of guys - joke about how bad I am at video games too. I've kinda embraced it because I like playing what I play but it still stings a bit sometimes. 

I guess I just feel like a terrible representation of a girl gamer? I feel like I should better represent ""girl gamer"" to everyone I meet/know but I'm scared I'm just perpetuating terrible stereotypes? 

Anyone else feel this way or is it just me?",GirlGamers
[Esports] Mica Burton to host Overwatch Contenders NA Season 2,,GirlGamers
Looking for some recs,"Back when I was in high school, a class mate recommended to me a Fire Emblem game. I don't remember which one was, but I do remember that I liked it.

I recently decided to pick up Fire Emblem Echoes and I'm liking it. Are there other games similar to the Fire Emblem games? I kind of remember that Final Fantasy Tactics was similar, but that's it.",GirlGamers
Setting up an ARK server! Please give your opinion on maps and game modes!,"Hi everyone! I'm Sharky and I'm a big fan of ARK: Survival Evolved. I was happily surprised to see in a recent post there is a big interest in a Girl Gamers ARK server where we can all play together without worrying about harassment or offensive behaviour. I ran my own ARK server last year for a few months with a few people, but eventually interest dropped off and I shut it down. I am very eager to play again so I am preparing to start it up again, but I need your input!



I created a Discord server specifically for this ARK server, it is private and will only be available to people with a link AKA you lovely people. My goal is to create a safe space for women, femme and non binary people to play together, make friends, and enjoy ARK without the toxicity so common in most servers. I am open to allowing men and masculine people join as well so long as they adhere strictly to our core values of inclusivity, respect, and safety from any form of discrimination. For now, though, I'm limiting join requests to people in this sub so I can keep track of things as we get started, and I am ALWAYS open to suggestions or concerns!



**UPDATED July 4: Here is a 24 hour invite link to the Discord: https://discord.gg/998pKpv**



Please read through the rules and introduce yourself! Before I officially open the server itself, I want to know what game mode and server features the majority of players want to see. I generally play PVE myself due to bad experiences with griefing and harassment, but I am open to PVP if we can coordinate it in a way that isn't detrimental to those who prefer PVE. Please include your preference for PVE or PVP in your introduction!



As well, we need to choose a starting map! The host I have chosen does allow cluster maps so we can travel between ARKs easily, but for starters I'd like to set up just one and get everyone acclimated before adding more. I personally enjoy the Ragnarok map for its size and variety of cool build spots, but again, please state your preference of maps in your intro post. Options include The Island, The Center and Ragnarok.



Finally, any suggestions for mods to install or game adjustments (like tame speed, experience gain rate, etc etc) are appreciated. I generally do increase the tame rate and experience gained to a degree so that the early levels go by a little more quickly, but too much and you lose the challenge (and the fun!), so knowing what you guys prefer will be very helpful to me.



That's about all I have for now! Please feel free to join the Discord server and post your introduction as well as your game preferences and any other suggestions you may have! I will launch the server totally vanilla with tame speed and experience gained rates increased slightly, but everything can be changed once we know what the majority wants. Hope to see you there, friends!

",GirlGamers
How do you all make friends IRL?,"Not just gamer friends, but friends in general. When your main hobby involves staying inside, how do you meet other people?

 I just moved after finishing grad school and made most of my friends through school, but now we’re scattered everywhere. I’ve downloaded meetup, but most of the events involve going out (which I don’t love) or its filled with seemingly older guys. I’m still going to give it a chance, but how have you all made your friends when your ideal weekend involves staying in?",GirlGamers
Women doing Games Analysis &amp; Reviews on Youtube,"So its no secret that the skew of YouTubers producing content about video games leans heavily towards guys, but nowhere is this more pronounced really than in the sphere of analysis, criticism or reviews. Finding women who Let's Play or stream is a heck of a lot easier. 

Now a friend of mine has been interested in this for a while and has been compiling a list (Not just video games related) of various YouTubers for some kinda project, an after bugging her she passed on all the gamers on it to me so I'm now posting 'em here. Hopefully some of you guys find new peeps to sub to, and if you have any suggestions for people not currently on the list drop 'em in the comments please!! 

* [Alex and Crackers](https://www.youtube.com/user/alexandcrackers)

* [Alexandra Orlando](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCAUuyRBkGg528QpOtPPwp_g)

* [Cannot be Tamed](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCzwyF_IcyMP86ilsmKD1Pcw)

* [Critique Quest](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC4AUEDA9E-pw5KCEXDsTAVQ)

* [Feminist Frequency](https://www.youtube.com/user/feministfrequency) 

* [Kim Justice](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC9ZWVL1Elyt2cdiQYjxS_1w)

* [PushingUpRoses](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCCTNXqhWPba9Xh8gx0EKOtQ)

* [Red Angel](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCivkpgADQdxYm6OH11Bhmmw)

* [Umbrella Terms](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCV5e-Ih5A-4qKb_n67zJTyg)

* [What's So Great About That?](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC3g8YdblbqlUAKEeAJbzMYw)",GirlGamers
Fave mods?,"I just played my first mod - the Aliens Colonial Marines mod that fixes basically the whole game. It was awesome and the mod process was surprisingly easy. 

What are your fave mods?",GirlGamers
Any ark servers that are fairly tolerant to girls?,"i am getting back into ark: survival evolved but find the single player is nearly impossible due to heavy emphasis on teamwork. i have played on an official server before and while most were friendly, there were a lot of 10-13 year olds being immature. mostly it was getting angry they didn't get their way then killing me or my dinos or keeping a random guy who just spawned for the first time in a cage. then there was that lag of a lot of people logging in at once. i think a smaller non official server might have a benefit, but i am a little afraid since the devs cannot be responsible if people start getting toxic. i usually play on the center dlc map and would prefer a server that uses it, although i am willing to go with the default map if necessary. ",GirlGamers
I asked my boyfriend for a puppy...,,GirlGamers
Any girls play non-Sims simulation games?,"And are also Youtubers? I'm more of a viewer than a gamer these days. I watch a lot of Let's Plays on Youtube, specifically for simulation games (GTA5 RP, Bus Sim 18, American Truck Sim, The Sims series also). No matter what game I'm into, it's always guys playing.

It's like girl gamers only play The Sims series simulation games, and guys play everything else. I'm bummed.",GirlGamers
Geguri will be on the Overwatch League's All-Star team!,"Although her team didn't win a single game, she was one of their more consistent players. Really hoping she goes to a new team and gets to main tank. ",GirlGamers
Favorite game soundtracks?,"Hey ladies!

Was writing up a review for Stardew valley for my blog, its my favorite game soundtrack by far.  The best track is ""Spirit's Eve Festial,"" so dark mmmm.  What are your favorite tracks?

What are your favorite video game soundtracks? 

&lt;3 ",GirlGamers
Should I get my own PS4?,"Would love to hear your opinions. So I currently play on my brothers. I love me some assassins creed, outlast, tlou etc. I obviously can’t play whenever I want since we share. Should I get my own? Is it worth it or I guess “acceptable” to have 2 ps4s in one household lmao ",GirlGamers
K but what *did* Anita do on her visit to Bioware,"The video about how ""angry"" Bioware are with her visit popped on my dash uninvited and while I didn't watch it, it did bring this non-story to my attention.

Did Anita write an article/make a video about Anthem's development or about Bioware? Was there ever a followup? Or is it literally more of the same bile we're used to?",GirlGamers
To Transfer Or Not To Transfer... Need advice (after playing God of War for 2 weeks),"I am in need of some advice from my fellow females! My husband surprised me with a PS4 Pro on my bday, accompanied by God of War. I set it up pretty hastily, and intentionally skipped over the data transfer step. I didn't want to transfer everything anyway, nor did I want to wait that long. 

Obviously, a big mistake to pay for later since it'll wipe everything when I do finally do the transfer.

I didn't realize not doing the transfer during set-up, and opting to do it later gives me two options (that I know of):

I can play through God of War completely and then transfer.

I can transfer everything and start over on God of War.

For those curious where I'm at, &gt;!I just finished beating Magni and Modi by the giant, then rage-quit my first Valkyrie!&lt;

What would you do? Play through and then wipe? Or wipe and then start over? (it's worth noting I have missed some side tasks/collectibles/etc from the get-go)

Or is there another option I don't know about where I don't have everything wiped upon data transfer?

Thanks in advance for your time :)",GirlGamers
I just randomly remembered the site Steamgifts. Has anyone here ever used it?,"I was pretty active on it back in the day, years ago before the site redesign, and thinking about it just now I've come to realize it was a freaking disaster and that pretty much every interaction I had on there was bad.

For those who don't know what Steamgifts is, it's a website where you can enter giveaways for Steam games.  I know this sounds great and too good to be true, but it is legit.  I won several games on there.  That is the *only* good thing I have to say about the site though.

For whatever reason I used to participate in the forums on there.  Thinking back I don't think I had a single good interaction on there.  Every thread would devolve into arguing, usually racism and sexism, accusing people of being ""leeches"", etc.  It was a mess.

Yes, ""leeches"", that was a big thing on that site.  If you entered giveaways but didn't host any of your own you were branded a leech.  Apparently the concept of gifting actually means nothing to them, and you only deserve to win if you've given stuff back in return.   The number of giveaways you've entered vs. hosted was visible on your profile, so anyone could check your page and then yell at you if they thought your entry to gifting ratio wasn't up to their standard.  It also showed the number of comments you've made on your profile, and if you didn't have more comments than entries people would randomly go off on you for not commenting ""thx"" on literally every single giveaway you entered.

Sexism.  Ohhhh sexism.  My Steam username back then was super feminine and so the name I was stuck with on the site was super feminine and everyone knew I was a girl.  This lead to people either loving me or hating me.  I received many a comment calling me a fake gamer girl (regardless of what I did or said, I was automatically fake just because I'm a girl), or on the opposite end of the spectrum, hitting on me.  

I did win a few games, as I mentioned.  Cheap indie games, nothing super expensive, but free games are free games.

A couple weird, personal anecdotes about the site:

- Some Dutch guy latched onto me and decided to make me admin of a private giveaway group he'd made.  I decided I'd better give away some games to the group and held a bunch of giveaways that only group members could enter.  I gave away like 20 keys.  All the winners received their keys, everything went smoothly, but for some reason Dutch guy randomly decided I scammed/stole the keys somehow and unfriended me and removed me from the group.

- I got a link to a private giveaway for a brand new AAA game once.  My boyfriend really really wanted this game, so I gave him the link for him to join the giveaway.  He won, and was ecstatic.  He streamed the game on Twitch that night.  Well, *apparently* the giveaway was private because the host of the giveaway was really hoping a certain guy would win.  Despite that he gave the link out to quite a few people and about 150 people entered (why he didn't just give the guy the game directly I don't know).  Well, some people got angry that the favorite to win did not win and went to my boyfriend's Steam profile (since winners are public), found his stream, and came into the stream flaming him for entering and winning.  They weren't just mad that he won, they were mad that he entered in the first place, since so and so was supposed to win.  Well if he was supposed to win the the host probably shouldn't have let 150 people enter.

Another funny thing about this site is that I've won and given away quite a few games here on Reddit, across various subreddits, and have never had a problem.  That's really telling when Reddit of all things is leagues better.

I feel seeing that behavior on a site like that with soooo many users is pretty telling about Steam's average userbase.  Lots of toxic, immature guys.

Weird site.  Weird experiences.   Has anyone else ever used it?

P.S.  For those of you just learning about this site and wanting to go there for the prospect of free games, enter giveaways if you want  but for the love of god don't talk to anyone, nothing good can come of it.",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - June 29, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Stardew Valley and moving on from trauma,"(I've told the first part of this story on here before so I'm sorry if you've seen it before)

I've been following Stardew Valley for almost six years now, back since it first appeared on Steam Greenlight in fall of 2012.  I immediately fell in love with it when I saw it.  My favorite game being Terraria, I loved the bright colors, pixel art, and promise of multiplayer.  I also loved that a farming game was coming to PC, because most of them were only on console (Harvest Moon, etc.).  It became one of the first Greenlight games I ever voted for and the one I was most invested in.

I followed the development of the game for years.  I followed the social media, would check for updates regularly.  Over the period of 3.5 years between launching on Greenlight and release I was super invested in and extremely hyped for the game.

When it finally came out in spring of 2016 I bought it right away.  I remember that morning I went to the store and got lunch and snacks and came home prepared for a long day of getting lost in the world of Stardew.  Finally.  After years.  I played all day and had a blast...the wait was worth it.

Then that night something bad happened.  Something extremely traumatic and stressful that left me completely broken and lost for a very very long time.  What was a fun day turned into one of the worst days of my life.

Since I had played Stardew all day that day my mind came to associate the game with the traumatic event.  I couldn't play it at all without having horrible flashbacks to the bad stuff that happened that day, and I'd feel lost and sick to my stomach.  I was unable to play this game that I'd waited so long for.

One thing kept me interested in it though...the promise of multiplayer.  I kept waiting and waiting for that, because I knew if I could play with my boyfriend I could hopefully get to build new, happy memories surrounding the game and move past the bad associations.

When the multiplayer beta was launched a few weeks ago I decided I want to try it.  I was nervous about how I'd react, but determined to give it a shot.

Yesterday I picked him up a copy in the Steam sales and last night we tried playing together.  I was nervous that the bad memories would come back playing but he told me it would be okay and I tried my best to have a good time.

*We had a blast*.  We played all night.  We laughed as I kept accidentally using my watering can everywhere, as he passed out from exhaustion breaking rocks, as I kept gifting townspeople trash.  We goofed off and screwed up and had so much fun along the way.  We're learning together and enjoying each other's company and making wonderful memories to replace the bad ones.

I'm finally getting to play and enjoy this game I've been waiting to play for almost six years now.  I'm finally moving on from the trauma that was preventing me from enjoying this game and making wonderful new memories.  It's really nice.  I'm really happy.

(P.S.  For those who saw my recent post where I was concerned he wouldn't be able to connect to me because of the bad internet where he's temporarily at, it worked fine!  We got Terraria to work too 😁)
 ",GirlGamers
A small gal in need of help,"Hello! I’m a pretty young gal (15)and I’m trying to get into gaming, from a young age I was addicted to my DS and would love to play on my cousins ps3 when I got the chance.As I got older I didn’t have the time or money to continue the hobby. A lot of my male friends game(although they mostly play MMOs which I’m not quite the best at) and it reminded me of how much I enjoyed games, after talking to a few and being rather embarrassed that I knew literally nothing I thought that I could build my own pc and play some games :) the only problem is I have no idea how to go about this and I’m pretty sure all my guy friends would get tired of me being v stupid extremely quickly, if anyone would mind helping me out or just telling me things that would be good to know I would greatly appreciate it :D",GirlGamers
New Overwatch champion revealed!,,GirlGamers
PSA: do not play Rime while pregnant,"Just finished Rime on the switch. I won't say anything about the story but the ending together with the pregnancy hormones pushed me into full ugly crying. 

Also for what it's worth, it's a beautiful game, quite relaxing and not particularly difficult. On the Switch it lagged a bit on occasion on portable mode but nothing too excessive. ",GirlGamers
More women are in voice comms since the latest Overwatch update and it's been fantastic.,"Does anyone else feel more compelled to use voice chat thanks to the Endorsement system? Every single comp game I played last night had a women in voice comms. Before this was such a rarity.

Overwatch has given me such a huge confidence booster. I remember thinking to myself when playing more overwatch recently about how impactful gaming can be, and this update totally proved it. More women are leading teams to victory. Thank you Jeff and the Overwatch team. ",GirlGamers
"Man travels across world to attack online friend, shot by girl’s mum - Be Careful Out There Girls!",,GirlGamers
Overwatch's Endorsements May Be A Game Changer!,"For those that don't follow the game, the Endorsement system dropped in Overwatch proper yesterday. It's a system that lets you commend other players (on your own and the enemy team if you want) for three different kinds of good behavior: good sportsmanship, good teamwork, and shotcalling (leadership). You can't endorse people in your party, or any person more then once a day. The endorsements persist, level, and decay, and people can see what you've been endorsed for in a little pie chart on team screens.

*Ladies*. It was the nicest time I've had in Overwatch, bar none. People were saying hello and being friendly, positive teammates in *quickplay*. My husband, who mostly plays just because I want to play because the toxicity wore him out, was having a blast, and even though I only used my mic a couple of times, I think I could get used to this - people almost *competitively* being nice because of positive reinforcement. I've been sexually harassed enough to be wary about talking in games, and this seems almost like a second chance.

While I think the excitement will die down, I think this has the poatential to have a lasting impact because it scratches a progression itch! What do y'all think? is this something that could work in your favorite game? How was your experience with endorsements, if you play?

Edit: sorry for resubmitting, if you already saw this! I changed the title and some content.",GirlGamers
Introduced a new fan to Overwatch while dogsitting 🐶,,GirlGamers
"Recommendation - Peaceful, Harvest Moon type game!","Hey everyone!

I stumbled across this game today on kickstarter:

[https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/bisonbit/farm-folks?ref=hero\_thanks](https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/bisonbit/farm-folks?ref=hero_thanks)

I thought you may be interested as I know a lot of people here are Stardew Valley/Harvest Moon fans! And this looks great! Love these kinds of games, they're just so relaxing :)",GirlGamers
Anyone have the Oculus Go?,"I just got my Oculus Go last night and have spent some time breaking it in. I love it so much! It's very affordable, it's comfortable, it has a great layout, and it has great games and features! I can check out my Instagram on the headset thanks to the browser. Overall I think it's really great, but my favorite feature is the Hub option. It's a great idea to let people hang out in a virtual room and chill in a great environment. 

I don't really know anyone else with the Go, so if you have it, what do you think so far? ",GirlGamers
Kickstarter for Video Game Inspired Backpacks,"Hi, everyone! I came across this Kickstarter that will sell video game inspired backpacks from Dark Souls, Pokemon, Final Fantasy VII (also there is a Final Fantasy Monsters and Summons one), and Digimon. 

Here is the link: https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/bluepotionuk/illustrated-video-game-inspired-backpacks  

I've already contributed to the Kickstarter, but I wanted to share in case others would be interested. ",GirlGamers
I need advice about what to buy,"I just got some dolla dolla bills y’all and need some advice because I’m being pulled in a lot of different directions and I have trouble with making decisions. IF YOU DON’T WANT TO READ THIS GIANT WALL OF TEXT MAYBE JUST GIVE ME GAME RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE PLAYSTATION 4. 

Should I buy a mic(because mine broke and I’ve been wanting a replacement :I) and a new game? But if so, what game? Singleplayer, multiplayer? I’m not good at games so I don’t really like competitive games because people get mad at me and i have social anxiety so it’s hard to play with people. But I looooove playing with people at the same time. As for singleplayer I love rpgs. I was thinking about kingdom come deliverance but I’ve heard bad things about the console version. but I don’t really know about any other rpgs because I’m burnt out on fallout 4 and skyrim(these two are the main rpgs I know of)  So I guess please give me recommendations. 

Or, a mic and a PSN card(amazon card) so I can play some games I missed on the PS3 like borderlands 1 and 2. Btw, is multiplayer still a thing for borderlands because I don’t want to play it alone? 

Orrrr a mic and PSN card so I can buy the rest of the dlcs for fallout new Vegas and 3. This is the cheapest option but I’ve been playing New Vegas for the last week or two and I’m getting burnt out but I really want to play dead money and lonesome road again because they are some of the best dlcs I’ve played in my life. Same goes for the dlcs for 3. But again, getting burnt out on the fallout series and maybe I’d enjoy another game. 

And the last choice. A mic, PSN card and alcohol so I can get the courage to find people and actually play ESO and FFXIV with. 

Or if you’ve read this giant giant post(thank you btw ☺️) maybe give me a combination of all of the above. ",GirlGamers
What are your top 5 games?,"In no particular order, I would say Bloodborne, Silent Hill 2, Resident Evil 4, Final Fantasy 7, and Shadow of the Colossus. ",GirlGamers
Community leader in FFXIV engaged in sexual harassment and predatory behavior for years,,GirlGamers
Computer question,"I hope this is okay to post, I feel safer asking it here because I feel like this is probably a ""duh"" answer. I have a laptop that had to go back twice for a new hard drive and once for new mother board. All told I wasn't able to use it for over a year and ended up buying a new one. I finally got it back from its most recent repair. It got a new hard drive and the company returned it to me without an OS. At this point I think I want to just sell it for ""parts/not working"" because of its history of issues. My concern is that if I sell it, if somebody does put an OS on it, will they be able to see my personal information and files? ",GirlGamers
[VENTING] Guys who defend sexualization as harmless but then get creepy or gross when faced with it.,"So a game I really like, love in fact, is Path of Exile. One of the initial things that stood out for me was the gender neutral armour. Over time, I realized this wasn't because of an enlightened attitude because the game has the ""globe girls"" (originally two topless, chained slaves on the health and mana displays) which were eventually replaced by skulls but then semi-restored in the form of two of the later antagonists (who are the goddesses of the sun and moon, fighters who wear next to nothing and are overly sexualized). The game also eventually added significant differences in some armour sets turning the female armour sets into ""boob plates"", fortunately this didn't apply retroactively so the simple solution is to stop spending money on the game from now on.

But today, I head over to the PoE sub and find [this](https://np.reddit.com/r/pathofexile/comments/8trywa/lunaris_artdeco_style_for_fanart_competition/) and the vile comments within. This is a game with a very toxic community anyway, plus they got very upset when the original globe girls were removed and blamed ""evil SJWs"", they said it was harmless, so on.

Then they behaved like a bunch of 13-year olds when something like this appears, talking about how much they want to have sex with or masturbate over this fictional drawing, people who so much as lament the sexual comments have been attacked and there are the usual ""women should appreciate that men view them like this"", ""this is an attack on heterosexual masculinity"", ""any criticism of my gender as a whole is an attack on me as an individual"" style comments.

I know this is just one drop in a big ocean, but I'm just so tired of it now. How can they honesty defend it as harmless if it is accompanied by such utterly disgusting attitudes towards women?

EDIT: missed two words",GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - June 27, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
Does anyone else get Game Fatigue?,"I'm using the term Game Fatigue to refer to a problem I encounter while playing, primarily, stealth and horror games; namely that I can't play them for extended periods of time without my nerves getting frazzled.

Stealth and especially horror games make me anxious and nervous, and they kind of exhaust me mentally. The gameplay tends to be slow and careful, and it always feels like I'm only one or two mistakes from having to start the whole section over.

For example, I've been playing Prey (2017) lately, and while I love the game/setting/story, and the gameplay is good, it also makes me not want to play it. I can't handle how tightly wound it makes me for very long.

Sometimes I have to take a break and play something that's less stressful; like HuniePop (psyched for the sequel), or Doom (2016).",GirlGamers
Games to keep me occupied?,"This has probably been the hardest week of my life. Working crazy hours, having to deal with a FAFSA issue with my college, and oh yeah, my boyfriend and I broke up after three and a half years of dating! *So* I'm looking for a new game that'll really take my mind off all the stress ;-;

I'm on PC mostly, but do have a PS4. I would appreciate any kind of rec.

edit: thank you for all the responses! i’ll try to reply back to them all 💜 i can’t wait to see what i end up getting!",GirlGamers
Me 🐟 IRL,,GirlGamers
She's helping me play Final Fantasy :3,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - June 26, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
An experience I had tonight,"So I play League of Legends a fair bit (I’m not great but I have fun) and I was playing well in a game tonight, So was another player.

He asked my age and if I wanted to duo. I told him 20 (which is my age) and yes (he also asked if I’m a stoner??? ) 
So we queue up together and I put my mic in so we can chat (league has inbuilt comms so that’s a bonus!) 
Upon hearing my voice he instantly gets angry and says “you’re not 20 bro don’t lie.” 
“Haha, I am but I get told I sound like a guy! I’m actually female”

Without hesitation he removed me from the queue, messages me to fuck off and blocks me. In less than 5 seconds. 

It kind of hurt... anyone else had similar experiences ? I can’t tell if he thought I was a guy lying about my age or just weirdly sexist. ",GirlGamers
Can’t decide on which console as a newbie :friends or exclusives?,"Hey guys! I need some help deciding which console to get! I’m completely new to gaming but have been playing with some friends and have been really interested in getting into it! My last console was a wii so I don’t really have any true gaming experience . More of my friends have xboxes which I was leaning towards buying , but I’ve been doing some research and it seems there are some ps4 exclusives I’d love to try out.now I’m super confused on what to do. Also,idk if this is relevant,but I’m not sure how much I’ll be using online multiplayer at least for now , maybe if friends were on etc. I hate COD but interested in the uncharted and the last of us. Love fifa , the Witcher etc. any suggestions?",GirlGamers
list of JRPG female protagonists,,GirlGamers
Good games for a beginner gamer trying to get into gaming,"Hello all! Posting for a friend. I’ve been gaming my whole life, and am super into League, ESO, vermentide, and mostly action or strategy RPGs. 
My good friend is trying to play more games, but she’s pretty new to the PC gaming world. She’s very into Nintendo and cutesy games. Any recommendations for starter games for her? Thank you guys! Any good MMOs for beginners would be cool too! :)",GirlGamers
Summer Games Done Quick,"Just a quick reminder: [Games Done Quick](https://www.twitch.tv/gamesdonequick) started their summer event yesterday. If you don't know Games Done Quick, they basically recruit speedrunners and stream games for donations towards a specific charity (Doctors Without Borders this time). Here's a [schedule](https://gamesdonequick.com/schedule) of all the games throughout the week.

Additionally, if you have a Prime Twitch sub, considering throwing it at them this month towards a good cause. 

",GirlGamers
What games bring back the best nostalgia for you from your past?,"Curious to know what other people's favorites are!

I recently bought the discounted .Hack//G.U. bundle from the Steam Summer Sale and it brings back so many memories, I forgot how much I loved the games. I spent all weekend playing and managed to finish the first one on Sunday morning to move into the second one.


I recently haven't been passionate about many games, and felt a little sad about it, since I've always been heavy into gaming since High School. It was great to fully enjoy something again!",GirlGamers
My new streaming setup in night/day. Is there such thing as too much RGB? 🤔,,GirlGamers
Bought the Switch and some accessories! With my own money!! Game suggestions?,,GirlGamers
"Older gamer problems, anyone have advice?","For those that don't know me, I'm in my 50s, been gaming all my life. Unfortunately I'm starting to experience issues with my hands, particularly my left thumb. It's either the beginning of arthritis or repetitive stress injury from gaming. I'm not giving up my lifelong love and hobby so I'm looking for things that work for anyone that has the same issue.

I've ordered some arthritis gloves (no fingertips) from Amazon but they won't get here until tomorrow. Does anyone else have any suggestions?

And I'm posting here because I'd rather hear from other women than deal with salty gamer guys on other forums. 

EDIT: Thanks to everyone who chimed in with advice. I really appreciate your taking time out to answer.

I woke up this morning with my thumb joint popping when I bent it so I did some google research and the symptoms I have fit a condition known as ""trigger thumb;"" (popping joint, worse in the morning after waking up, pain and a small lump at the base of my thumb where it joins the palm). I probably need to stop playing for a week or two so it can heal. I am not sure I can make myself do this, haha. I'm looking into something called Oval 8 braces, that are made specifically for this condition.",GirlGamers
Was going to make a list of JRPGs with playable female characters and then realized ff15 is the only one I can think of that doesn't have one.,"Out of curiousity, does anyone know any jrpgs (or any RPGs) that doesn't have at least one (or even a cast) of playable female characters? 

When I started out gaming being able to play as female characters was a big deal in a hobby usually seen as aimed at guys (probs why JRPGs and adventure games were so appealing to me, now that I think about it). I love the cast dynamic in jrpgs and the usual decent amount of playable female characters is a bonus (minus some terrible character designs in a few games).

Edit: I made a list of non-sexualised JRPGs female protags after thinking about the comments: https://docs.google.com/presentation/d/14dfGMjPWN1TFmBaCeVQWXeGmIQeYXVjOhJXGlRW2LoE/edit?usp=sharing",GirlGamers
Omfg,,GirlGamers
"As a WoW player, this makes me pretty sad... and so do the comments :(",,GirlGamers
Gamer certificate,,GirlGamers
Does anyone else feel lonely as a GirlGamer?,"Hi there!

Is it just me or are there almost no GirlGamers beyond this sub.
As a 17 year old Dutch gal I don’t really have any female friends who play games. This kinds of makes me feel lonely.
Does anyone here feel the same?",GirlGamers
Looking for Advice on gameplay style,"So I've been playing video games since I was a little kid, I've never been very good, but I've always had a ton of fun.  As a girl it wasn't something the media advertised to me, but having a computer focused dad he was interested enough in the early systems to expose me to it and not deter me as I got older.  I am unfortunately a button masher, especially when it comes to fighting bosses, and that usually doesn't end well for me.  It always takes me many attempts and I get really frustrated sometimes.  I've been playing breath of the wild on switch and I absolutely love it, except for when I'm up against tough bosses and loose 6+ times in a row... Are there any games I can use to distance myself from this style of gameplay and practice using actual movesets instead of just mashing an attack button?  I was hoping this would be the right place to ask as I feel my fellow girl gamers will be more understanding than the other subs. ",GirlGamers
Top left corner of my keyboard is too cute! Seriously recommend Clackeys if you are looking for artisan :),,GirlGamers
Life is Strange 2 Ep 1 Releasing Sept. 27th!,,GirlGamers
Where are girls that play games IRL??,"I am beyond happy to find that there is a sub for just girl gamers. However, I want to make gamer friends IRL, but there are just no other girls I can find that play games at all. I only find guys that are interested in me. 

What kind of places do you find each other? Right now it feels impossible.",GirlGamers
Gaming and Socioeconomic Status,"I didn't consider myself as a ""gamer"" until I was in my twenties and I picked up playing games as an attempt to spend more time with my husband. However, I know some would argue this point. I loved playing games on the computer at school when I was a kid, I totally rocked the single game my family owned for N64, I had a lot of fun when my cousin would let me borrow his Game Boy to play Pokémon, I mastered Windows Pinball in middle school and Bejeweled in high school, and I loved pretty much any Sim game I could get my hands on.

The thing is, my family never had very much money growing up. We could only afford 1 game for the N64 (though we would occasionally rent others from Blockbuster) and we eventually had to get rid of the N64 and couldn't afford to buy any consoles after that. We did have a home PC once I started to enter my pre-teens, but it was a pretty old one that couldn't run most newer (at the time) games. Sometimes I wonder if my hobbies or interests when I was growing up would have been different if we could.

It still feels weird at times when friends reminisce about their childhoods playing a specific console or game, as if it was a universal experience for our generation, and I think to myself without saying, ""we couldn't afford that.""

I think this tide is changing. Mobile games are becoming more and more popular and similar in quality to console/PC games and the price of smartphones continues to drop. Plus, nowadays someone can use a cheap laptop to play a lot of ""older"" games that people still rave about like Dragon Age, Skyrim, etc. I'm interested in hearing other views on the topic, though. Did this impact anyone else growing up? Does it still impact you today? What sort of impact do you think it will have on the next generation of gamers?",GirlGamers
"""Inferior emotional brain""",,GirlGamers
"'The Last of Us' Developers Discuss Realistic Kissing, Queer Fridging and More",,GirlGamers
Are you interested in getting back into WoW?,"Blizzard is hosting a [Welcome Back Weekend](http://www.wowhead.com/news=285064/welcome-back-weekend-how-to-get-back-into-world-of-warcraft-in-2018). Through Sunday, any player who has ever subscribed can get the game up through WoD (level 100) and play for free without purchasing game time. They are also offering 25% off character services.

If you'd like a friend to play with, let me know! =)",GirlGamers
Itchio summer sale!,"To add to all the games we'll be drooling over, [Itchio](https://itch.io/) is also having a summer sale! Looks like there's some neat (and cheap) stuff that's not on Steam. Happy hunting, ladies!",GirlGamers
Co-op game recommendations?,"I just got my summer break and the steam sale just started, so me and my best gamer friend (also a girl) had planned that we would find some games to buy and play in the summer. Sadly she's going to travel in a few weeks and said she needs to save every penny for it and we could still just play our usual games (Overwatch and Stardew Valley, I think both are fun but I get tired of them fast).

So that's why I'm looking for some (preferrably cheap/on sale) cute co-op game recommendations to buy for myself and gift her one so we can play :3! So I want to suprise her with it and that's why I need you girls' expertise, sicne I can't really ask her what she wants to play ^^

I'm thinking that it shouldn't be anything where you play with strangers or that has a lot of gore and stuff, but just tell me what games you like and why and I'll be happy to take a look!

Thank you all in advance!! :D",GirlGamers
"Find a Friend Friday - June 22, 2018","Due to popular demand, we've added a regular post to help people group up and find each other on the subreddit. Don't forget, we also have a [discord server](https://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/5xbdk3/come_hang_with_us_and_game_with_us_on_our/) if you'd prefer to group up with people there.

**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Posts that target women from those who identify as male will be removed.

**Friend Requests**

If you are looking for some new friends, we suggest you leave a comment with some or all of the following info:

* Game(s) you're looking to group up in
* Platform(s)
* Timezone/Region
* Username, Gamertag, steam, etc. Feel free to exchange this information in PM if you don't feel comfortable leaving that information public.

We hope this makes it easier for you to group up with fellow girlgamers. Have fun and happy gaming!    ",GirlGamers
Blizzard Gear Summer Sale,,GirlGamers
First ever licensed statue representation of the Dragonborn as a woman,,GirlGamers
Whatcha buyin’ from the Steam Summer Sale?,"I’m trying to expand my gaming world and finally have some time to do so! I recently finished Life is Strange (pretty good) and I’m working my way through the prequel right now (not as good). I tend to like sims, and games like Don’t Starve and Stardew Valley. I also started playing FPS about two years ago when Overwatch came out. I’ve tried a few others, but there’s nothing I like as much so far. I love it because of the richness of story, cool abilities, and it’s something I can play with my husband. I played WoW for quite awhile, until I got bored with the grinding, and way back in the day, I played Ultima Online so much; school suffered quite a bit.

I’m currently downloading Divinity Original Sin 2, and plan to buy Planet Coaster, Oxenfree, and Potion Explosion (something else to play with my SO). Any other recommendations? What are you planning to buy?",GirlGamers
Experiences with Animosity from other Female Gamers,"So this is bit of a random topic, but maybe I wanted to examine the psychology of this dynamic. My title should be a bit more specific. So I normally play games and I integrate with a lot of males, and I find it fine for the most part - some minor problems, but nothing too big. But then when there's like another female that gets introduced in the pack -- I often feel like there's some animosity.

I have never really had the opportunity to play with a more female dominant group - so I would imagine this wouldn't be the case. Or of course it could just be unlucky of me to meet with individuals that are just like that in nature. 
My thought was that maybe the women just like to be the alpha in the pack, and they have to exert dominance in the group, some have been younger than me, but some have been older than me. 
I have tried reaching out to some of these females to play together, but I don't gage a lot of interest. Of course there may be other females who just don't like the company other females too. 
So I was kind of curious if anyone had a similar experience, or different ones -- and why do you think these experiences came about?",GirlGamers
How often do you cuties buy a game?!,"I mean like each month :)

I have a ..... problem... and unless I can really do a great job of controlling myself it's close to 40$ a month 0_0...... and have barely any money left for my internet etc :D

EDIT:

BTW here are some great games with a good Playtime/Price for people who are on a budget (In my opinion of course! I'm not god!) :)

1. TF2/ Overwatch (duh)
2. Warframe
3. GW2
4. Stardew valley
5. Starbound!
6. Minecraft(double duh)
7. The legend of zelda: Breath of the wild.
8. Hearthstone
9. Fortnite (Duh squared)
10. rocket league
11. Witcher 3
12. fallout
13. Borderlands
14. Slime rancher (Ahhhhhhhh cuuuuuuuuuuuuuuute help I'm exploding, also Why is it suddenly 5am)
15. CS:GO (Or how to learn to swear in Russian in 7 days)
16. Terrariya (too spooky for me 0_0)
17. Heat signature kinda
18. Stellaris

Hope you don't mind the list I was just thinking it might be helpful :)

EDIT: also I feel like I have an nemesis who dislikes all my posts :D I get so many downvotes everywhere....",GirlGamers
Mamba TE vs Deathadder Elite?,"Does anyone use the Razer Deathadder Elite? I have a Mamba, and while I like it, I’ve had it for a while and it has its things that I’m not crazy about. Can anyone compare the two?",GirlGamers
Wasn't sure how to feel about this. These doll creep me out. &gt; &lt;,,GirlGamers
Are there any girls who braodcast on Mixer?,"So as some may know (or dont) Beam changed into Mixer which allows you to stream your video game play. 

I wanted to link up with some fellow Mixer ladies for some co streams, game nights and such. 

If you are on Mixer whats your handle? Mine is MunchkinDoom. :) 

Sound off. 

Do you like the platform? 

How long have you been streaming? ",GirlGamers
Sea of Thieves Discrimination Rant,"Does anyone play Sea of Thieves? It's been my favorite game lately, but my friend I play with currently can't play so I've been joining others from LFG posts. Well, I had a super terrible experience today.

I met this guy last night during a fort. He was pirate legend and seemed like a nice person to play with. He added me, so I accepted. He invited me to his game today. We were doing a legend voyage which generally takes anywhere from 2-4 hours. It was a ship full of all guys. I sailed with them for a the first few maps and everything was okay. They were fighting skeleton captains and told me to go get chickens and pigs, so I thought okay sure. I know that aspect of the voyage is boring so I didnt mind helping out. Well we move on to other voyages and do another fort. During this they tell me to keep look out. So I do. I ask a few times if I could help dig chests etc. and they're like no, you'll just die and make it harder for everyone. That kind of hurt, but I'm over an hour into the mission and want to tough it out. 

Things get worse. They begin to sexualize me and everything I begin to do to try and help is wrong, and they tell me to stop. I tell them I have to step away for a moment but keep my headset on. They think I'm gone and I hear them talking about me. They said ""this is why I hate sailing with girls. They just stand around and act pretty and expect us guys to carry them. Its pathetic""  at this point I begin crying and mute my mic, using only the radial text chat. I tried to help but they wouldn't let me. 

We finally reach the last map. Its been about an hour of sailing silent and being told I don't do anything. Someone goes to dig the last treasure and they're like ""get off here, cactus, and help him fight skeletons so you'll be doing something for once and we can pretend like you earned this treasure."" I stayed silent but helped and they're like ""oohhh you hurt her feelings"" and laughed. 

I stayed silent until we reached the outpost, where I attempted to grab the most valuable items to turn in first because thats what I always do to be safe. They say ""stop digging around and just turn stuff in, whore""

After turning in, I immediately got off, blocked everyone, and cried. I really wanted to leave earlier, but did not want to waste my time that I'd already spent. 

Really, I just needed to vent. If you read it all, thank you. I know I should have stood up for myself more, but I'm just a shy, timid girl who hates confrontation. I'm over it now, as they're just words and not people I really know so no need to let them have that affect on me, but in the moment and right after it was hard. If you want, feel free to share stories of your own bad gaming experiences due to discrimination of any kind.

Also, if you play SOT feel free to add me as I'm looking for decent people to play with too. :)",GirlGamers
"For the competitive gamers, would you ever go into eSports?","I play competitively just to improve my own score and gameplay, but I never thought of actually going pro and playing in those big, international tournaments &amp; competitions. 

What about the rest of you? Who has any intention of getting into competitive gaming more seriously? Also if you don't want to, why not?",GirlGamers
"After being denied a PlayStation as a child because ‘games are for boys’, I can FINALLY play this! :)",,GirlGamers
Why are votes hidden?,I'm curious why upvotes and downvotes are hidden for the all comments on the subreddit. Anyone knows why?,GirlGamers
Developers Say Twitch is Hurting Single-Player Games,,GirlGamers
Well hello there... ❤️,,GirlGamers
"'What're You Playing?' Wednesday - June 20, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* Use a **SPOILER** tag if it's applicable.

So... what are **YOU** playing this week?
",GirlGamers
"""The problem with Aloy is she's not sexualized enough""",,GirlGamers
Assassin’s Creed Odyssey won’t whitewash Ancient Greece – Ubisoft cast as many Greek actors as possible,,GirlGamers
What do all you girls on here play?,"I have only met one girl who plays games, so I'm interested in finding out what other girls play. 

Personally I've played paladins, fallout, skyrim, black ops zombies, COD, Zelda and etc. 

Im just all over the place. What are you guys?",GirlGamers
"This is gonna be an odd question, but - Recommendations for games that do not require opposable thumbs?","So in a few days, I'm going to have splints that I have to wear for like 2 months that immobilize my wrists and thumb (damaged ligaments in my wrists). 

Thing is, I'm a gamer *and* ADHD. I can't turn off my brain very easily, so two months of not using my hands is going to drive me batty. Usually I'm doing at least two things at once (playing games and watching TV, or art and TV, etc). Forced idleness does not suit me. I've already cut significantly down on my gaming because I also have tendonitis in my forearms, so holding a controller or playing games on PC causes me pain after about an hour too. I'm going to try going for more walks, but unfortunately we're also in a big heat wave where I am, and being outside is uncomfortable at best.

So I was looking for suggestions. I've already got Crypt of the Necrodancer (and the dancepad) so I can play that, but one can only do rouge-like dancing for so long. (Thank god for AC though!) I have VR, but I won't be able to use the controllers once I have the splints on. 

So I'm pleading with the community here! And suggestions for games? I have practically every console except for an Xbone, so that's not an issue. 

Last time I had a similar forced idleness like this, we set up emulators so I could play SNES or GB games with a dance pad, and it worked, except it's VERY tedious, and standing to play games for more than an hour or two is tiring.

TL;DR - Gonna be an Iguanodon for two month HALP.",GirlGamers
Who to follow on Twitch,"Hey Everyone!

I am rather new to Twitch and only used it in the past to watch Critical Role but I really want to watch some awesome streamers! I tend to play a lot of story driven games, strategy games, jrpgs, slice of life type games.

* Who is your go to suggestion to follow?
* I am interested in following some awesome women streamers who should I take a look at?
* Any suggestions or tips for Twitch in general? 

",GirlGamers
"At E3, SoulCalibur's Objectified Women Felt Like A Relic Of The Past",,GirlGamers
There was a discussion about this a few days ago on here so I thought you’d all like to see this 😊,,GirlGamers
"Are you comfortable with ""showcasing"" your sex in your gamertag?","This can just apply to anything almost, but anything where you generate a user name or character name, and have everyone see it when you are playing.

I only came to the realization, that I feel sometimes regret, and other times I feel pride too, about having words in my gamer tag that implicate I'm a girl. 

I feel regret when I have to deal with harrassment/sexist remarks from other male gamers, or when I even have some of them wanting to become ""friends"" with me just to be flirty. I want to make friends, but not because I'm a girl -- because of the person I am.

At the same time, I am proud to be a female gamer, especially in some games that are largely dominated by a male population. I feel like I can have the skills to compete with other people on an equal level. I don't want other girls to feel afraid, or uncomfortable playing because of their sex. I want them to know they are not alone because ....guess what? Female gamers are actually a thing in this modern age.

So what do you think? Feel free to share your experiences as well.

(also note this is my first topic on this subreddit, but I really wanted to have this discussion at some point!)",GirlGamers
New Xbox Avatars are finally here!,"[They started releasing them to ""Insiders"" today!](https://www.slashgear.com/xbox-ones-new-avatar-editor-begins-rolling-out-to-insiders-at-last-19534717/)

My husband just sent me a photo of his and now I'm stuck at work for another 3 hours when all I wanna do is go home and make a Me. :(",GirlGamers
"Why Are There Not Many ""Girl"" Games?","I know that games are gender less, but I guess what I mean are your typical cute game with bright colors and fluffy creatures and such.

I've been playing games all my life, but when I was a kid I tried to pretend to like the more ""boyish"" games either to be cool or fit in. As I've gotten older I've realized I'm actually very girly. In my free time I like playing cute, relaxing, and happy games like Animal Crossing or Stardew Valley. I have terrible anxiety and depression and I use these games to help me cope with my problems. I can no longer play competitive games because they cause me stress. I love to play co-op games with friends where we kill zombies or something, as long as it isn't competitive against other players.

I noticed that there don't seem to be a lot of options for games like that. Most of the games that I see are post-apocalyptic games with dark stories. I was very disappointed with E3 because the majority of games being announced seemed to fit in that category. I feel like in the past there used to be a lot more cutesy games being released compared to now.

Am I missing games or something? I would really like to find more cute and relaxing games to play if they're out there!",GirlGamers
Naughty Dog artist Boon Cotter reminds people that game developers actually WANT to make diverse games sometimes,,GirlGamers
"Self-Promotion Tuesday - June 19, 2018","**The Rules:**

* Please use this thread for self-promotion: for example, Twitch streams, YouTube channels, Kickstarters.
* Keep your posts as responses to this thread so we don't clutter up the front page of the sub.
* You may make a separate, front-page post if you are doing a one-time special event, such as streaming for charity. Otherwise, your post will be removed.
",GirlGamers
Is the Star Trek: Bridge Crew Community Welcoming to Women?,I just started playing Star Trek: Bridge Crew. I'm hesitant to join online play because the only clip I saw of a woman playing this game online is one where she got mocked. Do you have any input how female sounding voices are generally met in ST: BC?,GirlGamers
Digital download codes that are crazy cheap,"I came across a few newly/recently released games being sold as digital downloads on eBay for a fraction of the price one would have to pay in store or from the game maker's website. I am curious how people get their hands on these codes, and then can turn around and sell them so cheaply? Are they stolen somehow? I imagine that since they are sold through eBay they must be the real thing...",GirlGamers
Anyone Have Game Recommendations?,"Finally got a laptop so I'm looking for some games to play. It's good but not beefy enough to play games like Ark or Dark Souls 3. Does anyone have games they would recommend?  Love Bioware (Especially Kotor and Mass Effect) and the Zelda franchise, also really enjoyed portal, Mario Odyssey, Stardew Valley and some more that I can't think of now. Considering playing the new Elder Scrolls game when it releases as I haven't played one before and maybe Destiny. 

I'm not hugely picky on the type of game, all I know is I tend to prefer rpg style but am open to try new things. I'm also in my late teens so not super young but young enough that I'd rather not play games with copious gore and sexual content. It gets pretty awkward. Maybe something with skippable cutscenes at least. Love a good story but if the gameplay is good I don't mind super much.

Let me know what you all think, I've been searching around the Internet for a while but never seem to find anything that I'm super into or that doesn't have a huge downside.",GirlGamers
"People are freaking out about WHO's classification of ""Gaming Disorder"". Are we having the right conversations about addiction?",,GirlGamers
Are there any small Discords just for Girl Gamers?,"I don't want a massive group, just a tiny group to be honest so I can make friends. I don't have much faith though because every Discord I have joined has had some sort of drama. ",GirlGamers
He took my chair so I thought he might as well take my Switch too 🤷,,GirlGamers
Trying WoW again...,"Hi ladies! I've been in this group for a few months now and I just want to say first how thankful I am for this wonderful community where female gamers can connect and encourage and support one another! As many others have said, it truly is a breath of fresh air in the world of gaming.

I'm trying WoW again after quitting in WoD. My hubby and I quit partly because getting flying was such a grind and also because of the toxic community. I found a group that was doing a transmog contest for 25 beta keys and I actually won one (random drawing). The beta is completely separate from the live game. I was hoping to find some other friends with beta access to play with. 

Does anyone here want a friend to play beta with? I don't enjoy playing a game like WoW that is intended as a massively multiplayer game alone, but when I reach out to look for friends I inevitably find trolls. If this bothers me, should I just quit WoW permanently and avoid MMOs altogether? I do enjoy playing Minecraft with my small group of mature and respectful female friends and wish I could find a such friends in other games like WoW.",GirlGamers
Are there any Persona 3 fans here? Let me know what you think!,,GirlGamers
Book Recommendations??,"Hey y’all,

I was wondering if anyone had any book recommendations on gaming, women in gaming, really anything related to what generally goes on in this subreddit. 

I’ve found a few I’m interested in, but I’m really not looking for something intensely academic (I did my time researching games in academia), so that narrows the list down a bit. The ones I’ve found also appear to be quite old, though I’m interested nonetheless.

I’m also not just interested in video games. My initial search was actually for books on D&amp;D and it’s history or players’ experiences and the like. I’m thinking of reading *Of Dice and Men* on that subject, though I’ve decided against *Confessions of a Part-Time Sorceress* after reading reviews and an excerpt.

I thought this would be the perfect place to ask if anyone had any recommendations for this kind of thing. I read a ton, and I’d love to be reading about this topic if I can get my hands on some quality books on the subject. I thought others might also be interested.",GirlGamers
Someone cut together a trailer for Cyberpunk 2077 using Ciri's description. Can't Wait for This Game!,,GirlGamers
Multiplayer games with inclusive communities,We all know multiplayer games where sexist and homophobic comments are the norm. We read about it every day. So I wanted to take a moment to appreciate games that somehow managed to gain mostly wholesome communities. What game did you play where you felt positive about the community in general? Tell us about your good gaming experience. Let us celebrate when playing together is truely enriching. =),GirlGamers
A podcast about some real-life WW2 heroines that also mentions Battlefield V,,GirlGamers
Local newspaper article about Twitch streamer LifeWithLaughs / Shahmeen Kasim,,GirlGamers
